IMBALANCE  IN  U.S.-KOREA  AUTOMOBILE  TRADE 

S.  HRG.  110–1193 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, 

TRADE, AND TOURISM 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

SEPTEMBER  24,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

78–188 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Ranking 
TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  INTERSTATE  COMMERCE,  TRADE,  AND  TOURISM 

BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 

JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on September 24, 2008  .....................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator McCaskill  .............................................................................

WITNESSES 

Bozzella,  John  T.,  Vice  President,  External  Affairs  and  Public  Policy  (Amer-
icas), Chrysler LLC  ..............................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Brilliant,  Myron,  President,  U.S.-Korea  Business  Council;  Vice  President, 
Asia,  U.S.  Chamber  of  Commerce;  on  behalf  of  the  U.S.  Chamber  of  Com-
merce,  the  U.S.-Korea  Business  Council,  the  American  Chamber  of  Com-
merce in Korea, and the U.S.-Korea FTA Business Coalition  ..........................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Cassidy,  Robert  B.,  Director,  International  Trade  and  Services,  Kelley  Drye 
Warren LLP  ..........................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Gettelfinger,  Ron,  President,  International  Union,  United  Automobile,  Aero-
space and Agricultural Implement Workers of America (UAW)  ......................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
McMillion, Dr. Charles W., President and Chief Economist, MBG Information 
Services  .................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Page 
1 
1 
48 

16 
18 

35 
38 

6 
8 

11 
13 

25 
26 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

IMBALANCE  IN  U.S.-KOREA 

AUTOMOBILE  TRADE 

WEDNESDAY,  SEPTEMBER  24,  2008 

U.S. SENATE, 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, TRADE, AND 
TOURISM, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Byron  L.  Dorgan, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator DORGAN. The hearing will come to order. 
This  is  a  hearing  of  the  Commerce  Subcommittee  on  Interstate 
Commerce,  Trade,  and  Tourism.  The  subject  of  today’s  hearing  is 
the imbalance in U.S.-Korea automobile trade. 

I’ve  called  this  hearing  because  the  Senate  may  be  asked,  at 
some  point  soon,  to  approve  a  free  trade  agreement  with  Korea, 
and it appears to me that our trade negotiators have learned noth-
ing  from  the  failure  of  U.S.  trade  policy  over  the  last  several  dec-
ades. This bilateral trade in automobiles between the United States 
and  Korea,  for  me,  is  a  case  in  point,  and  I  wanted  to  have  that 
discussion today with some folks who know about it. 

The  number  one  product  category  that  we  trade  with  Korea,  on 
a  value  basis,  is  automobiles.  But,  it  is  almost  entirely  a  one-way 
trading  relationship.  In  2007—and  I  have  some  charts  to  show— 
in  2007,  we  bought  over  $8  billion  worth  of  Korean  automobiles. 
Korea,  by  contrast,  produced—or,  purchased,  rather—very,  very 
few  American-made  cars.  There’s  a  simple  reason  for  this,  and  it 
is  that  the  Korean  government  has  done  everything  it  can  to  pre-
vent  U.S.  cars  from  being  sold  in  the  Korean  market.  Over  time, 
the Korean government has done everything, from singling out pur-
chasers  of  foreign-made  cars  with  tax  audits  to  declaring  foreign- 
made  cars  unsafe.  The  result  is  that  98  percent  of  the  cars  on  the 
roads in Korea are Korean-made. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

2 

Senator DORGAN. Imagine that. You can stand on a street corner, 
I  am  told,  in  Seoul,  for  an  hour  and  not  see  a  foreign-made  car 
drive  by.  Would  that  happen  in  Washington,  D.C.?  It’s  a  modern 
metropolitan area of 23 million people in Seoul, Korea, the second- 
largest  city  in  the  world,  and  it’s  very  difficult  to  spot  a  car  that 
was not made in the country of Korea. 

In  fact,  the  few  foreign  cars  that  are  sold  in  Korea  are  typically 
purchased  by  expatriate  businessmen  and  women  who  live  in  just 
a  few  areas  of  the  city,  and  occasionally  the  Korean  government 
will purchase a few U.S.-made cars, just to be able to say it’s doing 
what  it  can.  But,  ordinary  Koreans  have  largely  gotten  the  mes-
sage,  and  they  don’t  buy  foreign  cars,  don’t  dare  buy  foreign  cars. 
This  next  chart  shows  our  automobile  trade  balance  with  Korea 
last year, or, I should say, our automobile trade imbalance. The Ko-
reans shipped 772,000 Korean-made cars to America, and we were 
able  to  ship  6,200  U.S.-made  cars  to  Korea.  This  lopsided  ratio 
translates  directly  into  the  loss  of  thousands  of  well-paying  U.S. 
jobs, whether in Michigan, in Ohio, or other states around the Na-
tion. This ratio has remained essentially unchanged for over a dec-
ade, and it’s remarkable, because the U.S. has signed, not one, but 
two  separate  trade  deals  with  Korea  to  open  up  the  Korean  auto 
market. The Koreans have simply failed to live up to their commit-
ments. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
T
R
H
C
4
2
9

3 

Senator  DORGAN.  The  most  recent  agreement  negotiated  with 
Korea  on  auto  trade  was  signed  in  1998,  and  I  have  a  chart  that 
shows  the  trading  relationship  with  Korea  after  that  agreement 
was signed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

3
T
R
H
C
4
2
9

.

s
p
e
2
T
R
H
C
4
2
9

4 

Senator  DORGAN.  You’ll  see  that,  up  through  1997,  we  had  a 
positive trade relationship with Korea; in fact, a positive net trade 
balance  with  Korea.  Since  that  time,  since  1998,  when  we  signed 
an  agreement  on  automobile  trade,  our  trade  balance  with  Korea 
fell into the red and has been consistently in deficit since. 

Since  the  mid-1990s,  we’ve  had  a  small  surplus,  but  in  1998  the 
trade negotiators signed a deal to increase our access to the Korean 
market.  No  sooner  had  we  signed  the  deal  in  1998  that  our  trade 
balance  began  to  deteriorate,  as  you  will  see  in  this  chart.  We 
began to run huge trade deficits with Korea. The automobile trade 
imbalance represents 85 percent of those red lines. 

Now  our  trade  negotiators  want  us  to  approve  another  trade 
agreement  with  Korea  that  they  have  negotiated.  This  agreement 
opens  up  our  automobile  market  completely  to  the  Koreans  by 
eliminating  the  remaining  2-and-a-half-percent  tariff  on  Korean 
cars,  but  it  does  not  commit  Korea  to  allowing  a  single  additional 
U.S.-made  automobile  into  the  Korean  market.  Instead,  it  merely 
lowers  the  tariff  rate  on  U.S.  cars  entering  Korea.  That  assumes 
the  Korean  government  is  sincere  about  allowing  U.S.  cars  into 
that country. 

This  would  be  the  third  trade  agreement  trying  to  deal  with 
automobiles,  the  first  two  having  failed.  Frankly,  I’ve  not  seen  a 
shred  of  evidence  that  the  Korean  government  has  changed  its 
mind on this issue. 

U.S.  automakers  and  autoworkers  have  pleaded  with  the  U.S. 
Trade Representative to include specific market-access benchmarks 
in  the  agreement  so  that  our  tariffs  on  Korean  cars  would  not  be 
lowered  until  we  were  actually  exporting  more  cars  to  Korea.  We 
have  a  very  low  tariff,  but  it  would  not  be  lowered  even  further 
until we saw results from Korea. But, our trade negotiators scoffed 
at that idea. 

My  own  view  is,  this  new  trade  agreement  would  be  another 
heaping  teaspoonful  of  the  same  flawed  trade  policies  that  have 
brought us to where we are in automobile trade. This Korean trade 
deal  is,  in  my  judgment,  not  going  anywhere,  as  long  as  that  re-
mains the case. 

I do want to make one additional comment before I introduce the 
witnesses. I have spoken at length, both in this Committee and on 
the  floor  of  the  Senate,  about  the  issue  of  bilateral  automobile 
trade with China, which is not yet reaching the area of automobile 
trade  with  Korea.  But,  in  our  bilateral  agreement  with  China,  our 
country  signed  an  agreement  that  said  it  will  be  all  right,  after  a 
phase-in, for our country to impose a 21⁄2 percent tariff on Chinese 
cars  being  shipped  into  the  United  States,  and  it  will  be  all  right 
for  the  Chinese  to  impose  a  25  percent  tariff—ten  times  higher— 
on U.S. cars that would be sold in China. 

The  Chinese  are  ramping  up  a  very  large  and  aggressive  effort 
to be a major exporter of automobiles, including to the U.S. market. 
Don’t  know  exactly  when  that’s  going  to  happen—a  year,  2  or  3 
years—but  it  will  happen.  And  when  it  happens,  we  will  have 
signed  up  to  a  bilateral  agreement  China,  with  whom  we  have  a 
large—very large trade deficit—last month, I believe it was $23 bil-
lion, in a month—we will have signed up to a trade agreement with 
China  that  said,  ‘‘You  go  ahead  and  impose  a  tariff  that  is  ten 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

5 

times higher than our tariff on bilateral automobile trade.’’ I think 
that is almost unbelievably ignorant of our country’s own economic 
interests. 

I don’t believe we should put up walls around our country. I don’t 
believe that we should be protectionists for the sake of being called 
protectionists.  But,  I  do  believe  that  trade  in  this  country,  as  we 
negotiate  it  with  other  countries,  ought  to  be  mindful  of  our  own 
economic  interests.  Trade  that  produces  giant,  relentless  deficits, 
year  after  year  after  year,  as  has  been  the  case,  now  in  the  $600 
billion and $700 billion and $800 billion-a-year area, inevitably will 
weaken  this  country’s  currency,  inevitably  will  be  repaid  with  a 
lower  standard  of  living  in  the  United  States.  And  if  this  country 
does not wake up, and policymakers do not wake up at some point 
and decide that we must have some basic balance in our trade rela-
tionships,  and  decide  that  trade  agreements  must  be  negotiated  in 
a  manner  that  is  competent  rather  than  incompetent,  ultimately 
this American economy will pay a very large price. 

Senator  DORGAN.  We’re  starting  to  see  some  of  that,  even  now, 
on Monday of this week, with respect to what has happened to the 
value  of  the  dollar  and  the  electronic  herd  that  runs  after  a  cur-
rency they believe that is representative of a weak economy. 

So,  I  have  invited  a  number  of  people  to  testify  about  this  sub-
ject:  Robert  Cassidy  served  as  Deputy  U.S.  Trade  Representative 
under  the  Clinton  administration  and  led  negotiations  with  China 
on market access to that country prior to China gaining permanent 
normal  trade  relations.  Mr.  Cassidy  recently  wrote  an  editorial 
warning  that  some  critical  flaws  in  our  trade  policy  with  China 
were about to be repeated with Korea. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
4
T
R
H
C
4
2
9

6 

Mr. Ron Gettelfinger is the President of the United Autoworkers, 
which  represents  640,000  active  members  and  has  more  than  800 
local  unions.  I’m  pleased  to  welcome  him  back  before  the  Com-
mittee. 

Mr. Gettelfinger, welcome. 
Mr. John Bozzella is Vice President for External Affairs and Pub-
lic  Policy  at  Chrysler  Corporation.  I  look  forward  to  his  testimony. 
And  I  know  that  Ford  Corporation  has  been  vocal  in  expressing 
concerns  about  the  Korean  trade  deal,  and  I’m  interested  in  hear-
ing Chrysler’s views today. 

Charles McMillion has testified before this Committee before. We 
welcome  him  back.  He’s  President  of  MBG  Information  Services,  a 
business  information  analysis  and  forecasting  firm  based  in  Wash-
ington,  D.C.  Mr.  McMillion  is  the  former  Associate  Director  of  the 
Johns Hopkins University Policy Institute and has held Staff Direc-
tor and Chief Economist positions in both the U.S. Senate and the 
U.S. House. 

And  finally,  Mr.  Myron  Brilliant,  who  is  the  President  of  the 
U.S.-Korea  Business  Council  and  a  Vice  President  for  the  Asia  Di-
vision of the U.S. Chamber of Commerce. 

I want to thank all of the witnesses for appearing today, and look 

forward to their testimony. 

And, Mr. Cassidy, I will call on you first. 
Let me say that your full statements will be a part of the perma-
nent  record  of  this  Subcommittee,  and  we  would  ask  all  of  you  to 
summarize. 

Mr. Cassidy? 

STATEMENT OF ROBERT B. CASSIDY, DIRECTOR, 

INTERNATIONAL TRADE AND SERVICES, 

KELLEY DRYE WARREN LLP 

Mr. CASSIDY. Thank you, Senator. Thank you for this opportunity 
to speak before the Subcommittee on the imbalances in U.S.-Korea 
automotive trade. 

Let me start by saying that these comments are my own and do 
not  necessarily  reflect  the  views  of  the  firm  that  I  work  with, 
Kelley Drye Warren LLP, or any of its clients. 

Sir, after 15 years of experience in negotiating trade agreements 
with  USTR—and,  I  might  add,  one  of  those  agreements  was  the 
first agreement on automotive trade with Korea, and then the sec-
ond  one  that  you  mentioned  is  the  1999  market  access  agreement 
with  China—I  have  reluctantly  come  to  the  view  that  we  have 
failed  to  address  the  underlying  fundamental  market  distortions 
that skew the benefits toward a few, while leaving behind the rest 
of the economy. 

China’s  agreement  to  enter  the  WTO  is  a  perfect  example.  In 
order  to  join  the  WTO,  China  made  unilateral  concessions  to  re-
duce,  and,  in  some  cases,  eliminate,  barriers  to  the  entry  of  U.S. 
goods  and  services.  While  U.S.  exports  to  China  may  have  grown 
faster  than  to  any  other  country,  it  did  so  only  because  it  grew 
from  a  very  low  number.  In  fact,  we  exported  70  percent  more,  in 
absolute terms, to the EU and 40 percent more to Canada than we 
exported to China, and neither of those countries made any conces-
sions to the United States in that time. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

7 

On  the  import  side,  the  United  States  made  no  concessions  to 
China, yet U.S. imports from China in 2007 were more than triple 
the  pre-accession  levels,  to  $322  billion  in  2007,  almost  matching 
the imports from the entire European Union. In contrast, increases 
in  imports—that’s  the  increases  in  imports  from  Canada,  our  larg-
est trading partner—rose by only $82 billion, and imports from the 
EU  increased  by  $134  billion.  Clearly,  we  did  not  expect  these  re-
sults. 

The  beneficiaries  of  the  agreement  with  China  fall  into  two 
groups:  multinational  companies  that  moved  to  China  and  the  fi-
nancial institutions that financed those investments, financed those 
trade  flows,  and  financed  those  deficits.  Sourcing  by  U.S.  compa-
nies  from  China,  whether  through  direct  investment  or  through  li-
censing arrangements, have allowed companies to cut costs and in-
crease  profits,  as  reflected,  until  recently,  in  increased  corporate 
profits and the surge in the U.S. stock market. 

Conversely,  it  is  doubtful  that  the  U.S.  economy  or  its  workers 
are better off. U.S. manufacturing jobs declined by 2.5 million after 
China  joined  the  WTO  in  2001.  While  services  jobs  increased  dur-
ing  this  time,  with  the  exception  of  the  telecommunications  sector, 
nontradeable jobs accounted for the most significant portion of that 
increase. Wages have been stagnant, and real disposable income for 
three-quarters  of  U.S.  households  has  been  stable  or  declining. 
Only  the  top  quartile  of  families  have  seen  significant  increases  in 
real disposable income. 

I  realize  there  are  many  factors  involved,  but  certainly  my  con-
clusion is, we’re not seeing the expected results from such a major 
trade agreement. 

Let me emphasis that the free trade model does have a valid the-
oretical  basis,  but  the  premise  and  the  promises  are  flawed,  be-
cause trade does not exist in a free market petri dish, where there 
are no barriers to competition. 

Using  China  as  an  example,  once  again,  proponents  of  the  free 
trade model argue that China has a competitive advantage in wage 
rates  that  make  it  ideal  as  a  global  manufacturing  center  that  it 
has become. A closer examination, however, reveals that China has 
adopted  an  export-led  development  strategy,  the  centerpiece  of 
which is an undervalued currency, of about 30 to 40 percent under-
valued  at  the  present  time.  Thus,  China’s  wages,  in  U.S.  dollar 
terms,  are  30  to  40  percent  cheaper  than  they  would  have  been  if 
the  currency  were  allowed  to  freely  float.  Chinese  exports  receive 
a 30 to 40 percent subsidy. Foreign investors receive a 30 to 40 per-
cent  subsidy  to  develop  operations  in  China.  To  add  insult  to  in-
jury,  our  exports  are  taxed  at  an  effective  30  to  40  percent  rate. 
U.S.-Korea  FTA  is  another  perfect  example  of  why  such  agree-
ments  tend  to  fail  to  live  up  to  their  expectations.  First,  Korea,  as 
does  China,  uses  an  undervalued  exchange  rate  to  maintain  its 
competitive  position  in  the  U.S.  market  and  in  third-country  mar-
kets. Six months prior to the initiation of negotiations on the FTA, 
during the pre-negotiation stage, Korea began to appreciate the Ko-
rean won by almost 15 percent, until it reached its peak, just prior 
to  the  conclusion  of  the  negotiations.  Three  months  later,  the  cur-
rency  depreciated,  until  it  is  now,  once  again,  at  the  initial  ex-
change rate. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

8 

Korea’s  exchange-rate  movement  indicate  how  Korea  is  likely  to 
manage  its  exchange  rate  to  achieve  maximum  commercial  advan-
tage, effectively subsidizing its exports and taxing imports through 
its exchange rate. 

Second, after years of observing and negotiating with Korea over 
a  wide  range  of  products  and  services,  I  have  learned  that  Korea 
uses  non-tariff  barriers,  particularly  standards,  as  a  means  of  pro-
viding advantage to its domestic producers. 

Third,  in  the  case  of  automobiles,  Korea  tax  authorities  have 
been  known  to  harass  purchasers  in  Korea  of  foreign  automobiles, 
as  you  mentioned,  through  tax  audits,  and  that’s  an  allegation 
that’s been substantiated by the Europeans and other North Amer-
ican  producers.  This  harassment  has  discouraged  Koreans  from 
purchasing  foreign-made  automobiles,  in  addition  to  other  prod-
ucts. 

Fourth,  Korean  population  is  biased  against  purchasing  foreign- 

made products. 

Simply put, none of these issues are addressed adequately, or, in 
some  cases,  at  all,  in  the  bilateral  FTA.  And  furthermore,  the  dis-
pute  settlement  mechanism  for  automobile  trade  is  deficient.  Al-
though there is a special provision that deals only with automotive 
trade,  it  deals  with  automobiles  under  Harmonized  System  (HS) 
number  8703.  However,  the  bilateral  exchange  of  benefits  in  the 
agreement for this sector relate to automotive trade for the United 
States,  while  granting  greater  access  for  Korean  trucks  in  the 
United States. So, it’s an automobile-for-truck deal. 

But,  by  limiting  retaliation  in  that  special  provision  to  auto-
mobiles,  it  effectively  eliminates  any  incentive  for  Korea  to  give 
special  access,  or  real  access,  to  the  United  States-produced  auto-
mobiles. 

In  conclusion,  until  the  FTAs  and  other  trade  agreements  ad-
dress  the  specific  distortions  to  trade  that  occur  through  currency 
undervaluation  and  practices  that  impede  competition,  the  imbal-
ances  in  automotive  trade  between  the  United  States  and  Korea 
will only increase. 
Thank you, sir. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Cassidy follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROBERT B. CASSIDY, DIRECTOR, INTERNATIONAL TRADE 

AND SERVICES, KELLEY DRYE WARREN LLP 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  this  Subcommittee  on  the  U.S.- 
Korea  Free  Trade  Agreement  (FTA).  In  examining  the  issues  relating  to  the  imbal-
ance in U.S.-Korea automobile trade, I would like to approach that assessment from 
a different perspective, first, by examining why the trade agreements that we have 
negotiated  have  often  failed  to  live  up  to  the  expectations  of  those  of  us  who  nego-
tiated  those  agreements;  second,  how  those  negotiating  failures  relate  to  the  U.S.- 
South  Korea  FTA  and  its  impact  on  the  imbalance  in  U.S.-Korea  automobile  trade. 
Let  me  emphasize  at  the  beginning  that  these  comments  are  my  own  and  do  not 
necessarily reflect the views of Kelley Drye Warren LLP or its clients. 

By  way  of  background,  most  of  my  30-year  career  of  service  for  the  U.S.  Govern-
ment has been directly involved with U.S. international trade and finance. My most 
recent experience involved 15 years with the Office of the U.S. Trade Representative 
(USTR),  under  both  Republican  and  Democratic  administrations,  negotiating  sec-
toral  agreements  on  steel,  shipbuilding,  transportation  vehicles,  and  intellectual 
property rights, as well as bilateral agreements with the EU, South Korea, Taiwan, 
Thailand, and the Philippines, and also plurilateral agreements mostly among Asian 
countries.  My  most  recent  experience  was  as  chief  negotiator  for  the  U.S.-China 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

9 

Market  Access  Agreement  of  1999  which  was  the  basis  for  China’s  later  accession 
to the World Trade Organization (WTO). I mention this experience only because my 
views derive not from exhaustive academic research, which of course is valuable, but 
from years of negotiating—in the trenches, so to speak—on behalf of perceived U.S. 
economic interests. 

Since  retiring  from  government  service,  I  have  had  some  time  to  reflect  on  the 
negotiating  accomplishments  of  the  past  and  have  concluded  that  the  agreements 
that we negotiated did not live up to our expectations. We failed to address the un-
derlying  fundamental  market  distortions  that  skew  the  benefits  toward  the  few 
while leaving behind the rest of the U.S. economy. As George Soros, in a Bloomberg 
News  interview  on  the  financial  crisis,  recently  said,  ‘‘. . .  the  system,  as  it  cur-
rently  operates,  is  built  on  false  premises.’’  The  premise  on  which  our  trade  agree-
ments are negotiated is at best flawed, if not broken. 
Failed Expectations 

China’s  agreement  to  enter  the  WTO  is  a  perfect  example  of  failed  expectations. 
In order to join the WTO, China made unilateral concessions to reduce and, in some 
cases, eliminate barriers to entry for U.S. goods and services. While no one claimed 
that  the  bilateral  deficit  would  be  reduced,  claims  were  made  that  U.S.  exports  of 
goods to China would increase, thus creating jobs in the higher-paying export sector. 
U.S. exports to China have increased and, as USTR often emphasizes, at a higher 
rate  than  to  any  other  country.  But  such  claims  distort  the  real  truth  that  exports 
grew faster because they grew from a very low level. In absolute terms, the increase 
in U.S. exports of goods to the EU was almost 70 percent greater than the increase 
in  exports  of  goods  to  China,  and  the  increase  in  U.S.  exports  to  Canada  was  40 
percent more than to China. Neither of those trading partners made any trade con-
cessions to the United States during this period. 

Conversely,  on  the  U.S.  import  side,  the  United  States  made  no  concessions  to 
China, yet U.S. imports from China in 2007 were more than triple the pre-accession 
levels,  to  $321  billion  in  2007,  almost  matching  imports  from  the  entire  European 
Union.  In  contrast,  increases  in  imports  from  Canada,  our  largest  trading  partner, 
rose by $82 billion, and imports from the EU increased by $134 billion. 
Who Benefits? 

The beneficiaries of the agreement with China fall into two groups: multinational 
companies  that  moved  to  China,  and  the  financial  institutions  that  financed  those 
investments, trade flows, and deficits. Foreign direct investment (FDI) in China ac-
celerated at a time when such investment to other parts of Asia was declining and, 
in  2001,  even  matched  FDI  to  the  United  States.  Sourcing  by  U.S.  companies  from 
China,  whether  from  direct  investment  or  through  licensing  arrangements,  has  al-
lowed companies to cut costs and increase profits, as reflected, until recently, in in-
creased corporate profits and the surge in the U.S. stock market. 

Conversely, it is doubtful that the U.S. economy or its workers are better off. U.S. 
manufacturing  jobs  declined  by  more  than  2.5  million  after  China  joined  the  WTO 
in December 2001. While services jobs increased during this period, with the excep-
tion of telecommunications, non-tradable jobs accounted for the most significant por-
tion  of  that  increase.  Wages  have  been  stagnant,  and  real  disposable  income  for 
three-quarters of U.S. households has been stable or declining. Only the top quartile 
of families has seen significant increases in real disposable income. 

The  beneficiaries  of  these  trade  agreements  try  to  divert  attention  from  these 
facts by arguing that our trade in services has increased or that our competitiveness 
has  declined.  Those  arguments,  however,  don’t  explain  why  our  exports  of  goods  to 
countries that made no concessions increased more than our exports to China, which 
made  significant  tariff  and  non-tariff  concessions.  Such  arguments  also  fail  to  ex-
plain  why  our  imports  of  goods  from  China  increased  more  than  our  imports  from 
other  major  trading  partners.  Is  there  any  wonder  that  the  people  on  Main  Street 
think that trade agreements do not work? 
Broken Premises 

Were this simply a problem with our bilateral trade relationship with China, pol-
icymakers  could  focus  on  resolving  that  dysfunctional  relationship.  However,  the 
problem  extends  to  nearly  all  trade  agreements  since  they  are  based  on  the  flawed 
premise  that  free  trade  benefits  the  economy.  Let  me  be  clear,  the  ‘‘free  trade’’ 
model has a valid theoretical basis. But the premise is flawed and broken since free 
trade  does  not  exist  in  a  ‘‘free  market’’  Petri  dish  where  there  are  no  barriers  to 
competition. 

Using China as an example once again, proponents of the free trade model argue 
that  China  has  a  competitive  advantage  in  wage  rates  that  makes  it  ideal  as  the 
global manufacturing center that it has become. A closer examination, however, re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

10 

veals  that  China  has  adopted  an  export-led  development  strategy,  the  centerpiece 
of  which  is  a  currency  that  is  undervalued  by  20–80  percent,  with  the  consensus 
leaning  toward  30–40  percent  at  the  present  time.  Using  this  consensus  estimate, 
China’s  wages,  in  U.S.  dollar  terms,  are  30–40  percent  cheaper  than  they  would 
have been if the currency were allowed to freely float. Chinese exports receive a 30– 
40  percent  subsidy.  Similarly,  foreign  investors  receive  a  30–40  percent  subsidy  to 
develop  operations  in  China.  To  add  insult  to  injury,  our  exports  are  taxed  at  an 
additional effective 30–40 percent rate. 

While  China  has  allowed  its  currency  to  appreciate  somewhat  nominally  against 
the  U.S.  dollar  since  July  2005,  China  has  a  long  way  to  go  to  bring  it  to  equi-
librium  levels.  In  addition,  China’s  internal  barriers  to  trade  not  only  restrict  U.S. 
exports,  but  also  restrict  China’s  market  for  Chinese  domestic  producers,  thus  re-
ducing the size of the domestic economy. It is not surprising that, until the last few 
months,  our  imports  from  China  continued  to  accelerate,  jobs  continued  to  move 
overseas, and our exports to China consisted primarily of raw materials. The weak-
ened  U.S.  dollar  has  only  recently  had  a  positive  impact  on  U.S.  exports.  Europe, 
Canada,  and  other  countries  with  freely  floating  exchange  rates  face  comparable 
trends in their trade relationships with China. 
Implications for the U.S.-Korea Free Trade Agreement 

The  implications  for  FTAs  are  obvious.  While  FTAs  with  small  economies  have 
relatively small impact on the U.S. economy, the same cannot be said for FTAs with 
the larger economies such as Canada, Mexico, and now Korea. Our FTAs are based 
on  the  premise  that  free  trade  benefits  all  economies,  at  all  times,  and  in  all  cir-
cumstances. The argument is similar to Adam Smith’s premise that perfect competi-
tion  results  in  the  most  efficient  allocation  of  resources.  Unfortunately,  free  trade, 
like perfect competition, rarely if ever exists but that premise nevertheless remains 
the  theoretical  and  philosophical  underpinning  of  FTAs.  Furthermore,  anyone  who 
argues  against  free  trade  and  especially  those  who  vote  against  Free  Trade  Agree-
ments are castigated as know-nothings or, worse yet, as ‘‘protectionists.’’ 

Advocates  of  FTAs  argue  that  these  model  agreements  level  the  playing  field  so 
that  U.S.  companies,  and  U.S.  workers,  can  compete  in  markets  free  of  distortions. 
The  U.S.-Korea  FTA  is  a  perfect  example  of  why  such  agreements  fail  to  live  up 
to  their  expectations.  First,  Korea,  as  does  China,  uses  an  undervalued  exchange 
rate  to  maintain  its  competitive  position  in  the  U.S.  market  and  in  third  country 
markets.  Six  months  prior  to  the  initiation  of  negotiations  on  an  FTA,  during  the 
pre-negotiations stage, Korea began to appreciate the Korean won by almost 15 per-
cent  until  it  reached  its  peak  just  prior  to  the  conclusion  of  the  negotiations.  Three 
months  later,  the  currency  depreciated  until  it  was  once  again  at  the  initial  ex-
change  rate.  Even  to  the  unpracticed  eye,  Korea’s  exchange  rate  movements  have 
been  convenient  in  the  extreme  and  indicate  how  Korea  is  likely  to  manage  its  ex-
change  rate  to  achieve  maximum  commercial  advantage.  Whether  intended  as  a 
means  to  gain  an  unfair  competitive  advantage  or  not,  Korea’s  undervalued  ex-
change  rate  subsidizes  its  exports,  subsidizes  foreign  direct  investment,  and  taxes 
foreign imports into Korea. 

Second, after years of observing and negotiating with Korea over a wide range of 
products  and  services,  I  have  learned  that  Korea  uses  non-tariff  barriers,  particu-
larly  standards,  as  a  means  of  providing  an  advantage  to  its  domestic  producers. 
Because the Korean market is relatively small, foreign suppliers are at a disadvan-
tage.  As  a  share  of  their  sales,  the  Korean  market  is  not  large  enough  to  justify 
meeting those extraordinary standards requirements and, when standards are met, 
the cost per unit is high. When taxes are added to the product, those taxes are ap-
plied to the full cost of the product, thus increasing the absolute price disparity be-
tween products. U.S. companies, and thus their workers, must absorb much of those 
increases through lower profit margins and stagnant wages. 

Third, in the case of automobiles, Korean tax authorities have been known to har-
ass purchasers in Korea of foreign automobiles, a practice which has been substan-
tiated  by  European  and  North  American  producers.  This  harassment  has  discour-
aged  Koreans  from  purchasing  foreign-made  automobiles  in  addition  to  other  prod-
ucts.  The  impact  on  automotive  trade  is  more  extreme  because  of  the  visibility  of 
those products. 

Fourth,  the  Korean  population  has  a  bias  against  purchasing  foreign-made  prod-
ucts.  While  this  is  probably  true  in  many  countries,  the  impact  on  some  products, 
particularly automobiles, is much larger than one would expect. 

This  list  is  incomplete  and,  to  be  fair,  Korea  could  likely  draw  a  list  of  obstacles 
to trade in the United States, such as inconsistent state regulations governing many 
services.  But  because  the  U.S.  markets  are  so  much  larger,  Korean  suppliers  can 
adjust  to  meet  those  increased  costs  and  can  do  so  profitably.  With  the  exception 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

11 

of exchange-rate manipulation, it is difficult to assess the adverse economic impacts 
of  many  of  these  measures  unless  they  are  evaluated  on  a  product-specific  basis. 
Nevertheless, cumulatively these barriers, if allowed to exist in a bilateral FTA, can 
have significant effects on whether the benefits of an FTA are realized. 
Whither the Future of the U.S.-Korea FTA 

The dilemma facing Congress is whether the deficiencies of the agreement are se-
rious enough to warrant disapproval and renegotiation. For the record, I support the 
negotiation of bilateral Free Trade Agreements, especially those that push the enve-
lope  for  more  open,  transparent  and  global  markets.  But  I  am  concerned  that  this 
agreement with such a large and important bilateral trading partner will set a dan-
gerous precedent because it does not address in any meaningful ways the distortions 
to  trade  that  result  from  currency  depreciation  and  non-tariff  barriers  such  as 
standards.  Equally  important,  the  agreement  as  negotiated  incorporates  seemingly 
product specific provisions for automobile trade that really do nothing to address the 
longstanding dispute the United States has had with South Korea in this sector. 

The  dispute  settlement  mechanism  for  automobile  trade  is  deficient  on  a  number 
of  levels.  First,  the  provision  deals  only  with  trade  in  automobiles  (HS  8703).  The 
bilateral  exchange  of  benefits  in  the  agreement  for  this  sector  relate  to  automotive 
trade  for  the  United  States  while  granting  greater  access  for  Korean  trucks  in  the 
United  States.  By  limiting  the  retaliation  in  that  special  provision  to  automobiles, 
it effectively eliminates any incentives for Korea to give real access to U.S. produced 
automobiles.  A  more  effective  mechanism  would  provide  for  a  snap-back  in  truck 
tariffs  if  Korea  nullifies  or  impairs  U.S.  access  to  Korea’s  automobile  market  be-
cause  of  exchange  rate  undervaluation,  commercially  restrictive  standards  or 
through other coercive measures such as tax harassment. 

A second, though less serious problem, relates to the term of retaliation. The pro-
vision  requires  that  retaliation  cease  when  the  other  party  eliminates  the  non-con-
forming  measure.  In  my  experience,  Korea  frequently  reaches  agreements  but  does 
not implement those measures at all or does not implement them as expected. Con-
sequently, retaliation should only be reversed once the dispute settlement panel can 
be assured that the non-conforming measure has been eliminated. 
Conclusion 

The decision on whether to approve this agreement in its current form or whether 
to send it back for renegotiation now rests with the Congress. But until these FTAs 
and  other  trade  agreements  address  the  specific  distortions  to  trade  that  occur 
through  currency  undervaluation  and  practices  that  impede  competition,  trade 
agreement rarely will deliver the results that Main Street expects and deserves. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Cassidy,  thank  you  very  much.  We  appre-

ciate your testimony. 

Next,  we  will  hear  from  Mr.  Ron  Gettelfinger,  who  is  the  Presi-

dent of the United Autoworkers. 

Mr. Gettelfinger, thank you for returning to the Committee. 

STATEMENT OF RON GETTELFINGER, PRESIDENT, 

INTERNATIONAL UNION, UNITED AUTOMOBILE, AEROSPACE 

AND AGRICULTURAL IMPLEMENT WORKERS OF AMERICA 

(UAW) 

Mr. GETTELFINGER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
My  name  is  Ron  Gettelfinger,  and  I  am  President  of  the  UAW, 
and  the  UAW  very  much  appreciates  the  opportunity  to  testify  be-
fore your Subcommittee on the subject of the imbalance in U.S.-Ko-
rean automobile trade. 

The  statistics  on  auto  exports  and  imports  in  2007  vividly  dem-
onstrate  how  lopsided  and  unfair  the  auto  trade  situation  is  be-
tween  the  United  States  and  Korea.  In  2007,  Korea  exported,  as 
you  pointed  out,  somewhere  in  the  neighborhood  of  668,000  vehi-
cles  to  the  U.S.,  but  U.S.  producers  were  only  allowed  to  export 
6,500  vehicles  to  Korea.  The  net  result  was  a  $10.3  billion  U.S. 
automotive trade deficit with Korea. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

12 

Historically,  Korea  has  kept  its  market  almost  completely  closed 
to  U.S.-built  automotive  products,  as  well  as  products  from  other 
nations. This has been accomplished through a combination of tar-
iff  and  nontariff  barriers.  At  the  same  time,  the  U.S.  market  has 
been largely open to imports of Korean vehicles and auto parts. As 
a  result,  Korean  imports  have  grown,  and  the  U.S.  auto  trade  def-
icit with Korea has risen dramatically. 

In  1995  and  1998,  the  U.S.  negotiated  the  Memorandum  of  Un-
derstandings  with  Korea  that  were  intended  to  eliminate  Korea’s 
barriers  to  competitive  automotive  imports.  Despite  these  agree-
ments,  Korea  continued  to  maintain  a  variety  of  nontariff  barriers 
that  kept  its  market  closed  to  U.S.-built  automotive  products.  As 
a  result,  the  U.S.  automotive  trade  deficit  with  Korea  soared  from 
$1.3 billion in 1994 to the $10.3 billion in 2007. 

Unfortunately,  the  auto  provisions  in  the  proposed  U.S.-Korea 
Free  Trade  Agreement  negotiated  by  the  Bush  administration  are 
deeply  flawed  and  would  exacerbate  the  imbalance  in  auto  trade 
between  the  U.S.  and  Korea.  They  would  immediately  eliminate 
the  2.5  percent  U.S.  tariff  on  the  vast  majority  of  auto  and  auto 
imports  from  Korea.  In  addition,  they  would  phase-out  our  25  per-
cent tariff on imports of pickup trucks. These provisions would trig-
ger a surge in automotive imports from Korea. 

But,  this  trade  deal  would  allow  Korea  to  maintain  a  series  of 
nontariff barriers that have effectively kept its market closed to im-
ports of U.S.-built vehicles and parts. 

The United States would not have any effective remedies to chal-
lenge  a  continuation  of  these  Korean  trade  barriers.  As  a  result, 
KORUS FTA would inevitably lead to an increase in the enormous 
unfair  automotive  imbalance  between  the  U.S.  and  Korea.  This 
would threaten the jobs of tens of thousands of American workers, 
exacerbating the already serious difficulties facing the U.S. auto in-
dustry and its workers and retirees. 

For  these  reasons,  the  UAW  strongly  opposes  the  Korean  FTA. 
The UAW’s analysis of the impact of the KORUS FTA is supported 
by the International Trade Commission and statements by the Ko-
rean  government.  In  September  of  2007,  the  ITC  released  a  report 
which  concluded  that  this  trade  deal  would  increase  the  annual 
U.S.  trade  deficit  with  Korea  by  $1–$1.3  billion.  It  found  that  the 
KORUS  FTA  would  trigger  a  surge  in  automotive  imports  from 
Korea  with  little  offsetting  increase  in  U.S.  auto  exports.  In  addi-
tion,  shortly  after  the  proposed  trade  agreement  was  announced, 
the  Korean  government  stated  that  it  expected  the  trade  deal  to 
boost  Korea’s  auto  trade  surplus  by  roughly  $1  billion  annually. 
The chief negotiator for Korea also stated that Korean manufactur-
ers  would  probably  be  shipping  pickups  to  the  United  States  in  5 
years  to  take  advantage  of  the  phase-out  of  the  25  percent  tariff 
on imported light trucks. 

In  response  to  these  dismal  analyses,  the  Bush  administration 
has  continued  to  extol  the  virtues  of  the  auto  provisions  in  the 
KORUS  FTA.  However,  the  truth  is,  the  KORUS  FTA  does  not 
guarantee that Korea will have to eliminate all of its nontariff bar-
riers.  It  still  allows  Korea  to  continue  an  array  of  taxes  that  dis-
criminate  against  U.S.-built  vehicles  with  larger  engine  sizes.  It 
also allows Korea to continue the practice of arbitrarily placing im-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

13 

ported  vehicles  in  high-risk  insurance  classifications,  and  it  allows 
Korea  to  continue  to  use  safety  emissions  and  other  technical 
standards  as  a  tool  to  discriminate  against  imported  automotive 
products  instead  of  having  to  accept  U.S.  or  international  stand-
ards.  Most  importantly,  there  is  absolutely  nothing  in  this  trade 
deal  to  prevent  Korea,  as  it  has  in  the  past,  from  coming  up  with 
new nontariff barriers to keep its market closed to U.S.-built auto-
motive products. 

The Bush Administration also has touted the dispute resolutions 
provision  in  the  KORUS  FTA  as  containing  an  innovative  process 
for settling disputes on auto-related measures. However, these pro-
visions cannot provide any effective relief. The automotive working 
group has no enforcement powers to address any nontariff barriers. 
Furthermore,  it  would  be  extremely  difficult  for  the  United  States 
to prevail in any case under this new dispute resolution procedure. 
And, even if an arbitration panel were to rule in favor of the U.S., 
the  only  relief  that  is  provided  is  that  the  U.S.  would  be  allowed 
to  reinstate  our  former  2.5  percent  tariff  on  autos.  However,  this 
snap-back  provision  does  not  apply  to  the  25  percent  pickup  truck 
tariff;  thus,  the  remedy  provided  by  the  tariff  snap-back  is  largely 
toothless,  since  it  does  not  apply  to  the  most  important  U.S.  tariff 
concessions. 

In conclusion, the UAW appreciates the opportunity to testify be-
fore  this  Subcommittee  on  the  imbalance  in  the  U.S.-Korea  auto-
mobile  trade.  UAW  calls  on  Congress  to  reject  the  KORUS  FTA 
until  its  auto  provisions  are  renegotiated  and  replaced  with  meas-
ures  that  will  require  Korea  to  dismantle  its  nontariff  barriers  to 
U.S.-built  automotive  products  before  it  is  granted  any  additional 
access to our market. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Gettelfinger follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RON GETTELFINGER,  PRESIDENT,  INTERNATIONAL UNION, 
UNITED AUTOMOBILE,  AEROSPACE AND AGRICULTURAL IMPLEMENT WORKERS OF 
AMERICA (UAW) 
Mr. Chairman. My name is Ron Gettelfinger. I am President of the International 
Union, United Automobile, Aerospace and Agricultural Implement Workers of Amer-
ica  (UAW).  The  UAW  represents  one  million  active  and  retired  members,  many  of 
whom  work  or  receive  retirement  benefits  from  auto  manufacturers  and  parts  sup-
pliers throughout the United States. We appreciate the opportunity to testify before 
this  Subcommittee  on  the  subject  of  the  imbalance  in  U.S.-Korea  automobile  trade. 
Korea  is  the  fifth  largest  producer  and  fourth  largest  exporter  of  motor  vehicles 
in the world. In 2007, Korea produced 4.1 million motor vehicles. The top three Ko-
rean  producers  were  Hyundai,  GM-Daewoo,  and  Kia.  Korea  exported  2.8  million 
motor vehicles to the rest of the world. 

In  2007,  imports  of  Korean  automotive  products  into  the  U.S.  were  valued  at 
$11.3 billion, while U.S. exports of similar products to Korea amounted to just $1.0 
billion. The net result was a $10.3 billion U.S. automotive trade deficit with Korea. 
Primarily due to the decline in the value of the U.S. dollar, our overall trade def-
icit  with  Korea  decreased  18  percent  (to  $5.97  billion)  though  the  first  6  months  of 
2008.  However,  over  the  same  period,  the  U.S.  deficit  with  Korea  in  automotive 
products  increased  2.4  percent  (to  $5.86  billion).  Thus,  the  deficit  in  automotive 
products now accounts for 98 percent of our overall trade deficit with Korea. 

The  statistics  on  auto  exports  and  imports  in  2007  vividly  demonstrate  how  lop-
sided  and  unfair  the  auto  trade  situation  is  between  the  United  States  and  Korea. 
In  2007,  Korea  exported  668,000  vehicles  to  the  United  States.  But  U.S.  producers 
were only allowed to export 6,500 vehicles to Korea. 

Historically,  Korea  has  kept  its  market  almost  completely  closed  to  U.S.  built 
automotive  products,  as  well  as  products  from  other  nations.  This  has  been  accom-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

14 

plished through a combination of tariff and non-tariff barriers. Indeed, Korea’s mar-
ket  has  the  lowest  level  of  import  penetration  of  any  major  automotive  producing 
economy in the world. Imported cars made up just 4.3 percent of the overall Korean 
auto market in 2007. A total of only 27,985 cars were imported into Korea from all 
other countries. 

At  the  same  time,  the  U.S.  market  has  been  largely  open  to  imports  of  Korean 
vehicles and auto parts. As a result, Korean imports have grown, and the U.S. auto 
trade deficit with Korea has risen dramatically. 

In 1995 and 1998, the U.S. negotiated Memoranda of Understanding (MOUs) with 
Korea  that  were  intended  to  eliminate  Korea’s  barriers  to  competitive  automotive 
imports.  Despite  these  agreements,  Korea  continued  to  maintain  a  variety  of  non- 
tariff  barriers  that  kept  its  market  closed  to  U.S.  built  automotive  products.  As  a 
result, the U.S. automotive trade deficit with Korea soared from $1.3 billion in 1994 
to  $10.3  billion  in  2007.  The  deficit  grew  particularly  quickly  after  the  1998  MOU, 
during  a  period  of  regular  consultations  with  the  Korean  government  designed  to 
make progress in opening the Korean market. 

Over  the  past  decade,  U.S.  exports  of  automotive  products  to  Korea  increased  by 
just  $330  million,  while  imports  of  Korean  automotive  products  increased  by  $8.7 
billion.  As  previously  indicated,  the  U.S.  deficit  in  automotive  trade  now  accounts 
for  98  percent  of  the  total  bilateral  trade  deficit  with  Korea,  compared  with  less 
than one-third in 1998. 

Unfortunately,  the  auto  provisions  in  the  proposed  U.S.-Korea  Free  Trade  Agree-
ment (KORUS FTA) negotiated by the Bush Administration are deeply flawed, and 
would  exacerbate  the  imbalance  in  auto  trade  between  the  U.S.  and  Korea.  They 
would immediately eliminate the 2.5 percent U.S. tariff on the vast majority of auto 
and  auto  parts  imports  from  Korea.  In  addition,  they  would  phase-out  our  25  per-
cent  tariff  on  imports  of  pickup  trucks.  These  provisions  would  trigger  a  surge  in 
automotive imports from Korea, as it would be relatively easy for Korean manufac-
turers to ramp up production for export to the United States. 

Although  this  trade  deal  would  require  Korea  to  drop  its  tariffs  on  U.S.  auto-
motive products, it would allow Korea to maintain a series of non-tariff barriers that 
have  effectively  kept  its  market  closed  to  imports  of  U.S.-built  vehicles  and  parts. 
The  United  States  would  not  have  any  effective  remedies  to  challenge  a  continu-
ation of these Korean trade barriers. As a result, the KORUS FTA would inevitably 
lead to an increase in the enormous, unfair automotive trade imbalance between the 
U.S.  and  Korea.  This  would  threaten  the  jobs  of  tens  of  thousands  of  American 
workers,  exacerbating  the  already  serious  difficulties  facing  the  U.S.  auto  industry 
and  its  workers  and  retirees.  For  these  reasons,  the  UAW  strongly  opposes  the 
KORUS FTA. 

The  UAW  submits  the  KORUS  FTA  would  move  us  in  precisely  the  wrong  direc-
tion.  Instead  of  providing  guarantees  that  Korea  will  have  to  dismantle  its  auto 
trade  barriers  and  give  U.S.  auto  and  parts  producers  access  to  its  market,  the 
KORUS  FTA  would  make  our  auto  trade  imbalance  with  Korea  even  worse.  This 
is not just the UAW’s perspective. 

In  September  2007,  the  International  Trade  Commission  (ITC)  released  a  report 
on  the  impact  of  the  KORUS  FTA.  Significantly,  the  ITC  concluded  that  this  trade 
deal  would  increase  the  annual  U.S.  auto  trade  deficit  with  Korea  by  $1  billion  to 
$1.3 billion. It found that the KORUS FTA would trigger a surge in automotive im-
ports from Korea, with little offsetting increase in U.S. auto exports. 

For  a  number  of  reasons,  the  UAW  believes  the  ITC  report  actually  underesti-
mates the negative economic impact of the KORUS FTA on the U.S. automotive in-
dustry.  First,  the  ITC’s  analysis  did  not  adequately  take  into  account  the  tremen-
dous  negative  impact  of  the  phase-out  of  the  25  percent  U.S.  light  truck  tariff.  The 
Bush Administration has tried to minimize this impact by arguing that Korean com-
panies  will  be  increasing  production  of  pickups  at  their  facilities  in  the  United 
States.  But  it  is  precisely  the  existence  of  the  25  percent  U.S.  pickup  truck  tariff 
that  has  provided  the  incentive  for  Korean  producers  to  locate  production  in  the 
U.S. and employ American workers. After the announcement that the KORUS FTA 
would phase-out this tariff, the Korean companies have already indicated that they 
are  examining  plans  to  export  pickup  trucks  to  the  U.S.  to  take  advantage  of  this 
tariff  phase-out.  This  past  May,  Hyundai  announced  that  it  was  canceling  plans  to 
build  a  pickup  for  both  the  Hyundai  and  Kia  brands  at  its  West  Point,  Georgia 
plant.  In  addition,  other  Asian  companies  are  likely  to  use  Korea  as  a  platform  to 
export  pickups  to  the  U.S.  Because  of  these  factors,  in  future  years  the  U.S.  auto 
trade deficit with Korea would balloon even further. 

Second, the ITC report asserts that the surge in auto imports from Korea will be 
partially  offset  by  the  ‘‘diversion  from  other  import  sources.’’  However,  the  report 
did  not  provide  sufficient  evidence  to  support  this  assertion.  The  UAW  believes  it 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

15 

is  extremely  unlikely  that  non-Korean  producers—such  as  Toyota,  Nissan  and 
Honda—would  passively  accept  such  a  large  reduction  in  their  exports  to  the  U.S. 
Indeed,  the  history  of  NAFTA’s  implementation  suggests  otherwise.  The  drastic  in-
crease  in  automotive  imports  from  Mexico  after  1995  did  not  displace  Japanese  or 
European imports of similar products. 

Third, the ITC report did not take into account the adverse impact of Korea’s non- 
tariff barriers on auto trade with the United States. This is because the ITC’s meth-
od of analysis, a computable general equilibrium (CGE) simulation model, is unable 
to  quantify  the  impact  of  non-tariff  barriers  on  automotive  trade  and  investment 
flows.  But,  it  is  the  Korean  government’s  effective  and  continuous  use  of  non-tariff 
barriers that has kept its market closed to U.S. built automotive products. 

The  conclusion  by  the  ITC  that  the  KORUS  FTA  would  increase  the  U.S.  auto 
trade  deficit  with  Korea  is  buttressed  by  statements  from  the  Korean  government. 
Shortly after the proposed trade agreement was announced, the Korean government 
stated that it expected the trade deal to boost Korea’s auto trade surplus by roughly 
$1  billion  annually.  It  expected  Korean  exports  of  finished  cars  and  auto  parts  to 
increase  substantially,  whereas  there  would  only  be  a  minimal  rise  in  imports  of 
U.S. built automotive products. In addition, the chief negotiator for Korea, Kim Jong 
Hoon, stated that Korean manufacturers would probably be shipping pickups to the 
United States in 5 years to take advantage of the phase-out of the 25 percent tariff 
on  imported  light  trucks.  This  would  further  exacerbate  our  auto  trade  deficit  with 
Korea. 

In  response  to  these  dismal  analyses,  the  Bush  Administration  has  continued  to 
extol  the  virtues  of  the  auto  provisions  in  the  KORUS  FTA.  It  has  repeatedly 
claimed  that  this  trade  deal  makes  great  strides  in  eliminating  the  non-tariff  bar-
riers  that  have  historically  kept  the  Korea  market  closed  to  U.S.  built  automotive 
products. 

However,  the  truth  is  the  KORUS  FTA  does  not  guarantee  that  Korea  will  have 
to  eliminate  all  of  its  non-tariff  barriers.  Indeed,  it  still  allows  Korea  to  continue 
an  array  of  taxes  that  discriminate  against  U.S.  built  vehicles  with  larger  engine 
sizes.  It  also  allows  Korea  to  continue  the  practice  of  arbitrarily  placing  imported 
vehicles  in  ‘‘high-risk’’  insurance  classifications.  And  it  allows  Korea  to  continue  to 
use safety, emission and other technical standards as a tool to discriminate against 
imported  automotive  products,  instead  of  having  to  accept  U.S.  or  international 
standards.  Most  importantly,  there  is  absolutely  nothing  in  this  trade  deal  to  pre-
vent  Korea,  as  it  has  in  the  past,  from  developing  new  non-tariff  barriers  to  keep 
its market closed to U.S. built automotive products. 

The Bush Administration also has touted the dispute resolution provisions in the 
KORUS  FTA  as  containing  ‘‘an  innovative  process  for  settling  disputes  on  auto-re-
lated  measures.’’  For  several  reasons,  however,  these  provisions  cannot  be  expected 
to  provide  any  effective  relief.  The  Automotive  Working  Group,  which  would  be  es-
tablished  under  the  KORUS  FTA,  has  no  enforcement  powers  to  address  any  non- 
tariff barriers. 

Furthermore,  it  would  be  extremely  difficult  for  the  United  States  to  prevail  in 
any case under this new dispute resolution procedure. It would not be sufficient for 
the U.S. to show the existence of non-tariff barriers that are still keeping our auto-
motive  products  out  of  the  Korean  market.  Instead,  we  would  have  to  prove  ‘‘non- 
conformity’’  with  Korea’s  obligations  under  the  trade  agreement,  which  is  unlikely 
given  its  vague  and  weak  provisions.  The  U.S.  would  also  be  required  to  dem-
onstrate that our automotive producers have suffered ‘‘injury’’ as a result of Korea’s 
non-tariff  barriers.  This  would  be  a  difficult  hurdle  to  overcome  because  Korea  can 
always  allege  that  other  factors  are  keeping  down  sales  of  U.S.  built  automotive 
products. 

Most  importantly,  even  if  an  arbitration  panel  were  to  rule  in  favor  of  the  U.S. 
under  this  dispute  resolution  procedure,  the  only  relief  that  is  provided  is  that  the 
U.S.  would  be  allowed  to  reinstate  (i.e.,  ‘‘snap  back’’)  our  former  2.5  percent  tariff 
on  autos  and  auto  parts.  However,  this  snap  back  provision  does  not  apply  to  the 
25  percent  pickup  truck  tariff.  Thus,  the  remedy  provided  by  the  tariff  ‘‘snap  back’’ 
is largely toothless, since it does not apply to the most important U.S. tariff conces-
sion. 

The  UAW  wishes  to  underscore  that  we  are  not  opposed  to  any  trade  agreement 
with Korea. In March 2007, a bipartisan group of Members of Congress sent a pro-
posal to the Bush Administration for addressing the automotive trade imbalance be-
tween  the  U.S.  and  Korea.  This  proposal  provided  incentives  for  Korea  to  open  its 
market  to  U.S.  built  automotive  products  before  it  granted  additional  access  to  the 
U.S.  market.  This  proposal  also  contained  a  mechanism  for  dismantling  Korea’s 
non-tariff  barriers,  and  protections  against  a  surge  in  imports  from  Korea.  Signifi-
cantly,  it  stipulated  that  the  U.S.  tariff  on  imported  pickup  trucks  should  be  left 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

16 

for resolution through multilateral WTO negotiations, in order to address the likeli-
hood that any tariff reduction for one country would lead to a shift in pickup produc-
tion from Japan and Thailand. 

The UAW publicly endorsed this bipartisan proposal. We believe it could serve as 
the basis for a fair trade agreement between the United States and Korea. Unfortu-
nately,  the  Bush  Administration  totally  ignored  this  proposal,  and  instead  nego-
tiated a one-sided trade deal that would give Korea further access to our automotive 
market, without first receiving any guarantees that the U.S. will get greater access 
to  the  Korea  market.  This  represents  a  huge  step  backward,  and  will  only  serve  to 
exacerbate our huge and growing auto trade deficit with Korea. 

In  conclusion,  the  UAW  appreciates  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  this  Sub-
committee  on  the  imbalance  in  U.S.-Korea  automobile  trade.  For  many  years  auto 
trade between the U.S. and Korea has been totally one-sided. Korea has used a vari-
ety  of  tariff  and  non-tariff  barriers  to  keep  its  market  closed  to  U.S.  built  auto-
motive  products,  while  steadily  expanding  automotive  exports  to  the  U.S.  Unfortu-
nately, the KORUS FTA would make this bad situation even worse. It would trigger 
a  surge  of  Korea  automotive  imports  into  the  U.S.,  without  getting  any  guarantees 
that  Korea  will  dismantle  its  non-tariff  barriers  and  give  U.S.  auto  and  auto  parts 
companies greater access to its market. For this reason, the UAW calls on Congress 
to reject the KORUS FTA until these auto provisions are renegotiated and replaced 
with  measures  that  will  require  Korea  to  dismantle  its  non-tariff  barriers  to  U.S. 
built  automotive  products,  before  it  is  granted  any  additional  access  to  our  market. 
Thank you. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Gettelfinger, thank you very much for your 

testimony and for being here. 

Next, we will hear from Mr. John Bozzella, who is the Vice Presi-

dent of External Affairs and Public Policy for Chrysler. 

Mr. Bozzella, welcome. And I have read your statement. Your en-
tire  statement  will  be  part  of  the  record,  and  you  may  summarize. 
You may proceed. Thank you. 

STATEMENT OF JOHN T. BOZZELLA, VICE PRESIDENT, 
EXTERNAL AFFAIRS AND PUBLIC POLICY (AMERICAS), 

CHRYSLER LLC 

Mr.  BOZZELLA.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  It’s  nice  to  be  with 

you. 

My  name  is  John  Bozzella.  I  am  Vice  President  for  External  Af-
fairs and Public Policy for Chrysler LLC. Thank you for the oppor-
tunity  to  provide  Chrysler’s  views  on  the  imbalance  in  U.S.-Korea 
automotive trade. 

Chrysler  sells  and  services  vehicles  in  roughly  120  countries 
around  the  world.  Chrysler  alone  exported  over  400,000  vehicles 
from  the  United  States  last  year,  or  about  25  percent  of  our  total 
U.S.-based production. Chrysler believes that the U.S. continues to 
have  the  best  workforce  and  most  innovative  environment  for  cre-
ating  globally  successful  products  which  are  desired  across  the 
globe. 

Because  of  our  history  and  our  philosophy,  Chrysler  has  sup-
ported  every  free  trade  agreement  ever  negotiated  by  the  U.S.  We 
didn’t  do  it  blindly.  We  did  it  carefully,  after  reviewing  the  merits 
of each and every agreement. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Bozzella, would you pull the microphone a 

little closer. 

Mr. BOZZELLA. I’m sorry, Mr. Chairman. Is that better? 
Unlike  our  American  counterparts  at  GM  and  Ford,  we  do  not 
have  extensive  production  outside  of  North  America.  As  a  result, 
exports  from  North  America  remain  a  critical  component  of  our 
business. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

17 

Now  I’d  like  to  turn  to  the  subject  of  today’s  hearing,  the  imbal-
ance  in  U.S.-Korea  auto  trade.  We  will  highlight  the  causes  of  the 
imbalance  and  explain  why  we  simply  cannot  support  the  U.S.- 
Korea Free Trade Agreement, in its current form. 

This is a difficult position for us, and one we do not take lightly. 
But,  we  do  believe  this  agreement  is  flawed,  and  it’s  an  example 
of  the  twisting  of  the  principles  of  free  trade  in  a  way  that  harms 
the interests of the U.S. economy and its workers. 

There  is  probably  no  greater  example  of  the  huge  and  damaging 
one-sided trade than the flow of automotive trade between the U.S. 
and  Korea.  The  U.S.  auto  industry  simply  cannot  afford  to  lock  in 
one-sided  trade  deals.  In  short,  we  believe  that  this  FTA  rewards 
Korea’s  poor  behavior  for  failing  to  honor  two  prior  automotive 
trade agreements with the U.S.; it narrows, but does not eliminate, 
discrimination  against  U.S.  importers;  and  it  eliminates  the  little 
U.S. leverage left to address Korean nontariff barriers. 

The  hostility  to  imported  autos  is  not  directed  just  to  the  U.S., 
I might add, and its manufacturers; in fact, total imports consisted 
of  only  4  percent  of  the  Korean  market.  South  Korea  is  recognized 
throughout the global automotive industry has having the most re-
strictive  import  market.  Korea  ranks  30th  out  of  30  among  the 
OECD countries, in terms of import market access. 

While  limiting  imports  to  4  percent  of  their  home  market,  Ko-
rean  automotive  manufacturers  exported  70  percent  of  their  pro-
duction  in  2007.  Over  16  percent  of  their  production  was  exported 
to the United States alone. 

Because of its history of trade restrictions and discrimination, 80 
percent  of  the  $13-billion  U.S.  trade  deficit  with  Korea  is  autos. 
That  fact  tells  us  that  the  first  thing  the  U.S.  should  have  nego-
tiated  with  Korea  in  any  agreement  that  confers  on  them  the  spe-
cial  status  of  a  free  trade  partner  is  an  acknowledgment  that  con-
fronts  this  directly  and  ensures  that  this  unacceptable  one-sided 
trade in our largest trade product is decisively reversed. 

Our  U.S.—our  work  with  USTR  and  Korea  did  not  begin  with 
the  U.S.-Korea  Free  Trade  Agreement.  In—two  previous  agree-
ments  have  been  referenced  already;  I  won’t  spend  too  much  time 
talking  about  them  now.  But,  it’s  safe  to  say  that  this  is  round 
three,  and  we  remain  skeptical,  based  on  what  this  agreement 
looks like, that we will make major progress. 

My  written  testimony  highlights  several  examples  of  barriers  to 
entry  in  that  market.  I  will  not  revisit  those  in  my  statement,  ex-
cept  to  highlight  one,  which  is  Korea’s  auto  insurance  reform  pro-
posal, which I think is illustrative of the challenges we face. 

In  September  2006,  the  Korea  Insurance  Development  Institute 
released  a  reform  package  for  automobile  insurance  calculations 
that  was  set  to  start  in  April  2007.  The  result  is  that  insurance 
rates increased for most imported vehicles, compared to comparable 
domestic vehicles. Under the reform, for example, a Chrysler 300C 
is about 28 percent more expensive to insure each year than a com-
parable Korean vehicle, even though the prices are similar and the 
driver’s profile is identical. 

Regardless  of  KIDI’s  intentions,  the  result  of  the  reform  is,  con-
sumers  that  buy  imported  vehicles  will  pay  higher  auto  insurance 
rates. As soon as they were made aware of this problem, the import 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

18 

industry  objected,  stating  that  the  rates  should  not  be  higher, 
based  on  whether  a  vehicle  is  imported,  and  insurance  should  be 
allowed  for  all  vehicle  categories.  Based  on  this  pressure  and  that 
of  the  U.S.  Government,  Korea  made  some  marginal  changes  that 
mitigated  the  worst  effect  of  the  insurance  rate  schedule,  but  the 
new  schedule  continues  to  result  in  higher  insurance  rates  for  im-
ports versus domestics. 

Members  of  the  U.S.  auto  industry,  along  with  numerous  Mem-
bers  of  Congress,  worked  closely  with  USTR,  up  to  and  including 
the day of the agreement—the day the agreement was initialed, in 
April  of  2007.  After  reviewing  the  agreement,  we  immediately 
called it unacceptable and not even close to what we and others in 
the industry had told the U.S. officials repeatedly was necessary to 
secure true change in the Korean market. 

It  quickly  became  clear  that  most  of  the  U.S.  industry  and  our 
workers are—as well as many Members of Congress, including our 
congressional  leadership,  believe  that  the  automotive  provisions 
were  inexcusably  weak  and  ineffective,  and  needed  to  be  redrafted 
and expanded in order to obtain sufficient congressional support. 

The response so far? In more than a year since the signing of the 
agreement,  the  Korean  government  has  not  sought  dialogue  with 
our  elected  representatives  or  anyone  in  our  industry  to  address 
these concerns and inadequacies. Interestingly, they didn’t seem to 
have  a  problem  seeking  alterations  to  the  beef  agreement  their 
president just signed. 

For its part, the U.S. Trade Representative has repeatedly made 
clear  that  the  U.S.  has  no  intention  of  asking  the  Koreans  to  sit 
down and improve on the automotive chapter of the FTA. However, 
the USTR has negotiated vigorously on the beef issue, which, iron-
ically,  isn’t  even  part  of  the  FTA.  Autos,  unlike  beef,  are  a  pillar 
industry  in  Korea,  and  require  a  significant  commitment  on  the 
part of the administration for real change to occur. 

The U.S. automotive market is, by far, the largest and most open 
in  the  world.  This  fact  provided  our  agreement—excuse  me—our 
Government  with  substantial  leverage  in  its  negotiations  with 
Korea.  We  clearly  articulated  the  need  for  a  robust  agreement 
which  would  pry  open  a  Korean  automotive  market  that  has  been 
blatantly and pervasively protected for decades. We believe the ad-
ministration has miscalculated the dynamics in Korea. 

We are ready and willing to resume discussions with the Admin-
istration  and  the  Korean  government  on  how  to  improve  the  auto-
motive  provisions  of  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA.  We  appreciate  the  sup-
port  we  have  received  from  both  Senate  and  House  members  re-
garding this issue. 

And,  once  again,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  arranging  this 

hearing and asking for us to testify. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Bozzella follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN T. BOZZELLA, VICE PRESIDENT, 

EXTERNAL AFFAIRS AND PUBLIC POLICY (AMERICAS), CHRYSLER LLC 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  provide  Chrysler  LLC’s  views  on  the  imbalance 
in  U.S.-Korea  automobile  trade.  Chrysler  LLC,  headquartered  in  Auburn  Hills, 
Michigan,  is  an  indirect  wholly  owned  subsidiary  of  Chrysler  Holdings  LLC,  which 
in turn is owned 80.1 percent by Cerberus Capital Management LP and 19.9 percent 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

19 

by  subsidiaries  of  Daimler  AG.  Chrysler  LLC  sells  and  services  vehicles  in  roughly 
120 countries around the world. 
The Importance of Trade to Chrysler 

International  trade  has  become  a  defining  characteristic  of  the  automobile  indus-
try.  Many  people  might  already  know  that  automotive  is  the  largest  import  sector 
after  oil  for  the  United  States  ($231  billion  or  12.5  percent  of  total  imports),  but 
maybe  fewer  recognize  that  it  is  also  our  largest  export  sector  ($111  billion  or  9.5 
percent  in  2007).  Finished  vehicles  and  parts  are  traded  in  massive  volumes  on  a 
daily  basis.  Chrysler  alone  exported  over  400,000  vehicles  from  the  United  States 
last year, or about 25 percent of our total U.S.-based production. The dramatic and 
often painful changes in recent years in the U.S. automotive market are emblematic 
of the immense forces that the global economy have had in our economy. But these 
changes and the recent economic turmoil in the U.S. also reinforces the need to have 
a  global  approach  to  your  business.  Chrysler  believes  that  the  U.S.  continues  to 
have the best workforce and most innovative environment for creating globally suc-
cessfully  products  which  are  desired  across  the  globe.  We  also  believe  in  building 
partnerships  with  other  automakers  to  forge  new  business  opportunities  both  here 
and abroad. 

Because  of  our  history  and  philosophy,  Chrysler  has  supported  each  free  trade 
agreement  negotiated  by  the  U.S.  We  didn’t  do  this  blindly,  rather  we  carefully  re-
viewed  the  merits  of  each  agreement.  The  very  first  ‘‘free  trade  agreement’’  nego-
tiated by the U.S. was the 1965 Auto Pact between the U.S. and Canada, which still 
stands as a model of how free trade can build prosperity and grow jobs in both part-
ner  countries.  Our  industry  was  at  the  forefront  of  many  agreements  such  as  the 
North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA). Our exports have grown exponen-
tially  with  our  free  trade  partners.  Two  recent  trade  agreements  provide  just  a 
quick  example.  Since  the  U.S.-Chile  Free  Trade  Agreement  was  implemented, 
Chrysler’s U.S.-based exports to that country have grown by 365 percent. Similarly, 
Chrysler’s U.S.-based exports to Australia have risen by over 115 percent since that 
FTA has been implemented. 

Chrysler  has  made  a  commitment  to  grow  sales  outside  North  America,  and  has 
been  successful  in  achieving  significant  sales  growth  for  its  international  business. 
Key  factors  that  contribute  to  this  growth  have  been  expanding  the  international 
dealer  network,  and  the  development  of  a  vehicle  portfolio  that  reflects  the  needs 
of  global  customers.  In  order  to  serve  diverse  international  markets,  over  the  last 
5  years  Chrysler  has  nearly  tripled  the  number  of  right-hand-drive  models  (from  6 
to  17),  quadrupled  the  number  of  models  with  diesel  powertrain  options  (from  4  to 
17),  and  developed  several  vehicle  packages  specifically  for  our  customers  outside 
North America. 

Unlike our American counterparts at GM and Ford, we do not have extensive pro-
duction  outside  of  North  America.  As  a  result,  exports  from  North  America  remain 
a  critical  component  of  our  business.  This  is  evidenced  by  the  fact  that  we  remain 
one  of  the  largest  U.S.-based  automotive  exporters.  For  example,  we  exported  over 
40  percent  of  our  production  from  our  Belvidere,  Illinois  assembly  plant  last  year, 
helping  us  maintain  jobs  that  would  otherwise  have  been  lost  due  to  the  weakened 
U.S. market. We have also highlighted our intent to increase collaborative alliances 
with  other  manufacturers  in  the  future,  such  as  our  cross-production  arrangement 
announced  this  year  with  Nissan.  Such  alliances  will  allow  us  to  deliver  customer 
demanded vehicles in an even quicker fashion across the globe. 
The  U.S.-Korea  Auto  Trade  Imbalance—Why  Chrysler  Can’t  Support  the 

U.S.-Korea FTA in its Current Form 

The  points  I  have  highlighted  make  it  clear  that  maintaining  a  system  of  open 
and fairly traded automotive products is vital to maintaining the strength of Chrys-
ler’s  manufacturing  base  in  the  U.S.  and  to  creating  a  business  model  for  the  com-
pany’s future in a global automotive market. Now I would like to turn to the subject 
of  today’s  hearing,  the  imbalance  in  U.S.-Korea  auto  trade.  We  will  highlight  the 
causes  of  the  imbalance  and  explain  why  we  simply  cannot  support  the  U.S.-Korea 
Free  Trade  Agreement  in  its  current  form.  This  is  a  difficult  position  for  us,  one 
that  we  do  not  take  lightly.  We  are  not  promoting  any  form  of  protectionism  nor 
do we believe in erecting any barriers to the growth of more open trade in the global 
economy.  Far  from  it,  we  understand  that  an  open  and  growing  trading  system  is 
the  future  of  our  company  and  of  the  U.S.  economy.  We  do  believe  that  this  agree-
ment  is  flawed,  and  is  an  example  of  twisting  the  principles  of  free  trade  in  a  way 
that harms the interests of the U.S. economy and its workers. We see it as a classic 
example  of  why  so  many  Americans  have  grown  skeptical  of  the  claims  that  such 
free trade agreements bring real benefit to American workers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

20 

We do not believe the agreement as written will lead to a true free flow of goods. 
There  is  probably  no  greater  example  of  huge  and  damaging  one-sided  trade  than 
the  flow  of  automotive  trade  between  the  U.S.  and  Korea.  The  U.S.  auto  industry 
simply  cannot  afford  to  lock  in  one-sided  trade  deals.  In  short,  we  believe  that  this 
FTA: 

1.  Rewards  Korea’s  poor  behavior  for  failing  to  honor  two  prior  auto  trade 
agreements with the U.S. 
2. Narrows, but does not eliminate discrimination against U.S. importers. 
3.  Eliminates  the  little  U.S.  leverage  left  to  address  Korean  non-tariff  barriers. 
4.  Begins  a  process  by  which  we  will  have  to  turn  grievances  over  to  lawyers 
when we should be hiring sales people to sell vehicles (the so-called gold stand-
ard dispute resolution mechanism). 

Chrysler  has  a  long  and  painful  experience  trying  to  operate  normally  in  the 
South Korean market. We first entered the market in 1992. We currently sell more 
imported  vehicles  than  GM  and  Ford  combined  (and  more  than  the  majority  of  for-
eign  brands  as  well),  and  the  4,100  vehicles  we  sold  in  2007  was  a  53  percent  in-
crease  from  the  previous  year.  However,  we  need  to  put  these  numbers  in  perspec-
tive.  We  sold  almost  twice  as  many  vehicles  in  South  Africa,  a  market  which  is 
about half the size of South Korea’s. The hostility to imported autos is not directed 
just  to  U.S.  manufacturers.  In  fact,  total  imports  consisted  of  only  4  percent  of  the 
Korean  market.  More  starkly,  three  local  Hyundai  dealers  in  the  U.S.  sold  more 
cars  through  their  individual  dealerships  in  2007  than  Chrysler,  Ford  or  GM  sold 
in  the  entire  Korean  market  last  year.  In  fact,  two  of  those  dealers  sold  more  than 
Chrysler in the Republic of Korea; nine dealers sold more than Ford; and more than 
400 Hyundai dealers sold more vehicles than GM. 

South  Korea  is  recognized  throughout  the  global  automotive  industry  as  having 
the  most  restrictive  import  market.  Korea  ranks  30th  out  of  30  among  the  OECD 
countries  in  terms  of  import  market  access.  While  the  method  for  protecting  the 
market  has  transitioned  from  a  blatant  ban  on  imports  several  decades  ago,  to  a 
more nuanced but very effective approach of other forms of discrimination, make no 
mistake,  the  Korean  government  has  systematically  thwarted  true  competition  in 
the Korean market. 

The fortress the Koreans created for their domestic manufacturers has created an 
unnatural  export  powerhouse.  While  limiting  imports  to  4  percent  of  their  home 
market,  Korean  automotive  manufacturers  exported  70  percent  of  their  production 
in 2007. No, that is not a misprint. Over 16 percent of their production was exported 
to  the  United  States.  Now,  if  Chrysler  could  export  16  percent  of  our  U.S.  produc-
tion  to  Korea,  we’d  be  sending  over  260,000  units  over  there  instead  of  4,000!  Al-
right,  you  might  say  ‘‘let’s  get  real.’’  Well,  if  the  U.S.  share  of  the  Korean  market 
was  similar  to  the  Korean  share  of  the  U.S.  market  (4.2  percent  as  opposed  to  0.5 
percent),  the  U.S.  would  be  exporting  50,000  vehicles  valued  at  about  $1  billion. 
This  happens  to  be  more  than  the  value  of  the  U.S.  beef  which  was  exported  to 
Korea before they imposed the ban. 

Speaking of beef, there has been great attention paid to the restrictions Korea has 
placed on imports of American beef. I can say that as a representative of a company 
that  has  faced  the  barrage  of  bans,  regulations,  and  unfair  restrictions  on  imports 
of  our  products,  we  understand  the  frustration  of  our  colleagues  in  the  beef  indus-
try. Yet, while the Administration has told the Koreans and the Congress repeatedly 
and  unequivocally  that  this  FTA  cannot  be  approved  until  U.S.  beef  enters  the  Ko-
rean  market,  the  Administration  has  not  taken  such  a  position  when  it  comes  to 
the auto industry, and we have to ask why. 

While we have alluded to the inadequacies of this agreement, let us be a bit more 
specific.  We  would  first  like  to  point  out  that  we  work  with  the  Administration  in 
general  and  the  office  of  the  United  State  Trade  Representative  (USTR)  in  par-
ticular  on  many  trade  issues.  We  have  the  utmost  respect  for  the  bright,  dedicated 
and hardworking individuals at USTR who work tirelessly on many different fronts 
in  trade  negotiations.  In  the  vast  majority  of  cases,  we  believe  the  U.S.  negotiators 
achieve a result in which U.S. national interests are advanced in a proven effective 
way.  However,  we  do  not  believe  this  was  the  case  with  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA.  The 
fact is, more should have been done. 

Let’s  start  with  the  fact  that,  because  of  its  history  of  trade  restrictions  and  dis-
crimination,  80  percent  of  the  $13  billion  U.S.  trade  deficit  with  Korea  is  autos. 
That  fact  tells  us  that  the  first  thing  the  U.S.  should  have  negotiated  with  Korea 
in  any  agreement  that  confers  on  them  the  special  status  of  a  free  trade  ‘partner’ 
is an acknowledgement that confronts this directly, and ensures that this unaccept-
able  one-sided  trade  in  our  largest  traded  product  is  decisively  reversed.  It  seems 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

21 

to us that asking our negotiators to ensure that companies have a realistic and cred-
ible  guarantee  of  true  open  and  fair  market  access  in  Korea  before  granting  Korea 
unconditional free market access here, doesn’t seem, as the lead U.S. negotiator told 
us, to be a ‘‘bridge too far.’’ 

. . . 

Our  work  with  USTR  on  Korea  did  not  begin  with  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA.  In  re-
sponse  to  evidence  of  outrageous  examples  of  Korean  restrictions  and  downright 
harassment to keep U.S. auto imports out of Korea, in 1995 the U.S. negotiated and 
signed  a  Bilateral  Trade  Agreement  (MOU)  with  South  Korea  in  an  attempt  to  ad-
dress non-tariff trade barriers limiting U.S. exports. Within 2 years, it became clear 
that this agreement was a failure. The Koreans signed this agreement but did little 
to  change  their  behavior,  while  simply  exporting  more  and  more  cars  to  the  U.S. 
In a rebuke to the Korean’s behavior, the U.S. negotiated a second automotive trade 
agreement  in  1998.  The  intent  of  both  agreements  was  clear—there  had  to  be  un-
equivocal evidence that all evidence of discrimination and restrictions on imports of 
U.S. autos had stopped and that sales were increasing as evidence of a ‘normal’ ma-
ture market. But while making token changes, the Korean government simply craft-
ed new barriers and certainly did not meet the spirit of the agreement as evidenced 
by the numbers. Fool me once, shame on you, fool me twice 

The history of Korean automotive non-tariff barriers which drive our concern with 
this agreement have been articulated publicly before on several occasions. I assume 
that  the  UAW  will  highlight  some  of  them  today  as  well.  Unlike  tariffs,  non-tariff 
barriers are not easy to address. Korea has used a myriad of such non-tariff barriers 
ranging  from  outright  bans  to  implementing  complex  regulatory  requirements  that 
upon first glance do not appear to be discriminatory but in practice are. 

Today,  I  would  like  to  focus  on  the  actions  Korea  has  taken  since  the  FTA  was 
concluded last April. We would just like to point out that the Koreans have engaged 
in this activity knowing that the FTA is pending Congressional consideration. Given 
that  they  would  engage  in  these  activities  now,  we  wonder  what  awaits  us  should 
the agreement enter into force as signed. 
Non-Tariff Barriers Imposed Since the FTA Was Signed 

The  following  are  examples  of  Korean  actions  since  the  FTA  negotiations  started 

that have disrupted importers’ operations in the Korean auto market. 
Korea’s Auto Insurance Reform Proposal 

In  March  2008,  the  Korea  Insurance  Development  Institute  (KIDI)  released  a  re-
form  package  for  automobile  insurance  calculations  that  was  set  to  start  in  April 
2007.  The  new  methodology  to  determine  the  insurance  rate  was  based  on  vehicle 
model  brand  (Chrysler)  for  imports,  and  vehicle  model  (Sonata)  for  domestics.  The 
result is that the insurance rates increased for most imported vehicles compared to 
comparable  domestic  vehicles.  Prior  to  the  reform,  the  premium  paid  was  deter-
mined  by  each  individuals  (insured)  characteristics,  not  the  model  brand  or  source 
(domestic or import) of the insured vehicle. Under the reform, for example, a Chrys-
ler 300C is about 28 percent more expensive to insure each year than a comparable 
Korean  vehicle  even  through  the  prices  are  similar  and  the  driver’s  profile  is  iden-
tical. 

Regardless of KIDI’s intentions, the result of the reform is customers that buy im-
ported  vehicles  will  pay  higher  auto  insurance  rates.  As  soon  as  they  were  made 
aware of this problem, the import industry objected stating that the rate should not 
be  higher  based  on  whether  a  vehicle  is  imported  or  not,  and  insurance  should  be 
allowed for all vehicle categories. Based on this pressure, and that of the U.S. Gov-
ernment, Korea made some marginal changes that mitigated the worst effect of the 
insurance  rate  schedule,  but  the  new  schedule  continues  to  result  in  higher  insur-
ance rates for imports vs. domestics. 
FTC Korea Government Investigation of Importers 

In early December 2007, the Korean Fair Trade Commission (FTC) arrived unan-
nounced  at  the  Korea  Automobile  Importers  and  Dealers  Association  (KAIDA)  of-
fices to investigate alleged unfair business practices (keep in mind that this is sup-
posedly  the  anti-monopoly  commission  which  is  raiding  an  association  representing 
4  percent  of  the  market).  Some  documents  and  files  (meeting  minutes,  e-mails, 
agendas  and  letters)  were  seized  in  the  raid.  Several  KAIDA  members  companies 
were also investigated/raided. 

The  reported  purpose  of  the  investigation  was  that  KAIDA  importers  were  alleg-
edly  colluding  against  grey  market  (parallel)  auto  importers,  and  price  collusion  in 
the import dealer network. The FTC claimed that it was supporting a law that pro-
tects unauthorized parallel importers in Korea. All major authorized auto importers, 
including  Chrysler,  are  members  of  KAIDA.  The  result  of  the  FTC  investigation  is 
still unknown, but the intimidating message it sent is clear. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

Witness Testing 

22 

In  February  2008,  U.S.  automakers  certifying  vehicles  for  sale  in  Korea  were  in-
formed, by Korea’s governing regulatory agencies, of a significant change to Korea’s 
auto  emissions  testing/certification  process—no  longer  allowing  importers  to  certify 
by  witness  tests  at  the  location  of  the  automaker’s  test  facilities.  The  Korean  gov-
ernment claims that the change was a cost and a corruption reduction effort. 

This change would have adversely affected the ability of U.S. automakers to intro-
duce  several  new  models  into  the  Korean  auto  market  in  2008,  and  going  forward 
would  also  introduce  unnecessary  complexity  and  lack  of  consistency  into  an  emis-
sions testing process that has worked well to date. 

U.S.  automakers  (Chrysler,  Ford  and  GM)  had  scheduled  witness  tests  for  nine 
vehicle models in 2008. U.S. automakers requested that Korea’s governing agencies 
continue  to  allow  for  auto  emissions  witness  testing,  which  has  been  a  successful 
and effective practice to date. After the U.S. Government brought considerable pres-
sure  to  bear  on  the  Korean  government,  the  Korean  government  agreed  to  back 
away from the change. 

In June 2008, the Korean government officially backed off of its plans to end wit-
ness testing and instead offered some alternative approaches. This ultimately ended 
up being a successful outcome, but demonstrates that Korea’s longstanding habit of 
creating new non-tariff barriers to auto imports has not ended. 

These  are  just  a  few  recent  examples  of  the  type  of  issues  we  face  in  Korea.  As 
I  mentioned,  there  are  other  long-existing  non-tariff  barriers  which  USTR  tried  to 
address in this agreement, but we believe the remedies are inadequate. I am happy 
to  discuss  these  other  non-tariff  barriers,  such  as  Korea’s  discriminatory  tax  prac-
tices, regulatory or certification issues or general anti-import bias. 
How to ‘‘Fix’’ the Agreement 

Members of the U.S. automotive industry, along with numerous Members of Con-
gress,  worked  closely  with  USTR  up  to  and  including  the  day  that  the  agreement 
was  initialed  in  April  2007.  After  reviewing  the  agreement,  we  immediately  called 
it  unacceptable  and  not  even  close  to  what  we  and  others  in  the  industry  had  told 
the U.S. officials repeatedly was necessary to secure true change in the Korean mar-
ket. 

It  quickly  became  clear  that  most  of  the  U.S.  industry  and  our  workers,  as  well 
as  many  Members  of  Congress,  including  our  Congressional  Leadership,  believed 
that  the  automotive  provisions  were  inexcusably  weak  and  ineffective  and  needed 
to be redrafted and expanded in order to obtain sufficient Congressional support. 

The response so far? In more than a year since the signing of the agreement, the 
Korean  government  has  not  sought  dialogue  with  our  elected  Representatives  or 
anyone in our industry on how to address these concerns and inadequacies. Interest-
ingly, they didn’t seem to have a problem seeking alterations to the beef agreement 
their  President  just  signed.  I  don’t  say  this  to  be  flip,  but  because  it  goes  to  our 
fundamental concern. 

For  its  part,  the  U.S.  Trade  Representative  has  repeatedly  made  clear  that  the 
U.S.  has  no  intention  of  asking  the  Koreans  to  sit  down  and  improve  on  the  auto-
motive  chapter  of  the  FTA.  However,  the  USTR  has  negotiated  vigorously  on  the 
beef issue, which ironically isn’t even part of the FTA. We find this frustrating and 
odd. Autos, unlike beef, is a pillar industry in Korea and requires a significant com-
mitment on the part of the Administration for real change to occur. 

And  so  there  is  a  stalemate,  not  because  there  is  a  problem  that  can’t  be  solved 
but  because  neither  of  the  parties  is  willing  to  acknowledge  that  a  critical  part  of 
the  Agreement  was  perhaps  rushed,  and  a  more  careful  and  deliberate  set  of  pro-
posals and agreements need to be hammered out. 

The  United  States  automotive  market  is  by  far  the  largest  and  most  open  in  the 
world.  This  fact  provided  our  government  with  substantial  leverage  in  its  negotia-
tions  with  Korea.  We  clearly  articulated  the  need  for  a  robust  agreement  which 
would  pry  open  a  Korean  automotive  market  that  has  been  blatantly  and  perva-
sively  protected  for  decades.  We  believe  that  the  Administration  miscalculated  the 
dynamics  in  Korea.  Their  assumption  was  that  the  leadership  in  Korea  was  recep-
tive to openness and we should therefore complete an agreement as quickly as pos-
sible to take advantage of this newfound, enlightened view in Korea. 

Unfortunately, the longstanding and pervasive nature of the Korean government’s 
protective  meddling  and  nationalism  cannot  be  undone  overnight  (note  beef).  While 
the  leadership  may  commit  to  these  changes,  it  is  the  Korean  bureaucracy  which 
would be responsible for implementing the agreement. And given their history, they 
have proven time and again that they are extremely adept at creating new barriers. 
Changing  this  culture  will  not  be  easy.  That  is  why  we  asked  USTR  to  remove 
the  existing  U.S.  barriers  only  after  Korea  had  demonstrated  that  its  auto  market 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

23 

is  open  and  that  import  access  would  be  sustained.  We  believe  that  only  this  ap-
proach  would  provide  the  necessary  incentive  to  the  entire  Korean  bureaucracy  to 
systemically  eliminate  the  protectionist  mentality  and  actions  it  has  practiced  for 
decades. 

Similarly,  Congressional  leadership  recognized  the  same  concerns.  In  a  March  1, 
2007  letter  to  the  President,  House  Leadership  presented  a  Congressional  Proposal 
to Open Korea’s Automotive Market. There are two key components to the Congres-
sional proposal. The first part addresses the phase-out of the U.S. passenger vehicle 
tariff and creates a positive incentive for Korea to open its market to U.S. vehicles. 
The  second  part  addresses  Korea’s  current  non-tariff  barriers  and  creates  a  ‘‘self- 
help’’  mechanism—available  to  all  industries—for  the  United  States  to  take  action 
against  future  non-tariff  barriers.  Attached  to  our  written  testimony  is  a  copy  of 
that letter. 

We are ready and willing to resume discussions with the Administration and the 
Korean government on how to improve the automotive provisions of the U.S.-Korea 
FTA.  We  appreciate  the  support  we  have  received  from  both  Senate  and  House 
members  regarding  this  issue  and  once  again  thank  Senator  Dorgan  for  arranging 
this hearing and asking Chrysler to testify. 

The PRESIDENT, 
The White House, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Mr. President: 

CONGRESS OF THE UNITED STATES 

Washington, DC, March 1, 2007 

We  are  writing  in  advance  of  the  eighth  round  of  U.S.-Korea  Free  Trade  Agree-
ment  negotiations,  to  present  the  enclosed  Congressional  Proposal  to  Open  Korea’s 
Automotive  Market.  This  proposal  reflects  a  pragmatic,  trade-expanding,  WTO-con-
sistent  approach  that  provides  concrete,  achievable  positive  incentives  for  Korea  to 
open  its  automotive  market  and  ensure  the  elimination  of  current  and  future  non- 
tariff barriers in all industries. This proposal represents what we believe the United 
States needs to negotiate to achieve a satisfactory resolution to Korea’s closed auto-
motive market. In addition, it is a proposal that should be welcomed by Korean con-
sumers  and  by  the  Bush  Administration  because  it  will  lead  to  a  more  competitive 
market in Korea with greater choice of products and more competitive prices. 

We  have  developed  this  proposal  out  of  our  growing  concern  that  these  negotia-
tions  will  fail  to  effectively  tear  down  Korea’s  non-tariff  barriers,  prevent  Korea 
from using future non-tariff barriers to maintain its closed market indefinitely, and 
ensure access for imports to Korea’s automotive market. For decades, Korea has en-
joyed  open  access  to  the  U.S.  auto  market.  At  the  same  time,  it  has  kept  its  own 
market  virtually  shut  to  foreign  competition  through  the  use  of  an  import  ban,  fol-
lowed  by  high  tariffs,  coupled  with  a  complex  and  discriminatory  tax  regime,  cou-
pled  with  systemic,  comprehensive  and  longstanding  regulatory  barriers,  coupled 
with periodic anti-import campaigns by the Government of Korea. 

The issue of our inability to break down long-standing and discriminatory barriers 
in  a  bicameral  negotiation  would  seriously  undermine  our  ability  to  address  non- 
tariff barriers in the more comprehensive multilateral negotiations underway at the 
World  Trade  Organization.  Given  the  importance  of  this  issue,  we  have  made  con-
sistent  and  repeated  calls  for  the  United  States  to  undertake  a  new  approach  with 
Korea  that  addresses  in  a  complete,  comprehensive,  and  systemic  way  the  long- 
standing  policies  by  which  Korea  created  and  maintains  a  fundamentally  closed 
automotive  market.  The  U.S.  automotive  industry  and  union  leadership  also  have 
called  upon  the  Administration  to  take  a  new  approach.  To  date,  however,  no  new 
approach  has  been  put  forth  that  would  lead  to  genuine  market  opening  in  Korea. 
Instead,  we  understand  that  the  proposals  which  have  been  exchanged  have  been 
similar to the same ones that were tried repeatedly in the past and that have failed 
to achieve any meaningful access for U.S. products. 

Our  proposal  moves  beyond  previous  negotiating  strategies  and  embarks  on  such 
a  new  approach  that  addresses  the  United  States’  legitimate  concerns  that  Korea 
will not obtain additional access to the U.S. market unless there is reciprocal open-
ing of the Korean auto market. There are two key components to the Congressional 
proposal.  The  first  part  addresses  the  phase-out  of  the  2.5  percent  U.S.  passenger 
vehicle  tariff  and  creates  a  positive  incentive  for  Korea  to  open  its  market  to  U.S. 
autos.  The  second  part  addresses  Korea’s  current  non-tariff  barriers  and  creates  a 
mechanism—available to all industries—for the United States to take action against 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

24 

future  non-tariff  barriers.  A  copy  of  the  proposal  is  enclosed,  as  well  as  a  briefing 
paper that summarizes its key elements. 

The  Korean  automotive  market  presents  a  significant  potential  market  for  U.S. 
exports  of  cars  and  automotive  products  and  would  greatly  benefit  the  U.S.  auto-
motive industry and the hundreds of thousands of workers it employs and supports. 
U.S.  automotive  manufacturers  can  compete  effectively  in  an  open  and  fair  Korean 
auto market. We look forward to discussing how our proposal achieves a truly open 
market and more balanced automotive trade with Korea. 

Sincerely, 

Hon. CHARLES B. RANGEL 
Chairman, Committee on Ways and Means 
Hon. SANDER M. LEVIN 
Chairman, Subcommittee on Trade 
House Committee on Ways and Means 
Hon. JOHN DINGELL 
Chairman,  House  Committee  on  Energy  and 

Commerce 

Hon. DALE E. KILDEE 
Co-Chair, House Auto Caucus 
Hon. RON KIND 
Member,  House  Committee  on  Education  and 

the Workforce 

Hon. ELLEN O. TAUSCHER 
Chair, New Democrat Coalition 
Hon. CANDICE S. MILLER 
Member, House Committee on Armed Services 

Hon. THADDEUS MCCOTTER 
Member,  House  Committee  on  Budget  and 

Foreign Affairs 

Hon. CARL LEVIN 
Co-Chair, Senate Auto Caucus 
Hon. GEORGE V. VOINOVICH 
Co-Chair, Senate Auto Caucus 

Hon. EVAN BAYH 
Chairman,  Senate  Banking  Subcommittee  on 

International Trade, Finance, and Security 

Hon. DEBBIE STABENOW 
Member, Senate Committee on Finance 
Hon. FRED UPTON 
Co-Chair, House Auto Caucus 

Hon. JOE KNOLLENBERG 
Member, House Committee on Appropriations 
Hon. VERNON J. EHLERS 
Member,  House  Committee  on  Transportation 

and Infrastructure 

CONGRESSIONAL PROPOSAL TO OPEN KOREA’S AUTOMOTIVE MARKET 

There  are  two  key  components  to  the  Congressional  proposal.  The  first  part  ad-
dresses  the  phase-out  of  the  U.S.  passenger  vehicle  tariff  and  creates  a  positive  in-
centive  for  Korea  to  open  its  market  to  U.S.  autos.  The  second  part  addresses  Ko-
rea’s  current  non-tariff  barriers  and  creates  a  ‘‘self-help’’  mechanism—available  to 
all  industries—for  the  United  States  to  take  action  against  future  non-tariff  bar-
riers. The key elements of this proposal are described further below: 
Part I—U.S. Tariff Reduction Tied to Opening Korea’s Auto Market 

• Tariff Reduction—Korea’s 8 percent auto tariff will go to zero immediately. The 
U.S. 2.5 percent passenger vehicle tariff will go to zero at the conclusion of the 
longest  phase-out  period  provided  for  in  the  agreement,  or  15  years,  whichever 
is longer. The U.S. 25 percent pick-up truck tariff will continue to be negotiated 
with Korea, Japan and other countries at the World Trade Organization. 
• Positive  Incentive  to  Open  Korea’s  Auto  Market—As  a  positive  incentive  for 
Korea  to  open  its  auto  market  to  U.S.  autos  during  the  tariff  phase-out  period, 
Korea  will  get  a  benefit  in  the  form  of  duty  free  entry  for  a  specified  number 
of  autos  every  year  that  U.S.  auto  sales  in  the  Korean  market  increase  from 
a  designated  baseline.  The  benefit  will  be  measured  on  a  car-for-car  basis,  and 
apply in the next calendar year. The baseline, and any subsequent increase, will 
be  determined  by  an  FTA  Committee  comprised  of  the  respective  U.S.  and  Ko-
rean commerce ministries. The positive incentive is structured so that the more 
open  Korea  allows  its  market  to  become,  the  greater  will  be  Korea’s  benefits. 
» Example—The  agreement  comes  into  force  on  January  1,  2008,  and  the  base-
line  is  established  at  3,000  (a  hypothetical  figure  representing  the  number  of 
U.S. autos sold in Korea in 2007). If 4,000 U.S. cars are sold in Korea in 2008, 
then Korea may receive duty free entry to the U.S. for 1,000 cars in 2009. 
• Auto  Safeguard  with  Incentive  to  Increase  U.S.  Market  Share  in  Korea—An 
automotive safeguard will come into effect immediately upon the full phase-out 
of the U.S. auto tariff. The safeguard will apply automatically in the event that 
the  United  States  determines  that  imports  of  Korean  autos  are  increasing  sig-
nificantly.  The  penalty  will  be  a  predetermined  ‘‘snap-back’’  of  the  2.5  percent 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

25 

auto tariff. The penalty will remain in place until the United States determines 
that  imports  are  no  longer  increasing  significantly.  As  an  incentive  for  Korea 
to increase access to its auto market and promote full competition in that mar-
ket to benefit Korean consumers, the safeguard will be suspended for each year 
that  the  market  share  of  U.S.  auto  sales  in  Korea  equals  or  exceeds  Korea’s 
auto market share in the U.S. 

Part II—Non-tariff Barriers. 

This provision will apply to all sectors, not just automotive. 
• Elimination  of  Current  Barriers—Korea  agrees  to  eliminate  current  specified 
measures  prior  to  the  agreement  coming  into  effect.  The  proposal  will  contain 
a  list  of  specific  current  barriers  identified  by  the  automotive  industry,  as  well 
as other industries. 
• Addresses  Future  Barriers  Through  Dispute  Settlement  by  Providing  Self-Help 
for U.S. and Creating A ‘‘Reverse Burden of Proof’’ for Korea—The proposal en-
ables the U.S. to take immediate, unilateral compensatory action to counter any 
future  barrier  (or  any  current  barrier  not  specifically  identified  in  the  agree-
ment)  based  on  a  standard  of  ‘‘reasonable  evidence’’  relative  to  the  existence  of 
a Korean measure that discriminates against imports. The compensatory action 
(such  as  a  tariff  snap-back  or  tariff  increase  on  other  products)  would  remain 
in  effect  until  Korea  established  conclusively  that  the  measure  does  not  exist, 
or does not operate to afford protection to a domestic industry in Korea. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Bozzella, thank you very much. 
Next, we will hear from Dr. McMillion. 
Again, I have read the statements that all of you have submitted. 
And, Mr. McMillion, thank you for being here, and you may pro-

ceed. 

STATEMENT OF DR. CHARLES W. MCMILLION, PRESIDENT 
AND CHIEF ECONOMIST, MBG INFORMATION SERVICES 

Dr.  MCMILLION.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I’m  especially  glad 
to  come  before  you  today  as  the  full  Senate,  the  country,  and  the 
world face the crises built from 28 years of naı¨ve financial deregu-
lation. 

I’d  like  to  focus  on  three  broad  and  closely  related  points.  First, 
this  naı¨ve  or  cynical  ideological  obsession  with  deregulation  that 
has now bankrupted the U.S. financial system is inextricably inter-
twined  with  the  obsession  for  deregulation  of  commerce,  particu-
larly of global commerce and what is often called ‘‘free trade.’’ 

Second,  as  with  financial  deregulation,  all  of  the  major  theories 
used  to  sell  deregulation  of  global  commerce  have  long  failed  the 
test  of  experience,  undermining  U.S.  production  of  goods  and  serv-
ices, and forcing dependence on soaring debt and asset sales to for-
eign interests in China and elsewhere. 

Third,  as  within  the  endangered  financial  system,  now  is  the 
time for an urgent, careful reversal in the deregulatory global com-
mercial policies that have so very clearly failed. 

Just  since  NAFTA  with  Mexico  was  implemented,  14  years  ago, 
the  U.S.  has  accumulated  over  $6  trillion  in  current  account  defi-
cits,  $4.6  trillion  just  since  2001.  These  massive  trade  deficits  oc-
curred  despite  unprecedented  debt-exploding  tax  cuts  and  wage 
stagnation  in  the  U.S.  to  make  the  U.S.  supposedly  more  competi-
tive. 

The  severely  threatened  U.S.  auto  industry  has  suffered  more 
than $1 trillion in trade losses over just the last 8 years. Even now, 
the U.S. auto industry faces production losses and global trade defi-
cits of $10 billion each and every month. The U.S. now imports half 
again as many autos from Mexico as the U.S. exports to the entire 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

26 

world.  Let  me  repeat  that.  Fourteen  years  after  NAFTA,  last  year 
the  U.S.  imported  over  a  million  cars  from  Mexico  and  exported 
only 673,000 cars to the entire world. 

Including  auto  parts,  Korea  exported  $11.3  billion  of  autos, 
trucks, and parts to the United States in 2007, compared with only 
$1  billion  of  U.S.  exports  to  Korea.  This  11-to-1  U.S.  imbalance  of 
Korean imports to exports is worsening, so far this year, our wors-
ening  deficits  in  auto  parts.  The  difference  is  with  parts,  Senator. 
I  hope  there’s  time  to  discuss  some  of  the  key  false  assumptions 
behind  the  claims  of  those  that,  even  today,  continue  to  push  de-
regulation—further deregulation of global commerce. 

But,  after  28  years  of  trade  deregulation,  today’s  $2-billion-per- 
day  production  shortfall  and  forced  U.S.  foreign  borrowing  con-
tinues  to  put  enormous  pressure  on  global  financial  markets,  it 
constrains U.S. policy options, and it clearly undermines U.S. living 
standards today, as well as in the future. 

Further deregulation of global commerce should not be a serious 
consideration  for  anyone  concerned  with  the  United  States  of 
America  and  its  economy.  Now  is  the  time  for  an  urgent,  careful 
reversal in the deregulatory global commercial policies that have so 
clearly  failed.  This  is  the  time  for  renewed  global  cooperation  to-
ward new, sustainable, and mutually beneficial objectives of raising 
living  standards  here  in  the  United  States  and  around  the  world. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I look forward to the discussion. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. McMillion follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. CHARLES W. MCMILLION, PRESIDENT 

AND CHIEF ECONOMIST, MBG INFORMATION SERVICES 

Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman  and  the  other  Senators  on  the  Subcommittee  for  invit-
ing  me  to  testify  before  you  today.  I  am  especially  glad  to  come  before  you  today 
as  the  full  Senate,  the  country  and  the  world  face  some  of  the  enormous  con-
sequences  of  28  years  of  naı¨ve  antigovernment,  ideological  extremism  and  financial 
deregulation. 

This  naı¨ve  or  self-serving  antigovernment  extremism  is  also  behind  28  years  of 
careless deregulation of commerce, especially global commerce, that has undermined 
our  productive  economy  and  left  the  U.S.  deeply  dependent  on  foreign  debt  and 
asset sales. This is reflected in today’s auto industry crisis where, even now, the in-
dustry  faces  production  losses  and  trade  deficit  of  $10  billion  each  month.  Often 
celebrated as ‘‘free’’ trade, the dire consequences of this global commercial deregula-
tion are inextricably intertwined with today’s financial crises. 

After  200  years  of  U.S.  history,  Federal  and  household  debt  combined  equaled 
$2.4 trillion in 1980. Twenty-eight years later, this debt has grown 10-fold, surging 
past $24 Trillion. As a share of GDP, this debt fell from a high of 138 percent dur-
ing the World War II emergency, plunged to 83 percent in 1980, and has since me-
thodically soared to 168 percent now—far worse than ever before. 

Whatever  emergency  rescue  plan  the  Congress  adopts  for  our  bankrupt  financial 
system and its powerful Wall Street leaders this week, the adjustments to our living 
standards and to our policies that begin next week will be long and difficult. 

In  the  past  28  years  the  U.S.  reversed  its  previous  trade  surpluses  and  accumu-
lated  over  $7  trillion  in  current  account  trade  deficits.  Since  NAFTA  with  Mexico 
was implemented 14 years ago, the U.S. has accumulated over $6 trillion in current 
account  deficits,  $4.6  trillion  just  since  2001.  These  massive  trade  deficits  occurred 
despite  unprecedented,  debt-exploding  tax  cuts  and  wage  stagnation  to  ‘‘make  the 
U.S.  more  competitive’’  and  reflect  the  substitution  of  foreign  debt  and  asset  sales 
(and Wall Street commissions) for U.S. production of goods and services. 

Even  as  the  worst  U.S.  financial  crises  since  1933  began  to  become  more  widely 
apparent,  in  2008-Q2  the  U.S.  was  required  to  borrow  or  sell-off  assets  of  over  $2 
billion  (net)  per  day  to  foreign  interests  in  China  and  elsewhere  to  pay  for  trade 
deficits. This, of course, is in addition to the fact that U.S. policymakers are limited 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

27 

to activities that will reassure foreign creditors and prevent them from calling mas-
sive  loans  or  selling  off  assets  already  owned  by  China  and  other  foreign  interests. 
As with the financial system more directly, the theoretical judgments of those urg-
ing  deregulation  of  global  commerce  has  proven  over  and  over  again  for  decades  to 
be  remarkably  naı¨ve  or  cynical.  For  example,  heavily-promoted  (and  quoted)  advo-
cates  for  NAFTA  with  Mexico,  assured  that  the  agreement  would  benefit  U.S.  pro-
duction and jobs by constantly extending commercial surpluses with Mexico for dec-
ades.  Rather,  U.S.  trade  surpluses  with  Mexico  immediately  vanished  as  the  con-
fidently  assured  15  years  of  theoretical  surpluses  totaling  $140  billion  became,  in 
fact,  constantly  worsening  losses  totaling  $630  billion  in  real  deficits,  lost  produc-
tion, lost jobs and new U.S. foreign debt. 

New commercial agreements or other ‘‘key,’’ ‘‘breakthrough’’ developments are an-
nounced  several  times  each  year  between  the  U.S.  and  China.  Indeed,  it  was  as-
sured that following NAFTA, trade with Mexico would help reduce or eliminate the 
then $23.8 billion U.S. trade deficit with China in 1993. Since then there have been 
market access agreements, agreements on intellectual property, Permanent Normal 
Trading Relations, World Trade Organization membership, lowered tariffs and much 
more.  And  yet  the  result  is  U.S.  current  account  losses  to  China  soaring  to  $289.7 
billion in 2007, rising toward $300 billion in 2008, and totaling $1.5 Trillion in just 
the past 8 years. 

Borrowing  to  pay  for  these  massive  commercial  trade  deficits,  U.S.  debt  service 
and  other  investment  payments  to  China  in  2007  were  $36  billion  more  than  all 
profits earned by U.S. business and investment in China. These U.S. net payments 
are increasing rapidly. 

Those  promoting  commercial  deregulation  often  ridiculed  concerns  for  low  wage 
competition  from  countries  like  Mexico,  China  or  Korea  by  assuring  that  this  is 
more  than  offset  by  far  higher  overall  productivity  rates  in  the  U.S.  But  as  post- 
NAFTA  U.S.-Mexico  auto  trade  demonstrates,  overall  productivity  rates  are  irrele-
vant when commerce is dominated by the same modern, global transnational compa-
nies.  The  U.S.  now  imports  half  again  as  many  autos  from  Mexico  (1,009,300  in 
2007) as the U.S. exports to the entire world (673,100) including to Mexico. 

Korea  exported  $11.3  million  of  autos/trucks  and  parts  to  the  U.S.  in  2007  com-
pared  with  only  $1.0  million  of  U.S.  exports  to  Korea.  This  left  a  U.S.  auto-sector 
deficit  with  Korea  of  over  $10  billion  and  an  11-to-1  ratio  of  U.S.  import  payments 
(or debt) to export earnings. From January to July 2008, the cost of U.S. auto-sector 
imports  from  Korea  is  up  2.3  percent  (concentrated  in  auto  parts)  while  the  value 
of U.S. industry exports to Korea is down ¥9.4 percent, indicating a worsening U.S. 
deficit and net loss of auto-sector production. 

Similarly, promoters of deregulation often argue that the technological superiority 
of  the  U.S.  allows  for  the  loss  of  older  industries—now,  perhaps  including  the  auto 
sector—imports of which can be paid for with surpluses in modern technologies and 
intellectual  property  royalties  and  fees.  However,  since  2002,  the  U.S.  also  has  lost 
its  post-World  War  II  commercial  trade  surplus  in  advanced  technology  goods  with 
the nominal value of ATP deficits now larger than any past surplus. 

This  ATP  deficit  is  worsening  rapidly  with  Mexico,  China,  Korea  and  others  as 
modern  transnational  corporations  transfer  their  best  technologies  and  new  prod-
ucts  where  they  are  cheapest  to  produce.  Despite  the  near-record  weakness  in  the 
foreign  currency  value  of  the  dollar,  ATP  deficits  now  virtually  offset  all  net  earn-
ings  on  IP  royalties  and  fees  from  companies  chartered  in  the  U.S.  That  is,  tech-
nology goods and services now pay virtually no part of the U.S. bill for foreign mili-
tary operations or for the net import of oil, autos, electronics, clothing, etc. 

Rapid  changes  in  the  global  profile  of  the  U.S.  economy  and  trade  are  reflected 
in  recent  U.S.-Korea  trade  patterns.  Obsolete  economic  theory  suggests  that  coun-
tries like China and Korea with economic growth faster than world growth will have 
Current  Account  deficits  while  countries  like  the  U.S.  that  has  grown  far  slower 
than the world economy in each of the past 9 years—and only half the growth rate 
in  Korea—would  have  Current  Account  surpluses.  Yet  China  and  Korea  each  have 
had substantial Current Account surpluses for many years while the United States’ 
Current Account deficit averaged 5 percent over these past nine troubled years. 

Similarly,  in  addition  to  Korea’s  now  consistent  surplus  in  autos  and  ATP  trade 
with the U.S., Korea enjoys large surpluses with the U.S. in electronics, machinery, 
textiles/apparel,  iron  and  steel  products  and  most  other  manufactured  goods.  Most 
of the industries in which the U.S. enjoys surpluses with Korea are agricultural and 
commodities  such  as  cereals  and  organic  chemicals,  although  the  U.S.  does  retain 
surpluses in aircraft and some specialty medical and optic instruments. Through the 
first  7  months  of  2008,  U.S.  agricultural  trade  surpluses  with  Korea  are  rising  (on 
soaring prices) while U.S. deficits with Korea are worsening for manufactured goods 
including ATP, autos and parts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

28 

Over the past 8 years the U.S. has accumulated Current Account deficits of about 
$98  billion  with  Korea  including  merchandise  deficits  of  $112  billion  and  manufac-
turing deficits of $123 billion. 

These  rapidly  changing  patterns  of  global  trade  illustrates  another  key  obsolete 
article  of  faith  for  those  that  promote  further  deregulation  of  global  commerce. 
Against all evidence, it is still claimed that unregulated trade drives growth in U.S. 
productivity,  wages  and  living  standards.  However,  the  contrary  evidence  has  been 
overwhelming for over 20 years. Unregulated global commerce is eliminating highly 
productive  U.S.  manufacturing  output  and  jobs  and  forcing  dependence  on  massive 
new debt to create far less productive, lower-paying service sector jobs that are pro-
tected  from  global  competition.  Of  the  3.4  million  new  U.S.  jobs  created  over  the 
past  8  years,  more  than  all  have  been  in  health  care  (2.4  million  new  jobs)  and  in 
bars and restaurants (1.5 million new jobs.) 

After 28 years of trade deregulation, today’s $2 billion per day production shortfall 
and  forced  U.S.  foreign  borrowing  continue  to  put  enormous  pressure  on  global  fi-
nancial markets, constrain U.S. policy options and undermine the U.S. living stand-
ards. Further deregulation of global commerce should not be a serious consideration 
for anyone concerned with the United States of America and its economy. 

As  with  the  endangered  financial  system,  now  is  the  time  for  an  urgent,  careful 
reversal  in  the  deregulatory  global  commercial  policies  that  have  so  clearly  failed. 
This is the time for renewed global cooperation toward new, sustainable and mutu-
ally beneficial objectives of raising living standards. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

.

I

s
p
e
1
L
M
C
M
4
2
9

29 

Household and  Federal Debt Percent of GOP: 

Post·WWII Debt Levels fell  until 1981  but now far exceed WWII peak 

% Debt to GOP each Year 

160% 

140% 

120% 

100% 

80°,4, 

50'. 

Federal R .. el'Ve, 0.1'1. of Comm .. ce end M8G Information s.rvi<: .. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

.

I

s
p
e
2
L
M
C
M
4
2
9

30 

-$4.6 Trillion in US Globallosses/Borrowing Since 2001 

~ .. 

M, 

~ 

,m, 
'''*I 

P ''"I 

Current Account Balance: 1994 through 2008-011 

·$6,036,272,000,000 

Current Account Balance: 2001 through 2008-011 

-$4,601,476,000,000 

Required (Net) US  Foreign Borrowing/Asset Sales: 

'" 
P"" 

" 
,-... - , 
... _ .. __ ... _-
_.  -. 

, " 

, _.  _. 

-

Pro·Nafta "judgment" Failed Spectacularly 

Promised Production and Job Creation Were Based on Obsolete Assumptions 

Billions of Dollars: U,S, Annual Current Accounts Batance With Mexico 

un 

... 

($10) 

''''' 

,~, 

,~, 

(5~) , ... , 
($10) , ... , 

""OiJ.,,oi.. p~,;;. rono<i .• ji,ligmw.i "olio;:" Wii~ "Non.;: 
u.s. ._ ... to .... ,.., W;"  00.';.,," to o.,",Mp 
...... ;... n ... ,.,...'Q'h. Unitod$ ...... _ '  ..... to .  U.$. 
" . do •• ",.,.. with _

100 <>I  ,"""' $1 .. , .,.  ,<>  $Q 
.""ion .nn",", by  '"1'· " .. ; ..... ,,, It ""ion ,,, $11 
·G,,,!  C1";do H..tboo"ot Odd J ""to'J J . 8<""" ... ott" .... 
.... _..-tw .. h lng""'. OC: l..,i,,,,.Io, 
'n"",,"".01 [""",omieo; Oetobot. 1993) P." 

.. ""," _ .  ' n o ~ .. :1000  oM  :10 ,0 

U,S. Do~",~" <>I C<Hnmote .... MeG 1m .. ""', .... S .... I" . 

O M"" .. _ 

...... _ 

s
p
e

.

I

4
L
M
C
M
4
2
9

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

.

I

s
p
e
3
L
M
C
M
4
2
9

31 

US Trade Balance With  China 

$ Billions Per Year: US Merchandise Net Exports 

" 

($SO) 

($100) 

($150) 

($200) 

($250) 

us o.partmonl 01 COfM'I<II'U a>d  MBG  InIo< .... rion Servlcu 

'" 

'" 

'" 

'"  '" 
'" 
* .. SG'"Io<mo1I ... SoM ... 

'" 

'" 

" 

'" 

'" 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

.

I

s
p
e
5
L
M
C
M
4
2
9

32 

Mexico Now Exports 50% More Autos to the US 

Than the US Exports To the World 

•  US Auto Imports from Mexico  [ ]  US  Auto Exports to World 

'"ihe fu rs  skJltfuU,. articulated In Perot's sound bit .. and bV other NAFTA 
opponents baslc.ally  3mounllo., rosl.lltomont of tho paupor lobor 
.1Il1Iumont.~ The reUon why the  paup"t labor argumont milStalo, the 
conneeUon botw .. n t,MI.  and w~g •• Is simple. On C!lV, Mgt , high U,S. labor 
produel lvlly pays for high US wag ..... 
Gary Clyde Hufbouar and Jaffray J . SchoU  NAF1A : An AUHs ment 
pp. 11  & 13. 1nsUtut. for International Economlct  October, 1993 

1993 

2007 

1000 

800 

600 

400 

200 

o 

Over -$1  Trillion in US Trade Deficits from the Auto Vehicles Sector: 2000 to 2007 

~  "'" 

........  :T=-. ,,=T~ ...........  _  "'" 

................  __ 

.- :  ....... ....  __ ...... 

". .. 

.,~" 

---..--
... '" -- I.," 
--~ --

IJ,'" 
.11'>u 
.: .• n 
I,'. 

~<I' 

I.'" 

., •• 1> 

~ 

"1.'" 

U. 

.s .... 

.>lJa: 
u n 
.1.'" 

-s ... , 

., .. " 

., ..... 

,'.171 

."".. 
• ..... 1 

I.'" 

.... 

.1. ... 

'~I.'. 
01.'" 
oJ.):> 

.t •• ' "  

·'.jIlI 

1"  .. 

,... 

, ,.. 

Sf' 

.. 

011 

.. '" 

, . . . . . . . .  , 

t.'" 

1.1.,1 

..... , 

·".m 

.' 2.tl2 

." ._ 

".'" 
u ..  un 
. "'-

l,SO, 

u >t 

.. ~ 

. ~ 

s
p
e

.

I

7
L
M
C
M
4
2
9

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

.

I

s
p
e
6
L
M
C
M
4
2
9

33 

US Trade in Advanced Technology Goods 

AlP Losses  Now Much Larger Than Any Past Surplus 

$  Billion: Annual US Global Trade Balance in ATP 

$4' 

'20 

.. 

($20) 

($.40) 

,$GO, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

.

I

s
p
e
8
L
M
C
M
4
2
9

34 

.. 

" 

,~ 

.~ 

f1W __  

U10 

~ 

~ 
M 

.. 

" 
• 

• 

" .'" 
" 

.. 

" 

oo""'~._ 
a_ ... "'_ .... ~ 
12' ... ..,...,.,00 _ _  

____ '_04 •• 
_,,,.><$01./<0 

"--"-

V_  .... OOIO' 
0 __  .. _ 

Deficits Are Concentrated in Advanc ed Manufactured Good s 

US Trade Balances With Korea: 

_ .. _. 
" - .. 
, ......... _-
.m  ,~  I.'"  - .~  "-
... _-
.. , 
" '. 
-~- .. 
-"  "" 
"._, ... -.. 
.m  .~  1,'" 
" 
.' ." 
• 
. _-
.. 
" 
~  '"  -. ~  ...  • • 
, 
"T •  , 
~  '.'~ 
'.  . .. 
.. 
...... 
••  - . , 
" 
" 
" 
-
om 
.~  _101"  ••  • • 
.-
,., 
. ,,, 
., 
,~  '"  ,.  "0" 
... 
'., 
..  .~ 
" 
.. ""'-
" 
---
.' 
.. 
.,  •• 
" 
.. _ ... _.-
... 
,-
.. 
.. 
." 
--
,,' 
.. 
, 
,. 
, . 
' . 
.......... _-
- •• 
~  ,  ,  ~ 
.. 
... 
.. 
'" 
'" 
, .. 
.. 
... 
" 
• 
.. ' 
.. _._,-
• 
.. 
'" 
.. _,.,.,-
" 
" 
" 
·  •• 
.. 
'. 
• 
.. 
._ ....... -
m 
'" 
" 
"  - • 
• 
" 
" 
" 
" 
" 
" 
"-
• 
• 
•• 
" 
" 
.. 
• 
.. 
• 
• 
... 
•  • 
".  ~ 
.. 
.. 
.. 
.. 
" 
...... ,--
.. 
• 
" 
" 
" 
•• 
, 
,,-~ ...... 
" 
" 
" 
• 
.. 
.. 
.. 
, 
,. 
• 
.. 
" 
" 
" 
.. , 
• 
.. 
.. _y,,",-
" 
" 
• 
• 
12 __  .... 
"--_«PI 
.. 
" 
-
.. ~w_ . -..:'< 
.. , ..... .,_Go .... ,_~ .... 
"' __ ~  , 
" 
" 
.. 
• 
" 
• 
" 
, 
.. 
•• 
• 
.. 
a"".-f...,.-
.. 
u __  
.. 
, 
...... -.r_ 
.. _v .. ,_,_ 
.. 
.. 
, 
....... .E_ 
, 
, 
.. 
.. 
.... _ ,  .. .1 .......... 
.. -
"0.- __ _  
.,~ .y"",-
.,_w ... y ... ,_  
• 
.. ---,-
• ~_."'s.,!. 
1f __  III".;d1O 
.. -
, 
.. _ 
.... 11 ....... 
, 
""-v_ 
---
110'",_,,_ 
.. .-_w_ 
.. . : -........ 
.. _I'I_,eooo ....... 
.. , ... v_ ... .E .... 
....... _ ... 
" .... 
~,-.... --
,,-"' .. ,"-
.. ~ 
"'--'" 
"'-

" 
• 
• 
· 
• 
• 
• 
• 
, 
• 
.. 
.. 
.. 
• 
, 
.. 
• 
" 
" 
, 
, 
.. 
, 
" 
·  • 
.. 
• 

" 
, 
... 
.. 
, 
.. 
• 
, 
'" 
• 
• 
.. 
" 
". 
" 
.. 
.. 
.. 
• 
'. 
.. 
.. 

~ 

,; 
'. 
, 
, 
, 
• 
.. 
" 
• 
, 
" 
" 
, 
" 
, 
.. 
, 
" 

" 
.. 
.. 
• 
• 
• 
• 
.. 
.. 
• 
.. 
.. 
• 
.. 
, 
" 
, 

, 
" 
" 
• 
• 
, 
" 
• 
, 
" 
• 
, 
" 
, 
" 
" 
, 
" 

, 
• 
• 
• 
, 
• 

, 
" 
.. 
" 
" 
" 
.. 
" 
• 
.. 
" 
• 

OO_,c.M,.".'" 
":Ihoo_"~' 

....... "' ........ 0 • .., 
0' . . .  _ 

" 

• 

.. 
• 
• 
, 
.. 
.. 
, 
• 
" 
• 
• 
, 
• 
" 

.. 
• 

• 
• 

, 

.. 
, 
" 
, 
, 
• 
.. 
• 
" 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

.

I

s
p
e
9
L
M
C
M
4
2
9

35 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  McMillion,  thank  you  very  much  for  being 

with us again. 

And  finally,  we  will  hear  from  Mr.  Myron  Brilliant,  who  is  the 
President  of  the  U.S.-Korea  Business  Council  and  the  Vice  Presi-
dent,  Asia,  U.S.  Chamber  of  Commerce,  on  behalf  of  the  U.S. 
Chamber of Commerce and the U.S.-Korea Business Council. 

Mr. Brilliant, welcome, and you may proceed. 
STATEMENT OF MYRON BRILLIANT, PRESIDENT, U.S.-KOREA 

BUSINESS COUNCIL; VICE PRESIDENT, ASIA, U.S. CHAMBER OF 

COMMERCE; ON BEHALF OF THE U.S. CHAMBER OF 
COMMERCE, THE U.S.-KOREA BUSINESS COUNCIL, 

THE AMERICAN CHAMBER OF COMMERCE IN KOREA AND 

THE U.S.-KOREA FTA BUSINESS COALITION 

Mr.  BRILLIANT.  Thank  you,  Chairman.  On  behalf  of  the  U.S. 
Chamber  of  Commerce,  the  U.S.-Korea  Business  Council,  the 
American  Chamber  of  Commerce  in  Korea,  and  the  U.S.-Korea 
FTA Business Coalition, I’d like to thank the Interstate Commerce, 
Trade,  and  Tourism  Subcommittee  for  the  opportunity  to  provide 
our views on the U.S.-Korea Free Trade Agreement and the United 
States automobile industry. 

It won’t be a surprise to this Committee that our views are very 
different—vastly  different  than  those  already  expressed  on  this 
panel today. 

Our  organizations  believe  that  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA  will  provide 
enormous,  enormous  market  access  opportunities  and  represents 
the  most  commercially  significant  U.S.  trade  agreement  concluded 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

I

s
p
e
.
0
1
L
M
C
M
4
2
9

36 

in  over  a  decade.  Once  implemented,  it  will  provide  very  substan-
tial  benefits  to  all  sectors  of  the  U.S.  economy,  including  the  U.S. 
auto  industry.  And  it  does  enjoy  very  broad  support  among  U.S. 
manufacturers,  farmers,  and  service  providers.  That  is  why  the 
U.S.-Korea FTA Business Coalition now comprises of over 500 U.S. 
companies,  trade  associations,  industry  organizations,  and  cham-
bers  of  commerce,  representing  millions  of  businesses  of  every  size 
in  every  part  of  the  U.S.  economy.  We  seek  the  agreement’s  ratifi-
cation. 

Once  implemented,  the  agreement  will  lead  to  a  substantial  re-
duction in trade barriers, in every sector of the Korean markets, to 
U.S. goods and services, and thereby generate billions of dollars in 
new  U.S.  exports,  creating  new  American  jobs  and  economic 
growth.  At  this  critical  time,  we  would  think  such  an  agreement 
would be an imperative for the U.S. Congress to pass. 

Under  the  agreement,  nearly  95  percent  of  bilateral  consumer 
and industrial-goods trade will become duty-free within 3 years. Al-
most  all  remaining  tariffs  and  goods  will  be  eliminated  within  10 
years.  Korean  tariffs  on  U.S.  industrial  products  average  approxi-
mately 6.2 percent, or twice as high as the equivalent U.S. rate. In 
addition,  there  are  unprecedented  provisions  to  address  nontariff 
measures,  which  I’m  happy  to  discuss  in  the  question-and-answer 
session. 

The  agreement  will  also  guarantee  transparent  and  predictable 
regulatory  and  rulemaking  procedures  in  Korea,  enhance  invest-
ment  protections,  protect  and  enforce  intellectual  property  rights, 
and  help  ensure  that  fair  and  transparent  application  of  competi-
tion policy for all U.S. companies doing business with Korea, a $1- 
trillion  economy.  Moreover,  in  deepening  ties  between  the  United 
States and Korea, we will reinforce a bilateral relationship that has 
promoted  regional  security  and  prosperity  in  East  Asia  for  more 
than 50 years. My full statement goes into more details. 

Turning  to  the  U.S.  auto  industry,  our  organizations  are  clearly 
sensitive  to  the  challenges  facing  the  U.S.  automobile  industry  in 
the  current  domestic  and  global  economy,  including  in  Korea.  In-
deed,  Ford,  GM,  and  Chrysler  are  members  of  the  U.S.  Chamber 
of  Commerce.  GM  sits  on  the  Executive  Council  of  the  U.S.-Korea 
Business Council. And Chrysler has, in the past. We fully recognize 
the leadership role that the U.S. automobile industry has played in 
opening  markets  and  removing  unfair  trade  barriers  to  U.S.  goods 
and  services  all  around  the  world,  to  the  benefit  of  the  entire  U.S. 
economy.  AMCHAM  Korea  and  the  U.S.-Korea  Business  Council 
repeatedly  have  called  on  the  Korean  government  to  eliminate  im-
pediments  to  imports  of  U.S.  vehicles,  and  the  FTA  does  just  that. 
The auto commitments in the FTA are comprehensive, meaning-
ful,  and  binding.  It  is  important  to  recognize  just  how  much  of— 
the  U.S.-Korea  FTA  does  to  reduce  Korean  trade  barriers  to  U.S. 
autos. 

First, the agreement will eliminate, immediately, Korea’s tariff of 
8  percent  on  U.S.  passenger  vehicles,  10  percent  tariff  on  U.S. 
trucks,  and  almost  all  duties  on  U.S.  auto  parts,  which  currently 
range from 3 to 10 percent. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

37 

Second,  the  FTA  reduces  substantially  the  discriminatory  effect 
of Korea’s automotive taxes on U.S. and other foreign vehicles, and 
significantly reduces these taxes. 

Third,  the  Korean  government  has  also  made  a  commitment 
under  the  FTA  not  to  impose  any  new  engine  displacement  taxes 
or to apply these taxes on a nondiscriminatory manner. 

Fourth, the agreement includes commitments by the Korean gov-
ernment  to  address  three  specific  standards  of  concerns,  and  also 
an overall requirement that Korea not employ technical regulations 
that create unnecessary barriers to trade. 

Fifth,  the  FTA  includes  a  unique  and  innovative  mechanism  for 
resolving auto-related trade disputes. It will provide expedited res-
olution of disputes under the agreement by cutting in half the dis-
pute settlement process. 

Sixth,  the  FTA  establishes  an  autos  working  group  to  address 
regulatory issues that may arise by providing U.S. stakeholders op-
portunity  for  early  involvement  in  the  Korean  regulatory  process. 

All these commitments are binding—binding obligations. 
Seventh,  in  addition  to  the  auto-specific  provisions,  the  U.S.- 
Korea  FTA  also  addresses  standards  and  technical  barriers  to 
trade. Under the agreement, the Korean government is required to 
provide transparency and national treatment to U.S. entities in the 
development of standards, technical regulations, and conformity as-
sessment  procedures,  and  we’ve  already  seen  early  indications  of 
their commitment to this, this summer. 

Moreover,  we  should  also  be  encouraged  by  statements  by  the 
Korean government that it will not discourage the purchase or use 
of U.S. goods or services, an important commitment, in light of past 
anti-import campaigns in Korea. 

The  ITC,  the  International  Trade  Commission,  in  2007,  in  its 
study, forecasted that, ‘‘U.S. exports of passenger vehicles to Korea 
would  likely  experience  a  large  percentage  increase  as  a  result  of 
the  FTA’’,  following  full  implementation  of  the  FTA  provisions.  It 
estimated  that  exports  of  U.S.  motor  vehicles  and  parts  to  Korea 
would  increase  by  $294  million  and  $381  million,  or  45  percent  to 
58.9 percent over current levels. 

The ITC report did note that U.S. imports of Korean motor vehi-
cles  and  parts  would  also  increase  by  9  to  10—to  12  percent,  but 
forecasted  that  much  of  the  increase—55  to  57  percent  of  the  esti-
mated  increase—would  be  diverted  from  other  foreign  motor  vehi-
cles  and  parts  sold  in  the  United  States.  For  this  reason,  the  U.S. 
ITC concluded that the risk of any decline in output or employment 
for  the  U.S.  automobile  industry  and  U.S.  auto  parts  manufactur-
ers from the FTA would likely be negligible. 

We  note  that  Korea  is  no  longer  the  closed  market  it  once  was 
to  U.S.  and  other  foreign  automobiles.  Foreign  import  penetration 
of  the  Korean  auto  market  has  grown  rapidly  in  recent  years.  For 
the  first  7  months  of  this  year,  the  total  market  share  of  foreign 
autos  in  Korea  was  6.5  percent.  In  sharp  comparison,  the  market 
share  for  foreign  vehicles  in  Korea  was  0.26  percent  in  1999.  We’d 
like to see our cars do better. But, U.S. automakers sold 6,000-plus 
cars  in  Korea  in  2007,  an  increase  of  nearly  37  percent  over  2006 
sales levels, and those trends continue in 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

38 

Delaying or rejecting the U.S.-Korea FTA is not a solution for ad-
dressing  the  imbalance  in  U.S.-Korea  automobile  trade,  and  could 
erode  the  competitiveness  of  the  U.S.  auto  industry  in  the  Korean 
market for years to come. Korea is close to completing its FTA with 
the  EU.  If  that  were  the  case,  the  U.S.  auto  producers  would  be 
at a substantial competitive disadvantage to European competitors. 
That would not help the situation, but it would, in fact, exacerbate 
the imbalance in bilateral auto trade. 

The best way to reduce our imbalance is to reduce Korean taxes, 
tariffs,  and  nontariff  measures  on  U.S.  automakers.  Once  the  FTA 
is implemented, we are committed—committed to working hand in 
hand  with  the  U.S.  auto  industry  to  make  sure  that  Korea  fulfills 
all of its FTA obligations and commitments. 

Our organization, in sum, believes that this agreement will level, 
ensure—will  ensure  great  market  access  to  our  industries,  includ-
ing autos, in one of the most advanced and dynamic overseas mar-
kets. 

Thank you for the opportunity to testify this morning. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Brilliant follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MYRON BRILLIANT,  PRESIDENT,  U.S.-KOREA BUSINESS 
COUNCIL; VICE PRESIDENT, ASIA, U.S. CHAMBER OF COMMERCE; ON BEHALF OF THE 
U.S. CHAMBER OF COMMERCE, THE U.S.-KOREA BUSINESS COUNCIL, THE AMERICAN 
CHAMBER OF COMMERCE IN KOREA AND THE U.S.-KOREA FTA BUSINESS COALITION 
The  U.S.  Chamber  of  Commerce,  the  U.S.-Korea  Business  Council,  the  American 
Chamber  of  Commerce  in  Korea  (AMCHAM  Korea),  and  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA  Busi-
ness  Coalition  would  like  to  thank  the  Interstate  Commerce,  Trade,  and  Tourism 
Subcommittee  for  the  opportunity  to  provide  their  views  on  U.S.-Korea  automobile 
trade. 

The  U.S.  Chamber  is  the  world’s  largest  business  federation  representing  three 
million businesses of every size, sector and region. The U.S.-Korea Business Council, 
an affiliate of the U.S. Chamber, is composed of U.S. companies that are significant 
investors  in  and  exporters  to  Korea.  AMCHAM  Korea  represents  hundreds  of  U.S. 
companies  doing  business  in  Korea.  The  U.S.-Korea  FTA  Business  Coalition  is  a 
group  of  over  500  U.S.  companies,  trade  associations,  industry  organizations,  and 
chambers  of  commerce  representing  businesses  of  every  size  and  sector  of  the  U.S. 
economy  that  support  the  U.S.-Korea  Free  Trade  Agreement  (FTA),  which  was 
signed on June 30, 2007. The U.S.-Korea Business Council serves as the Coalition’s 
secretariat. 

Our  four  organizations  believe  that  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA  is  the  best  solution  for 
addressing many of the factors that have contributed to the historical imbalance in 
U.S.-Korea automobile trade. This is one of the reasons why the member companies 
and  associations  of  our  organizations  enthusiastically  endorse  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA, 
the most commercially significant U.S. trade agreement concluded in over a decade. 
This  agreement  provides  very  substantial  benefits  to  all  sectors  of  the  U.S.  econ-
omy.  It  enjoys  broad  support  among  U.S.  manufacturers,  farmers,  and  the  services 
sector.  By  eliminating  trade  barriers  in  every  sector  of  the  Korean  market  to  U.S. 
goods  and  services  and  securing  a  more  open  and  competitive  Korean  market,  the 
agreement will generate billions of dollars in new U.S. exports, creating new Amer-
ican jobs and economic growth. 

Under the U.S.-Korea FTA, nearly 95 percent of bilateral consumer and industrial 
goods  trade  will  become  duty-free  within  3  years;  almost  all  remaining  tariffs  on 
goods will be eliminated within 10 years. According to the U.S. Department of Com-
merce,  Korean  tariffs  on  U.S.  industrial  products  average  approximately  6.2  per-
cent—twice  as  high  as  the  equivalent  U.S.  rate.  Over  80  percent  of  U.S.  merchan-
dise exports to Korea are manufactured products, and the agreement will bring tan-
gible and significant benefits to U.S. manufacturers—including U.S. auto producers 
and auto parts makers. We note that the agreement covers trade in remanufactured 
goods,  which  will  additionally  create  new  export  and  investment  opportunities  for 
U.S. firms producing these products, including machinery and auto parts. 

Korea’s  complex  regulatory  system  and  other  non-tariff  barriers  have  in  the  past 
limited  opportunities  for  U.S.  manufacturers  and  others  to  compete  and  succeed  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

39 

the Korea market. The U.S.-Korea FTA addresses these challenges with strong pro-
visions and protections that open Korea’s market, protect U.S. interests, and set the 
bar higher for future trade pacts. These provisions include expanded market access 
for  U.S.  producers  in  Korea  in  sectors  where  they  currently  face  restrictions  on  in-
vestment  and  on  their  operations.  The  agreement  will  also  guarantee  transparent 
and predictable regulatory and rulemaking procedures in Korea, protect and enforce 
intellectual  property  rights,  enhance  investment  protections,  and  help  ensure  the 
fair  and  transparent  application  of  competition  policy  for  all  U.S.  companies  doing 
business in Korea. These and other elements of the FTA will level the playing field 
for U.S. businesses competing in Korea’s dynamic $1 trillion economy. Moreover, the 
FTA  will  deepen  the  ties  between  the  United  States  and  Korea,  reinforcing  a  bilat-
eral  partnership  that  has  promoted  regional  security  and  prosperity  in  East  Asia 
for more than fifty years. 

While  today’s  hearing  focuses  on  the  issue  of  U.S.-Korea  automobiles  trade,  we 
are including as an attachment to this testimony a report issued by the U.S.-Korea 
Business  Council  on  the  broader  and  very  substantial  benefits  that  the  U.S.-Korea 
FTA will provide the U.S. economy if the Congress approves the agreement. 

Our  organizations  are  sensitive  to  the  challenges  facing  the  U.S.  automobile  in-
dustry in the current domestic and global economy. We recognize the leadership role 
that the U.S. automobile industry has played in opening markets and removing un-
fair  trade  barriers  to  U.S.  goods  and  services  all  around  the  world,  to  the  benefit 
of  the  entire  U.S.  economy.  Moreover,  we  are  acutely  familiar  with  the  challenges 
that  the  U.S.  automobile  industry  long  encountered  in  the  Korean  market. 
AMCHAM Korea and the U.S.-Korea Business Council repeatedly have called on the 
Korean government to eliminate tariff and non-tariff barriers and other discrimina-
tory  policies  that  have  severely  limited  opportunities  for  U.S.  automakers  to  com-
pete in the Korean market. 

We urged Korean and U.S. trade negotiators to include strong provisions address-
ing these issues in the U.S.-Korea FTA. And that is, in fact, just what they did. We 
are  pleased  that  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA  includes  commitments  by  the  Korean  govern-
ment  to  address  virtually  every  tariff  and  non-tariff  market  access  barriers  to  U.S. 
automobiles in Korea raised by the U.S. auto industry during the FTA negotiations. 
Once the FTA is ratified, we are committed to working hand-in-hand with the U.S. 
auto industry to make sure that Korea fulfills all of its FTA commitments. 

Delaying  or  rejecting  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA  on  the  basis  that  it  does  not  go  far 
enough  in  opening  Korea’s  market  to  U.S.  autos  will  not  right  the  imbalance  in  bi-
lateral automobile trade. Rather, the best way to accomplish this goal is by ratifying 
the  U.S.-Korea  FTA  and  by  focusing  our  energy  on  ensuring  that  Korea  faithfully 
fulfills  its  FTA  commitments.  If  we  do  that,  we  can  ensure  that  Korean  tariff  bur-
dens  on  U.S.  auto  makers  are  eliminated;  that  tax  burdens  are  significantly  re-
duced; that existing non-tariff barriers are addressed and new ones are not imposed; 
and that the Korean government does not dampen sales in other ways. 
How  the  U.S.-Korea  Free  Trade  Agreement  Will  Reduce  Barriers  to  Auto 

Trade 

It  is  important  to  recognize  how  much  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA  does  to  eliminate 
many  of  the  Korean  trade  barriers  to  U.S.  autos.  The  agreement  will  eliminate  im-
mediately  Korea’s  tariff  of  8  percent  on  U.S.  passenger  vehicles,  10  percent  tariff 
on U.S. trucks, and almost all on U.S. auto parts, which currently range from 3 per-
cent to 10 percent. These cuts will instantly give U.S. auto and auto parts manufac-
turers a price advantage in the Korean market. 

The FTA reduces substantially the taxes levied on autos, and eliminates their dis-
criminatory  effect  on  U.S.  and  other  foreign  vehicles.  Under  the  FTA,  the  Korean 
government will amend its Special Consumption Tax and Annual Vehicle Tax to re-
duce  existing  maximum  tax  rates  and  to  further  eliminate  aspects  of  these  policies 
that  have  discriminated  against  U.S.  autos  on  the  basis  of  engine  size.  This  ‘‘cas-
cading’’ set of taxes disproportionately affects U.S. automakers because U.S. vehicles 
tend  to  have  relatively  larger-sized  engines  than  Korean  vehicles.  The  Korean  gov-
ernment has also made a commitment under the FTA not to impose any new engine 
displacement  taxes  or  to  apply  these  taxes  in  a  discriminatory  manner.  Korea  will 
also  publicize  the  availability  of  an  80  percent  refund  of  its  Subway  Bond  Tax  for 
purchasers  of  new  automobiles,  yet  another  tax  that  has  been  a  barrier  in  the  Ko-
rean market for U.S. autos. These reforms, when implemented, will reduce tax rates 
on U.S. autos in the Korean market to the same level as virtually all Korean autos 
and increase their price competitiveness. 

The  FTA  includes  specific  commitments  in  the  automotive  area  by  the  Korean 
government not to employ technical regulations that create unnecessary barriers to 
trade, and to cooperate on harmonizing standards. In particular, the Korean govern-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

40 

ment  has  agreed  not  to  apply  emission  standards  more  stringent  than  those  used 
by  the  state  of  California  and  agreed  to  use  a  less  stringent  standard  used  in  Cali-
fornia for small volume manufacturers. Low volume manufacturers (those which sell 
fewer  than  4,500  vehicles  a  year)  are  exempted  entirely.  The  FTA  provides  for  im-
ported  motor  vehicles  to  be  exempt  from  any  new  or  amended  Korean  regulations 
related  to  self-certification  for  safety  standards  for  at  least  2  years  after  the  date 
on which the regulations or amendments are issued; these standards will then only 
apply to models under certain conditions. By bringing Korean standards more close-
ly in line with those applied in the United States, the FTA will further lower manu-
facturing costs and retail sales prices for U.S. autos in the Korean market. 

The  FTA  includes  important  mechanisms  for  resolving  autos-related  trade  dis-
putes.  A  unique  and  innovative  autos-specific  dispute  settlement  mechanism  will 
provide  expedited  resolution  of  disputes  under  the  agreement.  If  the  agreement’s 
dispute  settlement  panel  finds  that  Korea  has  not  complied  with  its  obligations  in 
the agreement’s auto provisions, it can authorize the United States to reimpose im-
port  duties  on  Korean  automobiles.  To  enhance  the  enforcement  effect,  this  expe-
dited process—just for autos—will result in decisions in half the time of the normal 
dispute  settlement  mechanism.  The  FTA  also  establishes  an  autos  working  group 
to  address  regulatory  issues  that  may  arise  and  to  review  and  provide  comment  on 
potential  new  Korean  regulations  affecting  auto  manufacturers.  Under  the  FTA, 
when  the  Korean  government  is  developing  new  regulatory  measures  for  consider-
ation, it must provide information on these proposals to the working group, thereby 
giving U.S. stakeholders an opportunity for early involvement in the process. In ad-
dition,  the  FTA  ensures  that  non-governmental  parties,  including  auto  companies 
and labor unions, may provide advice and input to the U.S. Government throughout 
the  dispute  resolution  process.  These  and  other  stakeholders  may  take  part  in  the 
activities  of  the  autos  working  group.  All  of  these  commitments  are  binding  obliga-
tions,  something  the  United  States  did  not  have  in  past  automotive  arrangements 
with Korea. 

In  addition  to  its  autos-specific  provisions,  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA  also  addresses 
standards  and  technical  barriers  to  trade  (‘‘TBTs’’)  and  many  other  practices  that 
the  Korean  government  long  used  to  protect  Korea’s  market  for  a  variety  of  manu-
factured goods from foreign competition. During the FTA negotiations, our organiza-
tions  urged  that  the  FTA  eliminate  Korea-unique  standards  and  standards-setting, 
testing  and  certification  procedures  that  are  not  in  line  with  international  norms, 
not carried out in a transparent or predictable manner, and that have adversely af-
fected  the  ability  of  U.S.  companies  to  provide  goods  and  services  in  the  Korean 
market.  The  FTA  includes  commitments  by  the  Korean  government  to  enhance 
transparency  in  the  development  and  implementation  of  technical  regulations  and 
related conformity assessment procedures. Under the agreement the Korean govern-
ment  will  provide  national  treatment  to  U.S.  entities  for  participation  in  the  devel-
opment  of  standards,  technical  regulations,  and  conformity  assessment  procedures. 
Korea has also committed to publishing the criteria used to recognize conformity as-
sessment  bodies,  and  to  explain  objectives  and  how  proposed  regulations  will  ad-
dress  those  objectives  when  regulations  are  notified  for  comment  and  again  when 
they are adopted as final. The Korean government will also make publicly available 
all  comments  received  on  proposals,  notify  proposals  for  comment  even  if  they  are 
based on international standards; allow at least forty days for written comments on 
proposals;  publish  notice  of  proposed  and  final  regulations  in  a  single  official  jour-
nal;  and  in  publishing  final  regulations  will  include  responses  to  significant  com-
ments  received  together  with  an  explanation  of  the  revisions  made  to  the  proposal. 
Under the FTA, the Korean government is required to promote reliance on inter-
national standards that are consensus-based. Moreover, in areas where Korea recog-
nizes  non-governmental  bodies  to  perform  testing  and  certification  for  compliance 
with  its  technical  regulations,  the  agreement  includes  the  Korean  government’s 
commitment  to  provide  national  treatment  to  U.S.  conformity  assessment  bodies 
and  for  Korea’s  government  authorities  to  provide  national  treatment  when  testing 
and  certifying  U.S.  products.  The  agreement  also  provides  for  the  establishment  of 
a  bilateral  committee  to  strengthen  FTA  and  WTO  commitments  on  TBTs,  which 
will monitor implementation and promote cooperation. 

Beyond these important provisions, the U.S.-Korea FTA contains further commit-
ments  by  the  Korean  government  that  stand  to  benefit  the  U.S.  auto  industry  and 
thus contribute to reducing the imbalance in U.S.-Korea automobile trade. These in-
clude:  enhanced  intellectual  property  rights  protections  and  enforcement;  new  pro-
tections  for  U.S.  investors  and  a  more  stable  legal  framework  in  Korea  for  invest-
ment-related cases; strong competition policy provisions; and statements by the Ko-
rean  government  that  it  will  not  discourage  the  purchase  or  use  of  U.S.  goods  or 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

41 

services—an  important  commitment  in  light  of  past  ‘‘anti-import’’  campaigns  in 
Korea. 

In short, the U.S.-Korea FTA has stronger and more comprehensive provisions re-
lated to the automotive sector in the areas of taxes, tariffs, standards and technical 
barriers,  and  dispute  settlement,  than  any  other  U.S.  trade  agreement.  It  provides 
a  powerful  tool  for  restoring  balance  to  U.S.-Korea  automobile  trade  and  an  impor-
tant  opportunity  for  ensuring  that  U.S.  automakers  and  auto  parts  manufactures 
can fairly compete in the Korean market. 
Anticipated  Economic  Effects  of  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA  on  the  U.S.  Auto 

Industry 

The U.S.-International Trade Commission (USITC) noted the agreement’s benefits 
to  the  U.S.  automotive  sector  in  its  September  20,  2007  assessment  of  the  possible 
impacts  of  the  FTA.  The  USITC  forecasted  that  ‘‘U.S.  exports  of  passenger  vehicles 
to  Korea  would  likely  experience  a  large  percentage  increase  as  a  result  of  the  FTA’’ 
following full implementation of the FTA’s provisions on standards and certification 
requirements,  taxes,  regulatory  reforms,  and  other  measures  addressing  non-tariff 
barriers.1 Its economic simulation estimated that exports of U.S. motor vehicles and 
parts to Korea would increase between $294 million and $381 million (45.5 percent 
to  58.9  percent).2 The  USITC  observed  that  the  removal  of  Korea’s  8  percent  tariff 
on  U.S.  passenger  cars  and  10  percent  tariff  on  light  trucks  under  the  agreement 
would  ‘‘likely  have  a  positive  effect’’  on  U.S.  exports,  enabling  U.S.  companies  to 
lower  the  price  of  their  vehicles  in  the  Korean  market.  It  also  concluded  that  the 
tax  reforms  included  in  the  FTA  would  ‘‘more  or  less’’  equalize  the  total  taxes  paid 
on imported and domestic vehicles. While the USITC simulation also forecasted that 
U.S.  imports  of  Korean  motor  vehicles  and  parts  could  increase  by  $1.3  billion  to 
$1.7 billion (9 percent to 12 percent), it also forecasted that 55 percent to 57 percent 
of  this  estimated  increase  would  be  diverted  from  other  foreign  motor  vehicles  and 
parts sold in the United States. 3 For this reason, the USITC concluded that the risk 
of  any  decline  in  output  or  employment  for  the  U.S.  automobile  industry  and  U.S. 
auto parts manufacturers from the FTA ‘‘would likely be negligible.’’ 4 
Rapid New Growth for U.S. Auto Exports to Korea 

It is important to recognize that Korea is no longer the closed market it once was 
to  U.S.  and  other  foreign  automobiles.  In  fact,  foreign  import  penetration  of  the 
Korea haven auto market has grown exponentially in recent years—as evident from 
the below chart. 5 

For  the  first  7  months  of  this  year,  the  total  market  share  of  foreign  autos  in 
Korea  was  at  6.54  percent.  In  comparison,  the  market  share  for  foreign  vehicles  in 

1 U.S. International Trade Commission (USITC). The U.S.-Korea Free Trade Agreement: Poten-
tial  Economy-Wide  and  Selected  Sectoral  Effects.  Washington,  D.C.:  U.S.  International  Trade 
Commission, September 2007. p. 3–74. 

2 USITC, ibid., p. 2–8. 
3 USITC, ibid., p. 3–82. 
4 USITC, ibid., p. xviii. 
5 Korea Automobile Importers and Dealers Association. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

1
L
L
I
R
B
4
2
9

42 

Korea  was  5  percent  in  2007,  3.89  percent  in  2006,  2.7  percent  in  2005,  and  0.26 
percent  in  1999.  U.S.  automakers  sold  6,235  cars  in  Korea  in  2007,  an  increase  of 
nearly  37  percent  over  2006  sales  levels,  and  have  already  sold  more  cars  in  Korea 
during the first 7 months of this year—4,584 vehicles—than they did in all of 2006. 6 
The  U.S.-Korea  FTA  would  be  beneficial  to  U.S.  companies  looking  to  increase 
their market share and product offerings in Korea. For example, General Motors an-
nounced earlier this year a study to examine the potential for introducing the Chev-
rolet brand into Korea. Currently, GM only sells the Cadillac brand in Korea, apart 
from  its  Korea-manufactured  Daewoo  brand.  Ratification  of  the  FTA  could  provide 
incentives  for  U.S.  automakers  to  expand  their  brands  and  models  available  to  Ko-
rean  consumers.  Indeed,  the  best  way  to  continue  to  increase  U.S.  market  share  in 
Korea’s auto sector is through Congressional approval of the U.S.-Korea FTA. 
The Costs of Inaction 

Delaying  or  rejecting  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA  on  the  basis  that  it  does  not  go  far 
enough in opening Korea’s market to U.S. autos is not a solution for addressing the 
imbalance  in  U.S.-Korea  automobiles  trade,  nor  will  this  promote  the  competitive-
ness  of  the  U.S.  auto  industry  in  the  Korean  market.  Rather,  it  risks  placing  the 
U.S.  automotive  industry  at  risk  of  further  market  imbalances  and  erosion  of  its 
market share in Korea. European and Japanese automakers are subject to the same 
tariffs,  non-tariff  barriers,  standards  and  regulations  in  Korea  as  U.S.  motor  vehi-
cles,  yet  have  rapidly  increased  their  market  share  in  Korea;  through  the  first  half 
of this year, Japanese and German models comprised Korea’s top ten-selling foreign 
autos. 

The  foreign  auto  companies’  proven  success  in  Korea  is  a  cogent  argument  for 
ratification  of  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA  soon.  Another  is  Korea’s  current  negotiation  of 
a network of bilateral and multilateral trade agreements with the European Union, 
India,  Canada,  and  other  countries.  Korea  is  also  studying  possible  FTA  talks  with 
China and the possible reopening of its FTA negotiations with Japan, which are cur-
rently  in  a  hiatus.  The  U.S.-Korea  FTA,  if  put  into  effect  first,  will  help  to  set  the 
terms  for  these  negotiations  and  other  future  trade  agreements.  That  is  important 
as we do not want to have less comprehensive agreements set the rules of trade for 
us.  Korea  is  close  to  completing  its  FTA  with  the  European  Union.  If  that  agree-
ment was put into effect before the U.S.-Korea FTA, the U.S. auto producers would 
be  at  a  substantial  competitive  disadvantage  to  European  competitors.  This  would 
only further exacerbate the imbalance in bilateral auto trade. 
Conclusion 

The  U.S.  Chamber  of  Commerce,  the  U.S.-Korea  Business  Council,  AMCHAM 
Korea, and the U.S.-Korea FTA Business Coalition believe that the best way to ad-
dress the U.S.-Korea auto trade imbalance is through the ratification and implemen-
tation of the U.S.-Korea FTA and the strict enforcement of its provisions. Our orga-
nizations  and  our  member  companies  view  the  agreement  as  a  landmark  oppor-
tunity to level the playing field in one of our country’s most important overseas mar-
kets  and  international  partners,  and  in  doing  so  generate  new  jobs  and  economic 
growth across the United States. Our organizations welcome the opportunity to pro-
vide  the  members  of  the  Interstate  Commerce,  Trade,  and  Tourism  Subcommittee 
with additional information about the U.S.-Korea FTA. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Brilliant, thank you very much. 
Let  me  ask  you  a  question  first.  You  talk  about  the  U.S.  Cham-
ber  and  the  groups  you  represent  pushing  the  Koreans  to  own  up 
to  their  agreements.  Have  you  been  pushing  the  Koreans  to  own 
up to their 1998 agreement that they made with this country? 

Mr.  BRILLIANT.  We  were  very  involved,  past  1999,  in  1998,  in 
that effort. Let me just be clear, though: there are specific commit-
ments that Korea has lived up to in the 1995 and 1998 agreements. 
First of all, they lowered their tariff rate to 8 percent. Second, they 
reclassified  minivans,  as  they  committed  to.  And,  third,  they  defi-
nitely  shifted  the  certification  standards.  So,  there  are  some  com-
mitments, specific commitments, they lived up to. 

6 Korea Automobile Importers and Dealers Association. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

43 

We  would  like  to  see  more  market  access  for  our  companies, 
which  is  why  we  pushed  hard  for  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA  to  include 
robust,  meaningful,  comprehensive  obligations  of  the  Koreans  in— 
with respect to the auto industry. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But,  Mr.  Brilliant,  it  appears  to  me,  on  auto-
mobiles,  8  years—10  years  after  the  1998  agreement,  there  is 
largely one-way trade. You have done an awfully good job in trying 
to portray it as some modicum of success by talking about a 37-per-
cent  increase  to  6,000  vehicles  that  we  sell  in  South  Korea.  But, 
the  fact  is—if  I  can  have  the  chart  again—they  sent  us  800,000, 
and we only sent them 6,000. 

You  all  might  want  to  read  the  story  about  the  Dodge  Dakota 
pickup  truck  and  their  experience.  Chrysler  was  very  excited  be-
cause  it  looked  like  they  were  going  to  start  to  sell  the  Dodge  Da-
kota pickup truck in South Korea. I think they sold 50 a month for 
a  few  months.  It  looked  like  that  was  kind  of  a  promising  market, 
looked like the South Koreans kind of liked the Dodge Dakota pick-
up  truck.  Then  the  South  Korean  government  shut  it  down,  just 
like  that,  despite  all  of  the  progress,  despite  all  of  the  things  that 
you described. This describes what I think is largely one-way trade 
that cannot possibly be described as successful. 

I’ve  got  some  questions—additional  questions  for  you,  Mr.  Bril-
liant,  and  I’m  going  to  let  you  have  plenty  of  time,  as  well,  but  I 
do want to go to Mr. Cassidy. 

Mr.  Cassidy,  you  know,  I’ve  been  speaking—this  goes  to  China, 
but  it’s  the  same  problem  that  we  have  with  Korea.  We  did  an 
agreement  with  China  that  was  unbelievably,  in  my  judgment,  ig-
norant  of  our  own  self-interest.  We  said  to  the  Chinese,  who  are 
ramping  up  a  very  robust  automobile  export  program,  and  it’s 
going  to  hit  us  very  soon—we  said,  ‘‘When  you  send  a  car  to  the 
United States of America, we will only impose a 21⁄2 percent tariff, 
but  if  we  send  American  cars  to  China,  you  may  impose  a  25-per-
cent tariff.’’ A country with whom we had a very large trade deficit, 
we  said,  ‘‘You  can  impose  a  tariff  that  is  ten  times  larger  than  we 
will’’ on bilateral automobile trade. 

You no doubt have heard me—I’ve spoken on the floor about this 
many  times,  saying  I’d  love  to  meet  the  person  that  actually  did 
that,  21⁄2 percent  versus  25  percent,  because  I’d  like  to  fire  them 
personally.  You  don’t  work  for  me,  but  I  understand  that  you  had 
something to do with that. Can—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  DORGAN.  Because—and  I  ask  you  about  it,  only  because 
it  is  related  directly  to  the  way  the  South  Korea  agreement  has 
also,  in  my  judgment,  been  incompetently  negotiated.  Tell  me  the 
background of all of this. 

Mr. CASSIDY. Yes. I am the person who negotiated that. And I’ve 

been waiting for this opportunity. I—— 

[Laughter.] 
Mr.  CASSIDY.—no  longer  work  for  the  U.S.  Government,  so  you 

can’t fire me. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  DORGAN.  You  know,  you’re  right,  I  can’t  get  rid  of  you, 
but  I’ve  actually  asked  you  to  testify  so  I  understand  what  has 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

44 

caused  us  to  do  these  things  that  appear,  clearly,  not  to  be  in  our 
interest. 

Mr. CASSIDY. Well, at the time, China’s tariffs were 110 percent, 
and we reduced the tariff on fully assembled automobiles to 25 per-
cent.  But,  the  story  behind  it  is  somewhat  more  complex,  because 
the only company that was shipping fully assembled automobiles— 
or shipping exports to China in the form of a fully assembled auto-
mobile—was  Chrysler.  Well,  let  me  just  rephrase  that.  Ford  and 
GM  were  sending  their  automobiles  fully  assembled  from  other 
countries—Australia  or  in  the  EU.  Chrysler,  on  the  other  hand, 
was  shipping  unassembled  automobiles  to  China.  So,  what  we  did, 
because  it  had  more  direct  impact  on  U.S.  exports,  is,  we  reduced 
the  tariff  on—the  average  tariff  on  parts,  automotive  parts—my 
Boston accent, that’s P-A-R-T-S—— 

Senator DORGAN. I got it. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr. CASSIDY.—we reduced that to 10 percent. And thus, it would 
cover fully unassembled automobiles. So, for U.S. exports, the ben-
efit  was  in  the  automotive  parts.  So,  effectively,  for  the  only  prod-
uct  that  was  being  exported  from  the  United  States  in  a  knock- 
down  version  was  Chrysler,  and  that’s  what  we  negotiated.  The 
other  ones  were  being  shipped  from  other  countries,  and  I  figured, 
well,  let’s  let  the  other  countries  negotiate  their  tariffs  down.  But, 
it was not going to help us. 

But,  let  me  just  say,  further  on,  that,  even  with  that  tariff,  the 
problem  with  the  China  deal  is  not  necessarily  in  the  tariffs,  but 
the  problem  with  the  China  deal  is  in  the  other  things  that  typi-
cally are not negotiated within the framework of trade agreements, 
like  currency  undervaluation.  And,  you  know,  these  are  the  things 
that  have  the  greatest  impact  on  automotive  trade.  So,  even  it  if 
were down to 2.5 or zero, we still wouldn’t be exporting—— 

Senator  DORGAN.  No,  Mr.  Cassidy,  I  understand  that.  And,  in 
fact,  the  same  problem  exists  with  currency  with  Korea  and 
the—— 

Mr. CASSIDY. Right. 
Senator  DORGAN.—nontariff  barriers.  I  understand  all  of  that. 
But,  can  you  understand  how  someone  in  a  policymaker  position 
serving  in  Congress  would  take  a  look  at  this  and  say,  ‘‘We  have 
a—an  unbelievable  abiding  resistant  trade  deficit  with  China  that 
continues and continues and continues, because that’s the way they 
want  it,  and  they’re  now  gearing  up  a  huge  automobile  export  in-
dustry,  and  we’re  going  to  be  flooded  with  these  cars,  and  we’re 
going to charge 21⁄2 percent, and when you—when Chrysler tries to 
ship a car to China, they charge 25 percent, and we, by agreement, 
said that’s OK’’? So—— 

Mr. CASSIDY. But, Chrysler was going to be charged a 10 percent 

tariff—— 

Senator DORGAN. I under—well, I understand—— 
Mr. CASSIDY.—not a 25 percent tariff. And, you know, the expec-
tation  was—remember,  these  were  unilateral  concessions  on  the 
part of China. The United States gave nothing. 

Senator DORGAN. Oh, we—— 
Mr. CASSIDY. And certainly they—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

45 

Senator DORGAN. No, no, we agreed for China to go to the acces-

sion to the WTO. Of course we—— 

Mr. CASSIDY. Yes, we agreed to that, but—— 
Senator DORGAN. That was a big, big deal. 
Mr.  CASSIDY.—they  got  the  benefits  of  the  agreement,  in  any 

case. They got MFN provision anyways. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Yes,  but—but,  I  mean,  it’s  not—we  shouldn’t 
suggest  China  didn’t  get  anything.  The  result  of  all  of  this—a  ter-
rible trade agreement with China, in my judgment. 

But,  let  me—let  me  go  on,  because  Senator  McCaskill  is  with 
us—I want to ask a couple more questions, then I’ll call on Senator 
McCaskill. 

Most of us, I think, would believe, although there are a few that 
don’t, that this trade deficit is destructive of our long-term interest. 
It’s  not  a  sign  of  economic  health,  it’s  a  sign  of  trouble.  Now,  I 
know  that  some  would  look  at  me—I’m  for  trade,  and  plenty  of  it. 
I  like  trade.  I  insist  that  trade  be  smart  and  represent  our  inter-
ests.  Some  view  me  as,  you  know—or  view  people  who—like  me, 
who talk about these things, as xenophobic isolationist stooges that 
just don’t get the theory of free trade. In fact, I think what is hap-
pening  to  us  is—incrementally,  agreement  after  agreement  after 
agreement,  we  eat  away  and  erode  the  basic  economic  foundation 
here, and it’s because we don’t stand up for our interests. 

Now, Mr. Gettelfinger, I assume that American workers, through 
labor  unions,  had  access  to  the  USTR,  and  pushed  hard  to  say, 
‘‘What  you’re  signing  us  up  for  here  is  more  joblessness.’’  You 
know,  is  that  the  case?  Did  you  have  access  to  USTR?  And  what 
was  their  response  when  you  told  them  your  assessment  of  what 
this  trade  agreement  with  South  Korea  would  do  to  your  auto-
workers? 

Mr. GETTELFINGER. Well, we don’t really have the access that our 
workers  should  have.  There’s  really  not  a  voice  there  when  these 
trade  agreements  are  negotiated.  And  I  would  just  refer  you  to 
Miami,  when  the  trade  ministers  met.  We  went  down—the  AFL– 
CIO  led  a  delegation  down  there,  and  we  wanted  to  go  down  and 
peacefully  protest.  It  was  like  a  military  zone.  It  was  like  a  war 
zone.  Literally,  streets  were  blocked  off,  hotels  were  locked  down, 
police  were  everywhere.  They  even  used  some  of  the  money  that 
was set aside for Iraq to have water cannons, just because we came 
down  to  peacefully  protest.  So,  workers  don’t  have  a  voice,  really, 
and  workers  don’t  have  a  say  when  these  agreements  are  put  to-
gether. 

It  just  seems  to  us,  in  this  particular  case,  this  is  a  no-brainer. 
It  is  a  no-brainer.  We’re,  as  a  country,  on  the  losing  end  of  this 
agreement.  So,  I  think  that  if  you  just  step  back  and  say,  ‘‘Well, 
where does the worker come into play?’’ the worker comes into play 
in the unemployment line. 

Senator DORGAN. Dr. McMillion, I’ve long appreciated your work, 
in which you’ve mapped out and charted and described what trade 
deficits mean to our country. Describe for me the ways that we, in 
2008,  end  up  with  a  largely  wide-open  market  in  our  country  for 
automobiles from around the world to come here, and, standing on 
a  street  corner  of  Seoul,  not  being  able  to  see  a  foreign  car.  That 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

46 

doesn’t  happen  by  tariff.  I  mean,  Mr.  Brilliant  described  the  6.2 
percent tariff. It’s not a tariff issue, is it, with South Korea? 

Dr. MCMILLION. No, it’s not a tariff issue, it’s—there are so many 
different things involved, Mr. Chairman. But, this is a system that 
evolved  after  World  War  II,  when  the  United  States  was,  far  and 
away,  the  most  technologically  superior  country  in  the  world,  and 
the  rest  of  the  world  was  in  ruins.  And  our  trade  policy  developed 
as part of our foreign policy, not as—not with very much consider-
ation—really  not  with  any  consideration  toward  job  creation  and 
production  here  in  the  United  States.  It  was  a  time  when  we 
thought we could pay any price and bear any burden. And now, as 
you  say,  incrementally,  one  free  trade  agreement—or  one  trade 
agreement following another, we’ve ended up with $2 billion a day 
that  we  have  to  borrow  from  foreign  interests.  Even  in  the  middle 
of  this  worst  financial  crisis  since  1933,  today  we’re  having  to  bor-
row $2 billion to pay for all the cars and computers and cell phones 
that we import. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  just  ask,  isn’t  it  the  case  that,  with 
each  succeeding  trade  agreement,  things  have  gotten  worse?  I 
mean, this—— 

Dr. MCMILLION. Well, I—— 
Senator  DORGAN.—this  is  a  chart  that  shows  the  trade  deficit, 
year by year by year. It seems to me it’s very hard to describe those 
growing deficits as a success for our country. 

Dr. MCMILLION. Yes, sir. And there are many things—let me just 
say  two  of  them  that  are—that  I  think  are  particularly  important. 
In,  I  believe,  each  of  the  years  that  you  have  up  there,  the  United 
States  was  growing  far  slower  than  the  world  economy,  half  the 
rate  in  Korea,  about  a  quarter  of  the  rate  in  China.  Now,  the  the-
ory  is  that,  trade  balances,  you  have  surpluses  and  deficits,  de-
pending  on  your  position  in  the  business  cycle,  but  certainly  if 
you’re  growing  slower  than  the  global  economy,  you’re  supposed  to 
have  a  surplus.  And  so,  not  only  have  we  been  running  these 
world-record  deficits,  about  5  percent  of  GDP  over  the  last  8  or  10 
years,  but  we’ve  been  doing  them  at  a  time  when  we’re  growing 
slower than the world. 

Senator DORGAN. It’s more than 5 percent, at the moment, as you 

know. 

right? 

I  want  to  ask  Mr.  Bozzella  a  question,  and  then  Mr.  Brilliant, 

and then I’m going to call on Senator McCaskill. 

Mr.  Bozzella,  you’re  a  member  of  Mr.  Brilliant’s  organization, 

Mr. BOZZELLA. I am, yes. Yes—— 
Senator DORGAN. Chrysler belongs—— 
Mr. BOZZELLA. Yes, we are. 
Senator DORGAN.—to the Chamber of Commerce? 
Mr. BOZZELLA. Right. 
Senator DORGAN. And I have spoken to the CEOs of GM, Chrys-
ler,  Ford  to  say,  ‘‘I  don’t  hear  much  from  your  participation  in  the 
U.S. Chamber, except the U.S. Chamber is the biggest cheerleader 
for these trade agreements, and you’re inside, apparently believing 
that  the  South  Korea  agreement,  at  least,  undermines  your  own 
company’s interest.’’ Are you making that case inside the Chamber 
of Commerce? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

47 

Mr. BOZZELLA. Well, we have made that case inside the Chamber 

of Commerce. And, as you know—— 

Senator DORGAN. Has it leaked out? 
[Laughter.] 
Mr.  BOZZELLA.  Well,  Mr.  Chairman,  we  recognize  that  we  have 
a  difference  of  views  with  several  members  within  the  Chamber. 
You  know,  we  certainly  value  the  Chamber’s  efforts  on  a  whole 
host  of  business  issues.  We  disagree  vigorously  with  them  on  this, 
and  we  would  suggest  that  this  is  not,  by  the  way,  as  some  might 
suggest,  you  know,  maybe  one  or  two  members  of  the  Chamber 
who are concerned and disgruntled; we’re talking about 80 percent 
of  this  imbalance  being  automotive.  And  so,  it’s  essential  that  we 
not  think  of  this  in  terms  of  the  needs  of  maybe  one  or  two  mem-
bers  of  the  Chamber  of  Commerce,  but  we  think  about  it  in  terms 
of addressing 80 percent of this imbalance. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Now,  Mr.  Brilliant,  you  represent—and  the 
Chamber  does—what  it  perceives  to  be  the  interests  of  the  Cham-
ber—members  of  the  Chamber  and  the  country,  as  they  see  it, 
right? And—— 

Mr. BRILLIANT. Yes. 
Senator  DORGAN.—I’m  trying  to  understand,  this—we  have  been 
confronted here with U.S.-Canada trade agreements, with NAFTA, 
with  CAFTA,  with—you  know,  with  all  kinds  of  trade  agreements, 
and  you  see  what  has  happened  to  these  deficits,  year  after  year 
after year, going back to 1995. I could go back further. The deficits 
get  worse.  It  appears  to  me—and  I  felt,  at  the  time,  I  thought 
NAFTA  was  a  horrible  agreement,  in  terms  of  our  own  economic 
interests,  and—Dr.  McMillion  points  out  that  we  now  import  more 
cars  from  Mexico,  by  far,  than  we  export  to  the  entire  rest  of  the 
world.  I  have  felt  that  these  agreements  have  really  undermined 
our  economic  interests  rather  than  enhanced  them,  because  the 
trade has not been two-way trade that is fair trade. 

How  do  you  see  this  chart  with  the  red  ink?  Do  you  view  it  as 

a success? 

Mr.  BRILLIANT.  Well,  I  think,  first  of  all,  the  goal  of  U.S.  trade 
policy  should  be  to  level  the  playing  field  in  overseas  markets  to 
ensure  we  have  market  access.  And  if  you  look  at  the  free  trade 
agreements  that  we’ve  conducted  and  concluded  in  recent  years, 
we’ve  not—we’ve  seen  gains,  actually,  in  our  export  sales  to  those 
markets, whether it’s Singapore or Australia or other markets. And 
we’ve  ensured  that  we  have  greater  market  access.  We’ve  ensured 
that  there  are  protections  for  intellectual  property  rights  and  for 
other issues. 

Let  me  tell  you—you’ve  mentioned  China  several  times  this 
morning,  Mr.  Chairman—we  have  a  very  comprehensive  paper  on 
the state of the U.S.-China relationship which yearly we provide to 
the U.S. Government, with recommendations on how to address on-
going  barriers  to  trade  in  that  market,  and  we  would  welcome 
sharing  that  with  you  and  your  staff.  We  take  on  a  host  of  issues, 
many of which are not tariff barriers. 

So,  when  you  look  at  the  issue  of  merchandise  trade  deficits,  we 
recognize your concerns, but we think the answer is in opening up 
other  markets,  ensuring  that  those  countries  that  are  not  playing 
by  international  rules  and  standards  do.  And  major  trading  part-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

48 

ners  of  the  United  States,  including  China,  have  areas  which  we’d 
like to see addressed. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But,  you  seem  to  be  acknowledging  that  non-
tariff  trade  barriers  are  a  problem,  and  yet,  you  do  not  insist  that 
they  be  dealt  with  or  corrected  in  the  very  agreements  that  we’re 
discussing.  The  South  Korea  Free  Trade  Agreement  that  has  been 
negotiated  does  not  address  the  nontariff  barriers  that  the  South 
Korean government creates to try to prevent U.S. vehicles from en-
tering their marketplace. 

Mr.  BRILLIANT.  Well,  this  is  where  we  would  differ.  We  think 
that  the  U.S.-Korea  FTA  agreement  does  address  many  nontariff 
measures.  It’s  the  most  robust  on  measures  on  transparency  and 
dealing  with  standards.  It  allows  our  industry  to  get  in  very  early 
in  the  process  and  address  standards  rulemaking  in  Korea.  And 
we’ve seen evidence of this already, before the agreement is imple-
mented  in  South  Korea.  This  summer,  our  negotiators  were  in, 
talking about standards that affect the auto industry. So, I think— 
and  I  believe  the  U.S.  auto  industry  was  very  much  a  part  of  that 
process.  So,  I  think  there  is  evidence  that  the  South  Korean  gov-
ernment  understands  its  obligations,  but  the  value  of  this  agree-
ment is that the obligations are binding. 

Senator DORGAN. It just seems to me that if the three major auto 
companies  in  the  U.S.,  members  of  your  organization,  believe  that 
80  percent  of  the  trade  deficit  with  Korea  is  automobile  trade-re-
lated,  and  they  believe  the  protections  in  the  agreement  are  not 
sufficient to address the nontariff issues, it seems to me that ought 
to be dispositive for the Chamber of Commerce. 

Mr.  BRILLIANT.  Well,  can  I  just  make  one  additional  point  here? 
Senator DORGAN. Yes. 
Mr.  BRILLIANT.  There  is  one  company  of  that  three  that  has 
taken  a  neutral  position  on  the  issue  of  the  FTA.  And  it’s  impor-
tant to note for the record that General Motors anticipates possibly 
selling—exporting  Chevrolets  to  South  Korea  as  a  result  of  the 
U.S.-Korea—— 

Senator DORGAN. I have visited—— 
Mr. BRILLIANT.—FTA. 
Senator  DORGAN.—with  General  Motors  folks.  I  must  say—let 
me just say how much I appreciate Chrysler being at the table, be-
cause it’s not easy for them to come. Most auto companies will not 
come  to  the  table  and  speak  publicly  about  these  issues.  There  all 
kinds  of  ramifications  for  doing  so.  It  takes  some  courage  for 
Chrysler  to  be  here,  but  it’s—I  would  say  it’s  about  time.  Thank 
you,  Chrysler.  But,  I  understand  why  the  industry  has  been  eerily 
quiet  for  a  long  period  of  time,  even  as  trade  agreements,  I  think, 
have not served their interests. 

Senator McCaskill? Thank you for—— 

STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 

Senator MCCASKILL. Let me follow up—— 
Senator DORGAN. Thank you for being patient. 
Senator MCCASKILL. Sure, yes. 
Let  me  follow  up  with  the  silence  of  General  Motors.  I  mean, 
isn’t it true that, among all of our domestic auto producers, they’re 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

49 

the  only  ones  that  have,  in  fact,  invested  in  a  plant  in  South 
Korea? 

Mr.  BRILLIANT.  Well,  General  Motors  does  have  a  joint-venture 

relationship with Daewoo, but—— 

Senator MCCASKILL. So, Daewoo—— 
Mr.  BRILLIANT.—but  they  are  not  silent,  in  the  sense  that  they 
have  provided  input  into  the  process,  and  they  have  made  it  clear 
that  their  position  is  officially  neutral,  but  they  do  see  benefits  for 
the automobile industry. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Let’s talk turkey, here. I mean, GM is neu-
tral  because  they’ve  got  skin  in  both  sides  of  this  game.  I  mean, 
GM  is  neutral  because  they’ve  invested  in  a  South  Korean  com-
pany,  and  they  are  anticipating  making  money  off  the  cars  they’re 
making  in  South  Korea  with  South  Korean  workers  and  shipping 
them  to  the  United  States  of  America.  Isn’t  that  true,  Mr.  Bril-
liant? 

Mr. BRILLIANT. Well, actually, it’s not true—that’s not a full pic-
ture.  First  of  all,  every  company  has  its  own  unique  set  of  cir-
cumstances, and they need to represent themselves before this Sub-
committee. But, let me tell you—— 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  you’re  the  closest  I  can  get  to  them, 

since they’re not here. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator MCCASKILL. Believe me, I’d be—— 
Mr. BRILLIANT. I appreciate that. 
Senator MCCASKILL.—asking them, if they were here—— 
Mr. BRILLIANT. I appreciate that. 
Senator MCCASKILL.—since they—they’re kind of lurking around 
our  offices  right  now,  asking  for  seriously,  seriously  big  taxpayer 
money. 

Mr.  BRILLIANT.  I’d  make  a  few  points.  First  of  all,  Chrysler  was 
on  the  Executive  Committee  of  the  U.S.-Korea  Business  Council. 
General  Motors  sits  on  it,  currently.  I  think  that  speaks  of  their 
commitment  to  work  with  our  Government  and  with  the  Korean 
government  to  address  substantial  barriers  to  trade  that  exist  in 
that  market,  and  have  existed  for  years.  We  share  the  concern  of 
the auto industry, broadly, about the competitiveness of the indus-
try, in light of challenges to the industry here, domestically, but we 
also believe that the best answer is to knock down the barriers that 
exist in that market, which is why we were supportive of the U.S.- 
Korea  Free  Trade  Agreement,  because  it  does  have  binding  obliga-
tions. 

With  respect  to  General  Motors,  I  can  tell  you—because  one  of 
their  top  executives  is—sits  on  our  executive  board—he  has  said, 
repeatedly,  that  they  are  going  to  look  at  opportunities  to  export 
from  this  market  to  South  Korea  once  the  FTA  is  implemented.  I 
think  that’s  an  encouraging  sign,  that  the  Subcommittee  should 
recognize. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Let  me  ask  you  this,  in  an  honest  assess-
ment,  do  you  disagree  that  this  free  trade  agreement  will  increase 
our automobile trade deficit with South Korea? 

Mr.  BRILLIANT.  Well,  I’ve  seen  evidence  that  it  will  increase  ex-
ports to South Korea. The ITC report says that, for both passenger 
vehicles,  as  well  as  auto  parts,  it  will  increase  exports.  We  antici-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

50 

pate, also, an increase of imports into the United States from South 
Korea. The percentages are obviously smaller, in terms of imports, 
because  they’re  starting  from  a  larger  volume  base.  But,  a  lot  of 
that  could  be  diverted  from  other  trading  partners,  whether  it’s 
Thailand  or  Japan  or  other  places  where  automobiles  are  exported 
to the United States. And so, the overall impact is not clear. 

What  I  can  tell  you  is  that—which  was  referenced  earlier—we 
don’t  anticipate  South  Korea  having  the  ability  to  ramp  up  its 
trucks and selling—because, first of all, they don’t have that capac-
ity, currently, and the tariff reduction is over 10 years. It’s not like 
to—to  have  any  evidence,  short  term,  that  that  will,  in  fact,  hurt 
our  domestic  automobile  manufacturers  here  in  the  United  States, 
the tariff reduction. 

Senator MCCASKILL. It was a long answer. Let me try again. Do 
you  disagree  that  this  free  trade  agreement  will,  in  fact,  increase 
our automobile trade deficit, rather than decrease it? 

Mr.  BRILLIANT.  I  think  the  short  answer  is,  it  will  have  a  neg-
ligible  impact,  either  way,  but  it  will,  in  fact,  lower  barriers,  both 
tax and tariff, as well as dealing with nonstandard issues, that will 
provide more market access for our companies, going forward. 

Senator MCCASKILL. OK. 
Let me ask—the ITC report talks about hybrids being attractive. 
We’ve obviously had a tough time in Missouri with Chrysler. We’ve 
lost  3,800  jobs  this  year  in  automobile  manufacturing  in  my  state. 
Those  families  are  sitting  around  today,  scratching  their  heads, 
reading  the  news.  They’re  trying  to  figure  out  exactly  what  has 
happened  to  them.  I  read,  yesterday,  there’s  a  $3.5  billion  bonus 
pool  that  is  staying  intact  for  Lehman  Brothers  as  Barclays  buys 
them, for the executives. And those families in O’Fallon and South 
County are sitting around, asking, ‘‘What has happened that we’re 
writing  checks  of  billions  and  billions  of  dollars  everywhere?’’  I’m 
trying  my  best  to  let  them  know  I  get  it,  that  I  understand  that 
they’re scared and frustrated and mad as hell. 

I guess one of the things that provided a little bright light in the 
materials  I  prepared  for  today  was  this  idea  that  maybe  there  is 
a  market  for  our  Ford  Escape  hybrid  in  Korea.  Maybe  one  of  you 
can  speak  to  that,  whether  or  not  you  think  there  is,  in  fact,  an 
appetite  for  hybrids,  since  they’re  not  domestically  producing  hy-
brids,  it’s  my  understanding,  in  South  Korea,  and  whether  or  not 
this would help, in terms of exporting of hybrids. 

Mr.  GETTELFINGER.  I  personally,  Senator,  do  not  think  that  it 
would. Look, South Korea’s the fifth largest producer of vehicles in 
the  world,  they’re  the  fourth  largest  exporter  of  vehicles.  I’m  hear-
ing  the  positive  spin  on  the  agreement,  but  if  this  is  true,  why 
wouldn’t it simply be done that, before we open our market further 
to  them,  that  they  open  their  market  to  us?  That  should  be  a  pre-
condition of going into this. Then, if—on the 2.5 percent tariff, that 
snap-back,  if  it  exceeds  what  is  reasonable  or  the  trade  starts  get-
ting  unbalance,  then  put  that  2.5-percent  tariff  back  on.  Let  them 
step up to the plate and say, ‘‘Look, we are going to eliminate non-
tariffs.’’  And  then,  let’s  put  in  this  compensatory  action  to  counter 
them  by  going  after  other  exports,  in  the  event  they  take  advan-
tage  of  us.  And  then,  leave  the  25  percent  pickup  tariff  to  a  bilat-
eral  commission  of  the  World  Trade  Organization.  That  was  pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

51 

posed,  by  a  bipartisan  group  of  Senators,  to  the  Bush  administra-
tion when this was being negotiated, in March of 2007. 

I think you hit the nail on the head. On the one end of the table, 
we’re talking dollars and cents and big bucks, and on the other end 
of  the  table,  we’re  talking  about  how  workers,  their  families,  their 
lives,  and  their  communities  are  impacted  by  these  unfair  free- 
trade agreements that are destroying our country. 

Dr. MCMILLION. Can I say, Senator—— 
Senator MCCASKILL. Dr. McMillion? Yes. 
Dr.  MCMILLION.—that  Toyota  and  others,  in  joint  ventures  with 
Chinese state-owned automakers, are already producing hybrids in 
China  and  exporting  very  heavily  to  Korea  already.  So,  that’s  the 
competition. I think the idea that we’re going to produce them here 
with  our  health  and  safety  and  all  other  costs  related  here,  and 
sustaining our living standard with wage rates that we have to pay 
to pay—— 

Senator MCCASKILL. Unrealistic. 
Dr. MCMILLION.—the mortgage, and export them to Korea is not 

in the cards. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Mr. Brilliant? 
Mr. BRILLIANT. I just would make one point, here, that for those 
hybrid  models  that  are  being  sold  right  now  into  the  Korean  mar-
ket, the tariff rates would go down to zero upon implementation of 
the FTA agreement. So, we could see expansion of trade. There are 
different phase-ins, generally, for hybrid vehicles, depending on the 
power system. 

But,  I’d  go  back  to  one  other  point.  There  are  70,000,  now,  vehi-
cles  being  sold  in  South  Korea,  foreign  vehicles  being  sold  in  the 
market. We have only 6,000 of that 70,000 share. I’d like to see us 
increase our overall percentage of the vehicles sold in South Korea, 
and  I  think  the  only  way  to  do  that  is  to  make  sure  Korea  lives 
up  to  binding  obligations.  I’m  not  sure  the  answer—I’m  sure  the 
answer  is  not  letting  the  Europeans  and  the  Japanese  have  more 
of  that  market.  And  the  only  way  to  ensure  that  is  to  make  sure 
that we follow through on our commitments here. 

Mr. BOZZELLA. I’m sorry, Senator, may I just—— 
Senator MCCASKILL. Sure. 
Mr.  BOZZELLA.  I’m  sorry.  On  the—this  hybrid  question,  I  think 
it  is  important  to  note,  to  Mr.  Brilliant’s  point,  that,  in  fact,  the 
issue of covering the hybrids in a tariff cut was something that the 
Koreans resisted until the very last moment. Number one. 

Number  two,  again,  the  issue  isn’t  the  tariff  rates.  The  issue  is 
a continual outcropping and uprising of nontariff barriers that have 
been—we’ve been in this market for 20 years now in Korea, so it’s 
not  like  we’ve  come  to  this  lately.  And  so,  if  this  agreement  does 
not  have  a  robust  approach  to  nontariff  barriers,  I  would  be  con-
cerned  about  our  ability  to  drive  cutting-edge  technologies  that  we 
develop here in—— 

Senator MCCASKILL. Which we’re going to do, right? 
Mr.  BOZZELLA.  Which  we  are  going  to  do.  And,  as  I  said  earlier, 
Senator,  we  are  a  company  that  exports  around  the  world.  We 
have—we  do  not  have  extensive  manufacturing  operations  around 
the  world.  We  are  dependent  on  good  free  trade  agreements  being 
negotiated in order for us to gain market access. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

52 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  heard  you  mention  the  Chamber  of  Com-
merce  board  of  directors,  and  I  want  to  say  that  I  am  not—I  kind 
of—you know, pitched a tent in the middle on a lot of these issues. 
I’ve tried to be reasonable as it relates to the reality of world trade 
and the ability of the people I represent to export around the globe 
and  participate  in  the  global  economy.  I  also,  you  know,  want  to 
look  at  every  one  of  these  trade  agreements  carefully  and  make 
sure they’re fair to the men and women who work in America. 

And  I  know  that  the  Chamber  of  Commerce  is  on  the  front  line 
here.  And  you  mentioned  your  board  of  directors.  And  I  just  want 
to say to you today, Mr. Brilliant, even if you are not there at those 
board  meetings,  if  the  decision  was  made,  in  a  Chamber  of  Com-
merce  board  meeting,  to  spend  somewhere  between  $15  and  $20 
million  on  political  advertising  this  cycle,  completely  on  the  other 
side  of  the  aisle,  I  would  like  to  understand  the  rationale  behind 
that. 

And  we  are  all  noticing  it’s  unprecedented  for  the  Chamber  of 
Commerce  to  become  this  politicized  in  our  election  cycle.  And  for 
General Motors and Chrysler and all the members of the Chamber 
of  Commerce,  I  hope  they  fully  understand  that  this  is  a  decision 
that  somebody  made  at  the  Chamber.  And  I  don’t  know  on  what 
basis  it  was  made.  But,  for  all  of  us  who  consider  ourselves  mod-
erate votes, who consider us willing to listen to every side of every 
question—I  have  abandoned  my  party  line  with  more  frequency 
than  almost  any  other  Democrat  in  my  caucus,  and  when  I  see 
these  advertisements  that  are  completely  being  paid  for  by  the 
Chamber  of  Commerce,  it  really—it  just  makes  me  scratch  my 
head. Who is making this decision, and why, and what are you say-
ing to the people here that are trying to find the middle? 

I  just—I  would  be  really  interested  to  know  if  your  board  of  di-
rectors  signed  off  on  that  decision.  Do  you  know  whether  or  not 
they did, Mr. Brilliant? 

Mr.  BRILLIANT.  Well,  just  a  point  of  clarity.  When  I  referenced 
‘‘the  board’’  where  GM  and  Chrysler  sat,  I  was  referencing  the 
U.S.-Korea  Business  Council,  an  affiliate  of  the  U.S.  Chamber  of 
Commerce.  I  sit  as  president  of  the  U.S.-Korea  Business  Council. 
I  also  sit  as  an  officer  of  the  U.S.  Chamber  of  Commerce.  But,  my 
reference  to  Ford  and—sorry—to  GM  and  to  Chrysler,  in  this  con-
text, was with respect to the U.S.-Korean Business Council. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Well, I’m confused. Are you a member of the 

governing board—— 

Mr. BRILLIANT. I wear—— 
Senator MCCASKILL.—that decided to do this? Do you—were you 

aware of this decision? Did you have a part in it? 

Mr.  BRILLIANT.  I  personally  did  not  have  a  part  in  this  decision. 
It’s  a  very  complex,  or  a  very  detailed  process  by  which  we  deter-
mine which candidates—or which candidates for elective office that 
we will support or not support. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Doesn’t  look  like  it  to  me.  It  looks  like—— 
Mr. BRILLIANT. Based on their—— 
Senator  MCCASKILL.—it’s  pretty  simple.  If  it’s  a  Republican,  you 
run  it  for  them,  and  if  it’s  a  Democrat,  you  run  them  against  it. 
Mr.  BRILLIANT.  I’m  sympathetic  to  your  views.  I  am  not  here 

today to talk about that. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

53 

Senator MCCASKILL. I get that, but—— 
Mr. BRILLIANT. I represent—— 
Senator MCCASKILL.—it’s on my mind. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr. BRILLIANT. Understood. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  it’s  on  a  lot  of  people’s  minds.  And  I 

just—I—you know—— 

Mr.  BRILLIANT.  Our  Congressional  staff  is  responsible  for  this 

and I will let them know of your concerns. 

Senator MCCASKILL. You want to—— 
Mr. BRILLIANT. I can follow up with your office. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  Yes.  You  want  to  know  why  this  place  gets 
so divided and partisan? And you want to know why we can’t come 
together and solve real problems that face our country? It’s because 
this  kind  of  stuff  happens,  and  everybody  around  here,  you  know, 
starts seeing the Chamber of Commerce, not as a legitimate coming 
together  of  American  businesses  to  try  to  promote  American  busi-
nesses, but the arm of one political party or the other. And it hap-
pens  on  both  sides.  I  get  just  as  cranky  when  I  think  folks  on  our 
side—but,  this  year  there  only  appears  to  be  one  major  actor,  and 
it’s  the  Chamber  of  Commerce.  And  I  just  wanted  to—it’s  on  my 
mind right now. I wanted to convey that to you. And I have a feel-
ing you’ll tell somebody about it. 

Mr. BRILLIANT. I appreciate that, and—— 
Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you—— 
Mr. BRILLIANT.—I will convey your views to the proper people in 

the chamber. 

Senator MCCASKILL.—Mr. Brilliant. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Senator  McCaskill,  I  think  you  just  told  some-

body about it. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator DORGAN. Let me thank you for your comments and your 

participation. 

And  she  raises  a  point  that  is  very  important,  and  a  point  that 

we hope you will deliver soon. 

Does  anybody  on  this  panel  believe  that  there  is  some  epiphany 
that’s  occurred  in  South  Korea  that  persuades  them  that  they 
would  like  to  reduce  their  trade  surplus  in  automobile  trade  with 
the United States? 

Mr.  Cassidy,  do  you  believe  that?  Let  me  just  add,  the  reason  I 
ask the question is, it seems to me they have had a very deliberate 
strategy for a long period of time, even post-1998, since we had an 
agreement,  since  we  would  have  expected  them  to  own  up  to  the 
terms of the agreement—they have a decision about how they want 
to  run  their  economy.  They  want  to  produce  vehicles  to  be  sold 
here. They don’t want us to produce vehicles to be sold there. 

So,  the  question  is:  Has  the  Government  of  South  Korea,  based 
on what they have told us and what they have said and so on, had 
some  epiphany  that  tells  us  that  the  whole  strategy  there  has 
changed,  they’d  like  to  actually  have  more  U.S.  cars  shipped  there 
and  reduce  their  trade  surplus  with  us  on  a  bilateral  automobile 
trade? 

Mr. Cassidy? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

54 

Mr.  CASSIDY.  Senator,  I  think  I  concur  with  you  on  this,  but 
my—the  way  I  do  that  is,  I’ve  been  looking  at  the  exchange  rate 
of the Korean won during—prior to and after the negotiations. And, 
in  part,  we  were  looking  at  all  of  the  Asian  currencies,  because  of 
our focus on China—why was China not working? And I kept notic-
ing that, during the negotiation phase, that Korea was appreciating 
its  currency.  And  I  thought,  well,  maybe  this  was  because  of  the 
finance  minister,  Han  Seung-soo,  who  was,  I  thought,  a  very  re-
sponsible  finance  minister.  And  then,  after  the  negotiations  were 
over,  the  exchange  rate  then  depreciates  again.  And  this  seemed, 
to  me,  classic  Korean  policy  of  using  the  exchange  rate  during  the 
negotiation  to  keep  that  offer  on  the  table,  and  then,  after  the  ne-
gotiation  is  reached,  that  the  agreement  has  been  notified,  the  ex-
change rate goes down. 

And  I’ve  seen  this  far  too  often  in  my  dealings  with  Korea,  in 
particular;  other  countries,  as  well,  but,  I  think  this  was  a  classic 
example. 

So,  I  come  to  the  same  position  that  you  are,  but  I  come  to  it 

through the—just observing the exchange rate. 
Dr. MCMILLION. Senator, could I say that—— 
Senator DORGAN. Yes. 
Dr.  MCMILLION.—there  has  been  a  epiphany  in  the  business 
community and the political community in Korea over the last 2 or 
3 years, and that epiphany is an appreciation of the challenge that 
they  face  from  China.  There  is  enormous  discussion  in  Korea,  in 
the  business  community  and  the  political  community,  about  the 
technological  threat  that  they  feel  very  intensely  from  China.  And 
the last thing they want to do is to see their auto and other indus-
try  surpluses  with  the  United  States  and  the  West  reduced,  be-
cause  they’re  so  worried  about  competition  from  China.  So,  there 
is an epiphany, but it goes exactly in the other direction. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Brilliant? 
Mr.  BRILLIANT.  We  have  opportunities,  obviously,  through  the 
Council,  to  meet  with  the  senior  leadership  of  Korea  all  the  time, 
and we’re constantly reminding them of the obligations that they’re 
undertaking  in  the  South  Korea  Free  Trade  Agreement.  We’ll  see 
the Prime Minister later today in New York, we’ll see the President 
of Korea in October, in Seoul. And of course we’re going to continue 
to  remind  them  of  the  importance  of  living  up  to—or  following 
through  on  the  obligations  they’re  undertaking  in  this  U.S.-Korea 
Free Trade Agreement. 

And we know the history, here, and we are very sensitive to the 
concerns  of  the  U.S.  auto  industry.  Our  view  is  just  that,  if  you 
look at the totality of circumstances, this is a very good agreement, 
not just for the auto industry, but for service providers, for farmers, 
for manufacturers, which is why we are putting our weight behind 
this agreement. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Brilliant,  you  say  you  know  the  history. 
Has  the  history  largely  been  a  failure,  at  least  for  the  automotive 
sector  in  this  country?  Would  you  view  the  history  with  South 
Korea as less than satisfactory, or, as I would call it, a failure? 

Mr. BRILLIANT. I wouldn’t call it a failure, but, of course, market 
access  in  South  Korea  for  foreign  vehicles,  and  particularly  U.S. 
auto  manufacturers,  has  not  been  satisfactory.  It  needs  to  be  bet-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

55 

ter.  But,  managed  trade  is  not  what  we’re  looking  for.  What  we’re 
looking  for  is  to  eliminate  the  barriers  that  exist  in  South  Korea 
that  prevent  our  automobile  manufacturers  from  selling  in  that 
market.  And  we  think  the  FTA  takes  into  account  well,  addresses 
many of them—not all of them, but many of them. 

Senator DORGAN. Do you—— 
Mr.  BRILLIANT.  And  the  answer  is  not  to  let  the  Europeans  and 
Japanese seize the opportunities that may exist if we don’t get this 
deal done. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Cassidy,  he  just  described  managed  trade. 
In  your  judgment,  is  China,  South  Korea,  just  to  name  two,  en-
gaged in managed trade? 

Mr.  CASSIDY.  Well,  I  would  certainly  say,  in  the  case  of  Korea, 
that’s been my experience, in that it has been much more managed. 
That’s  a  small  economy;  and  being  surrounded  by  major  countries, 
I  think  the  policy  position  of  the  government  has  been  to  make 
sure that their trade position is maintained. 

I think China’s is a little bit more complex, and I see that as an 
evolution of the economy. So, I can’t honestly say that they manage 
it  in  quite  the  same  way  that  the  Koreans  do,  or  that  they  are  ca-
pable  of  doing  that,  but  they  are  able  to  manage  it  through  their 
exchange rate. And, once again, I raise that issue as a critical item. 
Senator  DORGAN.  I  read  the  piece  that  you  wrote  about  the 

runup in the won during the negotiation—— 

Mr. CASSIDY. Well, that’s—— 
Senator DORGAN.—and prior to—— 
Mr. CASSIDY.—the won. But, even in the China case—— 
Senator DORGAN. I—— 
Mr. CASSIDY.—what they have done is, they have—that currency 

has depreciated—— 

Senator DORGAN. I’m sorry. 
Mr. CASSIDY.—by a significant amount. 
Senator DORGAN. Even more than Korea. 
Mr. CASSIDY. That’s right. 
Senator DORGAN. And China is a huge—— 
Mr.  CASSIDY.  And  what  happens  in  Asia  is,  most  of  the  Asian 
currencies  are  aligned  to  China.  So—to  maintain  their  competitive 
position,  vis-a`-vis  China—so,  I—yes,  they  do,  but  not  quite  to  the 
same detailed way that, I think, the Koreans do. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Gettelfinger, you indicated you didn’t have 
much access to USTR, in terms of the voice of workers having some 
sort of input on what these agreements might mean to people that 
work for a living in this country. That’s a shame, because it seems 
to me, United States trade Ambassadors negotiate on behalf of our 
country’s interests, and a portion of those interests is the interests 
of American workers, in a very real way. 

Mr. Bozzella, you apparently did have access. Chrysler, you indi-
cate  in  your  testimony,  did  have  access  to  USTR,  and  continually 
pushed USTR, but to no avail. Can you describe that again? 

Mr.  BOZZELLA.  That  is  accurate.  We  did  appreciate  the  oppor-
tunity,  over  a  period  of  time,  to  engage  with  the  USTR.  I  would 
note that, as we got to the end of the process, frankly, with a U.S.- 
sided,  self-imposed  deadline,  that  that  access  and  that  opportunity 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

56 

for dialogue ended, and we were, frankly, surprised at what ended 
up coming out of the automotive chapter. 

We have said—had said, repeatedly, that, given our history—and 
Mr.  Brilliant  knows  the  history—we  lived  the  history,  we’ve  been 
at this for 20 years—that we argued that what we needed was de-
monstrable progress prior to the U.S. giving up what little leverage 
it has. And that was clearly rejected. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Bozzella, what has happened to sales from 
your  corporation  of  Dodge  Dakota  pickup  trucks  in  South  Korea? 
Mr.  BOZZELLA.  Well,  the  Dodge  Dakota  pickup  story  is  instruc-
tive,  for  a  number  of  reasons.  We  have  really  seen—we  had  a 
promising product that was a small, compact pickup truck that was 
designed  to  appeal  to  trades  people  and  small-business  people  in 
Korea.  We  launched  that  vehicle,  with  high  expectations.  And, 
frankly,  we  ran  into  three  barriers  along  the  way,  very  significant 
ones. I think you alluded to them a little bit earlier. 

But,  just  to  illustrate,  because  I  think  it’s  important,  after 
launching  the  vehicle  and  seeing  an  increase  in  sales,  albeit  off  a 
very, very low base, we were informed by authorities in Korea that 
the tax status of that vehicle was going to be reclassified. In other 
words,  the  vehicle,  which  is  a  truck—it  is  a—it’s  built  on  a  frame, 
it’s  a  pickup  truck,  it  has  got  a  bed  in  it,  it’s  a  pickup  truck  on— 
in  every  country  on  Earth—in  Korea,  it  was  reclassified  to  a  car, 
which  resulted  in  a  tax  increase  of  almost  $5,000.  We  were,  of 
course,  dismayed  by  that  and  saw  a  drop  in  sales.  We  engaged  in 
a  process  to  try  and  get  that  turned  around,  and  we  were,  fortu-
nately, able to do so, and then ran into a second barrier. 

At  that  point,  it  was  told  to  us  by  a  different  authority,  a  safety 
authority, that, in fact, this Dodge Dakota vehicle, with a cover on 
it,  which,  of  course—any  trades  person  or  small-business  person 
who wants to use a pickup truck’s going to put a cover on it—that 
the  cover  was  illegal.  There  was  press  accounts  to  this  event—to 
this  effect,  which  created  another  drop  in  sales.  And  then,  we, 
frankly,  through—had  an  intercession  with  the  embassy,  through 
Senate  staff,  to  raise  this  issue  and  to  say  we  really  need  to  have 
some fairness with regard to this product. 

I would say there was an interesting sort of irony and Catch 22. 
The  other  authority  that  declared  the  vehicle  a  car  and  then  let  it 
become  a  truck  again  then  said,  ‘‘When  you  put  the  cover  on  it,  it 
looks like an SUV, so maybe we should tax it as a car again.’’ Now, 
we  managed  to  avoid  that  little  problem,  and  then  had  the  vehi-
cle—finally,  the  safety  authorities  in  Korea  agreed  that  it  should, 
in  fact,  be  legal  with  the  cover  on  it.  And  then,  just  finally—they 
came back and said, ‘‘No, covers with glass windows would be ille-
gal’’—and  then,  finally,  we  just  gave  up.  We  put  bars  on  the  win-
dows and sold the vehicle like that. 

Senator DORGAN. And so, what have sales of Dodge Dakota pick-

up trucks been in—— 

Mr.  BOZZELLA.  Well,  needless  to  say,  they’ve  been  low.  And  we 
have two problems. One is, we’ve—the Korean government has left 
consumers with great uncertainty in their minds as to whether this 
product  is  a  legitimate  product.  And,  number  two,  you’ve  got  to 
really  wonder  about  the  tenacity  of  a  company  to  kind  of  continue 
to—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

57 

Senator DORGAN. Yes. 
Mr. BOZZELLA.—try and get—— 
Senator DORGAN. Well—— 
Mr. BOZZELLA.—into this market. 
Senator DORGAN.—it seems to me the Korean government did ex-
actly what it wanted to with the Dodge Dakota pickup truck. They, 
through  a  series  of  approaches,  sent  signals  to  the  Korean  con-
sumers,  ‘‘Don’t  buy  this.’’  And  that  represents  what  I  think  has 
been  a  modus  operandi  of  the  Korean  government.  I  raise  it—I 
wrote  it,  a  while  back,  and  I  suppose,  because  my  state’s  name  is 
in Dodge—we kind of like the name ‘‘Dodge Dakota.’’ We like some-
body that would name a pickup truck after our state. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator DORGAN. But, from what I read and understood, that ve-
hicle  all  of  a  sudden  garnered  some  attention  and  some  consumer 
preference  in  South  Korea,  and  you  began  to  see  some  excitement 
of,  ‘‘Maybe  this  is  the  vehicle  that  would  really  capture  attention.’’ 
You saw that in the sales, and immediately the Korean government 
began to take action that is not described in these agreements. It’s 
just  the  action  that  they  want  to  take  to  have  the  Korean  people 
understand,  ‘‘You  need  to  be  driving  Korean  cars,  cars  made  in 
Korea, produced by Korean workers.’’ There’s kind of a sophistry of 
low  expectation  by  everybody,  I  think,  on  these  trade  agreements. 
Mr. Brilliant, I remain surprised that you would not call it a fail-
ure  when  we  do  a  1998  agreement  with  South  Korea,  and  the  def-
icit increases substantially, and we end up with a very substantial 
deficit  in  bilateral  automobile  trade,  with  all  kinds  of  self-evident 
actions by the South Koreans to keep our vehicles out. It seems to 
me, just by classic definition, that has been a failure. And had you 
said  you  agreed  with  that,  then  I  would  have  asked,  if  you  believe 
that’s  a  failure,  what  gives  you  a  belief  that  there’s  going  to  be  a 
different result from doing the same thing? 

.

I’ll  give  you  a  chance  to  respond  to  this  chart  that  shows  the 
statement  of  South  Korea’s  trade  minister.  ‘‘The  free  trade  pact 
with  the  United  States  is  expected  to  boost  South  Korea’s  auto-re-
lated  trade  surplus  by  roughly  $1  billion  annually,’’  the  Korean 
government said Wednesday. The [Minister of Commerce] said .
. 
that exports of finished cars may shoot up around $810 million due 
to Washington’s scrapping of its 2.5 percent tariff for South Korean 
cars.  Imports  could  rise  $72  million  after  Seoul  removes  its  8  per-
cent  tariff,  giving  South  Korea  a  surplus  of  about  $740  million  a 
year.’’ 

I  assume  you  must  disagree  with  the  Korean  government,  be-
cause  if  you  agreed  with  the  Korean  government,  you  would  think 
this  wouldn’t  be  much  of  a  deal  for  us  with  respect  to  bilateral 
automobile  trade.  So,  you  would  take  issue  with  the  Korean  gov-
ernment with respect to their assessment of this trade agreement? 
Mr. BRILLIANT. Well, just to be clear, Senator, what I said before 
was, one, some of the specific commitments that were made in 1995 
and  1998,  the  South  Korea  Government  did  implement.  However, 
I  did  not  say—and  I  would  not  say—that  that  led  to  a  sufficient 
market  share  for  U.S.  automobile  manufacturers.  Clearly,  it  did 
not. Which is why we feel strongly that it was important to address 
some  of  the  outstanding  barriers—tariff  and  nontariff  barriers— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

58 

deal  with  regulatory  transparency,  ensure  that  we  have  a  strong, 
robust,  and  innovative  dispute  resolution  process,  and,  of  course, 
deal  with  issues  regarding  standards,  which  this  agreement  does 
deal  with,  and,  once  implemented,  would  help  level  the  playing 
field.  It  doesn’t  guarantee  market  access,  but  it  certainly  puts  our 
automobile  manufacturers  in  a  better  position  than  they  would  be 
in the alternative—— 

Senator DORGAN. But, it—— 
Mr. BRILLIANT.—in our view. 
Senator DORGAN. But, it is a curious way to grade a foreign gov-
ernment,  in  terms  of  what  they  did  rather  than  what  they  didn’t 
do. What they didn’t do is much more important to those of us who 
are  evaluating  a  trade  agreement  with  a  country  that  did  not  do 
the things that it represented in the previous two agreements. Why 
would  you  not  emphasize,  here,  what  was  not  done  that  was  rep-
resented  to  us  as  something  that  would  be  done,  and  use  that  as 
some guidepost of whether this agreement makes much sense? 

Mr.  BRILLIANT.  Well,  one  thing  about  this  agreement  is  that  the 
various  undertakings  are  binding  obligations.  And  I  cannot  under-
estimate  the  importance  of,  one,  our  automobile  manufacturers 
being  part  of  the  standards  process.  I  mean,  there  has  not  been 
regulatory  transparency  in  Korea—not  just  for  the  auto  industry, 
but  for  a  lot  of  industries—which  is  one  of  the  fundamental  tenets 
of this FTA agreement, which is to ensure regulatory transparency 
in the process, allow our auto manufacturers the ability to engage, 
early  and  often,  in  the  process  to  provide  input  on  standards. 
That’s  an  important  step  forward,  and  it’s  already  evidence  of  the 
reaction  of  the  South  Korean  government  to  those  obligations  by 
sitting down with the U.S. Government, this past summer, and ad-
dressing  one  of  the  standards  that  our  industry  was  concerned 
about. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  want  to  give  the  rest  of  you  an  opportunity 
to answer whether you think these so-called, ‘‘binding agreements,’’ 
are measurably different, in terms of the results they will achieve, 
than any other promises or agreements that have resulted from the 
previous  two  attempts  to  deal  with  the  bilateral  trade  relationship 
with South Korea. 

Mr. Cassidy? 
Mr.  CASSIDY.  That’s  a  very  good  point,  because  it—the  question 
is,  what  is  the  nature  of  the  binding  agreement?  Under  the  FTA, 
it would be a binding panel—arbitration—binding arbitration. But, 
that’s  not  to  say  that  all  the  other  agreements  were  not  binding. 
They  were.  We  have  section  301,  in  the  United  States,  that  pro-
vides an opportunity, when a country does not live up to its agree-
ments, to take action. So, there are different forms of binding. And 
all  of  those  agreements  were  binding  in  that  sense.  They  were 
agreements, they were covered under the provisions of section 301. 
So,  it’s—this  deals,  on  the  FTA,  with  the  specific  mechanism— 
a  bilateral  panel  that  would  presumably  make  independent  deci-
sions. But, all the agreements that we negotiated were binding. 

The question is, are they going to be implemented? Will the gov-
ernment—will  the  administration  take  action  when  those  agree-
ments are not met? Using China, again, we negotiated a section in 
the China agreement, section 421, under which—when market dis-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

59 

ruption  takes  place,  the  administration  could  take  action  against 
China. All the cases that were brought to the Government—I think 
there  were  five  cases—all  of  them  were  denied  by  the  Administra-
tion. So, the effectiveness of that provision is eliminated. 

So,  the  question  about  the  agreement  is,  are  the  provisions 
meaningful,  but  will  the  Administration—whatever  Administra-
tion—will they actually implement them? 

So,  I  think  it’s  a  ruse  to  say,  ‘‘This  has  binding  commitments; 
whereas,  no  other  agreement,  presumably,  did.’’  That’s  not  correct. 
Senator DORGAN. Mr. Gettelfinger, any comment on that? Do you 

have—— 

Mr.  GETTELFINGER.  Well,  other  than  that  I  think  that  we  have 
seen  a  lack  of  enforcement  of  trade  agreements  over  the  years, 
whether  it’s  Korea  or  other  countries,  and  the  mechanism  that’s 
put  in  here  has  nothing  to  do  with  nontariff  barriers—nontariff, 
from a standpoint of the arbitration process. So, I just see this as— 
everything  I  hear  is  ‘‘could’’  and  ‘‘would’’  and  ‘‘may’’  and  ‘‘perhaps 
we  will  gain  benefit.’’  We  see  this  as  a  total  failure,  in  its  current 
state. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Bozzella? 
Mr.  BOZZELLA.  Well,  again,  I  want  to—I  want  to  make  it  clear, 
we  seek  to  achieve  success  in  Korea.  We  want  to—we  want  to  be 
a winning company there. We want to be successful in that market, 
and  we  value  the  opportunity  to  do  so.  I  think  the  provisions  that 
have been discussed, the dispute resolution procedure and the like, 
are not a—an adequate match for the challenges we face, in terms 
of Korea’s history with regard to nontariff barriers. 

Senator DORGAN. Dr. McMillion? 
Dr.  MCMILLION.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  may  be  the  only  nonlawyer  on 
the  panel  today,  maybe  the  only  one  in  the  room,  so  let  me  say 
that—maybe I can get away with saying this—that this seems like 
a full employment for lawyers set of interests. It seems to me that 
the  concern  should  be  for  the  results.  Whether  you’re  running  a 
company or you’re running trade policy, it seems to me that the ob-
jective should be the results, not trying to stab little beads of mer-
cury  with  each  of  these—I  understand  the  need  for  a  rules-based 
system,  but  at  some  point  it’s  the  results  that  matter,  and  we’re 
not getting the results we need. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Brilliant, you wanted to make a final com-

ment? 

Mr. BRILLIANT. I do, just three quick points. 
First  of  all,  I  think  the  snap-back  provisions  are  very  important 
and should not be understated in the dispute resolution process. If, 
in fact, we see a nullification or impairment of the obligations that 
South  Korea  is  undertaking  in  this  FTA,  and  the  tariff  was  put 
back on vehicles coming from Korea to the U.S. market, that would 
have a annual impact of about $200 million on South Korean auto 
manufacturers. So, that’s not insignificant. 

The second point I’d make is that the detailed processes laid out 
in  the  agreement—dealing  with  regulatory  transparency,  dealing 
with  the  working  group  and  the  ability  to  get  in  early  in  the  proc-
ess—that’s not insignificant either. It’s much more detailed than in 
past agreements, which is why this aspect of it is not to be under-
stated. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

60 

And  the  third  thing  is,  I  think  we  have  to  be  somewhat  encour-
aged by recent statements by Korean government officials acknowl-
edging past import campaigns—anti-import campaigns—and recog-
nizing they have to address this in a very public way. 

Now,  obviously,  we  need  to  hold  them—their  feet  to  the  fire  on 
that.  And  we  need  to  make  sure  that  those  campaigns  are  a  thing 
of  the  past.  But,  we  have  not  seen  recent  evidence  of  that  in  the 
last year, and we’re going to continue to work on that, because we 
have  our  members’  interests  at  heart  when  we  advocate  for  these 
agreements. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  want  to  thank  all  of  the  witnesses  today.  I 

do want to make a short comment on what we have heard. 

In  other  areas  of  this  Capitol,  we  have  hearings  going  on  about 
$700  billion  bailout  to  address  a  prospective  financial  collapse  if 
nothing is done. And one portion of that, that has undermined the 
economic foundation of this country, in my judgment, has been the 
trade deficit. Now, there are a lot of things that have gone on. The 
selling  of  toxic  mortgages  by  greedy  brokers,  greedy  mortgage 
banks,  greedy  hedge  funds,  investment  banks,  all  the  way  up  the 
line;  mortgages  that,  as  most  of  you  have  read  and  seen,  that  ad-
vertise, ‘‘If you’ve been bankrupt, come to us, we’ll give you a loan. 
You  have  bad  credit,  slow  pay,  no  pay,  bankrupt,  sick  credit,  we’ll 
help you out. You can get a loan from us.’’ I’ve shown all those ad-
vertisements on the floor of the Senate, and will do some more this 
afternoon. 

So, we had a lot of bad loans being made, called subprime loans; 
in some cases, with 1- and 2-percent entry interest rates, and reset-
ting  at  10  and  11  and  12  percent,  3  years  later,  in  circumstances 
where the borrower couldn’t possibly repay. In some cases, no prin-
cipal payment. In some cases, no principal payment and no interest 
payment  for  the  first  12  months,  all  of  it  put  on  the  back  end  of 
the  loan.  All  of  them—almost  all  of  them,  with  prepayment  pen-
alties  locked  into  9-,  10-,  11-,  12-percent  interest  rates  in  3  years 
when it resets, with prepayment penalties, so they could put these 
together  in  securities,  like  you  pack  sawdust  into  sausage,  years 
ago,  you  put  together  good  and  bad  and  securitize  it,  settle  it  up-
stream.  Everybody  was  making  massive  amounts  of  money.  And 
now  the  whole  thing  is  collapsing,  and  they’re  all  scratching  their 
heads, wondering why. 

At  the  same  time  that  all  of  this  happening,  you  have  a  trade 
deficit  of  $700–$800  billion  a  year,  you  have  a  fiscal  policy  budget 
deficit  that  President  Bush  says  is  something  between  $400  and 
$500  billion.  It  is  not  that  at  all.  The  deficit  is  what  we  have  to 
borrow each year in fiscal policy, and it’s closer to $800 billion than 
it is to $500 billion. 

So, add trade and fiscal policy deficits, you get a $1.5 to $1.6-tril-
lion deficit. That’s before the bailout of AIG, it’s before Freddie and 
Fannie. It’s before the $29 billion for the Bear Stearns acquisition. 
It’s before the $700 billion. 

All of this plays a role in undermining the economic—foundation 
of  this  country’s  economy.  I  don’t  know  what  the  solution  is,  but 
it  seems  to  me  you  start,  a  step  at  a  time,  putting  things  back  on 
track.  If  you’re  going  to  start,  a  step  at  a  time,  in  trade,  it  seems 
to  me  that  you  create  trade  policies  that  encourage  trade,  because 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

61 

I think trade is good, and I think plenty of trade is better, as long 
as  it  is  fair.  But,  trade  and  trade  agreements,  in  my  judgment, 
must  be  mutually  beneficial  to  the  countries  that  engage  in  them. 
And  this  country  has  been,  in  my  judgment,  unbelievably  ignorant 
in  being  willing  to  accept  trade  agreements  that  are  not  mutually 
beneficial. 

You  don’t  have  to  take  my  word  for  it.  Take  a  look  at  the  map 
that  shows  the  unbelievable  avalanche  of  red  ink,  year  after  year, 
that grows. 

And so, this is one piece, this discussion, a small piece of a larger 
problem of trade. This is about a South Korea agreement. It’s about 
bilateral automobile trade inside that agreement. But, step by step, 
and  block  by  block,  piece  by  piece,  all  of  this  adds  up  to  a  great 
deal of insecurity in this country by people who take a look at this 
and  say,  ‘‘What  on  Earth  is  going  on?  Who’s  standing  up  for  our 
interests  here?  How  is  it  you  sign  up  to  deals  that  undermine  the 
interests of this country?’’ 

That’s why I’ve held a hearing just on this subject, trying to un-
derstand,  how  is  it  we  get  ourselves  in  this  position?  It’s  not  sur-
prising to me that we have a substantial economic difficulty in this 
country  if  we  have  people  shuffling  around  with  their  hands  in 
their  pockets,  watching  bad  loans  being  made—at  the  Fed—yes, 
Treasury—regulator offices all across this state were—or, all across 
this city, rather—have been boasting, for almost a decade now, that 
they won’t regulate. They’re very interested in being willfully blind. 
All  of  this  goes  on  under  the  lack  of  interest  by  those  that  we 
are paying each month to provide oversight, and we’ve had bad de-
cisions  made  in  1999  by  deciding  what  we’re  going  to  is  create  fi-
nancial  homogenization  of  big  holding  companies  by  getting  rid  of 
Glass-Steagall,  the  very  protection  that  we  put  in  place  following 
the  Great  Depression  so  that  we  didn’t  merge  banking  with  unbe-
lievably  speculative  areas  of  real  estate  and  securities.  Got  rid  of 
that  in  1999.  I  didn’t  support  it,  but  Congress  got  rid  of  it,  under 
the  rubric  of  something  called,  ‘‘financial  modernization,’’  a  mis-
named piece of legislation, if ever there was one. 

So,  we  find  ourselves,  today,  on  a  Wednesday,  in  pretty  deep 
trouble,  one  part  of  which  deals  with  international  trade  causing 
very  large  deficits  that  undermine  this  country’s  currency—play  a 
role  in  undermining  this  country’s  currency  at  a  time  when  we 
need  to  see  evidence  of  economic  strength  and  not  economic  weak-
ness. 

My  hope  is  that,  as  Congress  works  through  all  of  these  areas 
in  the  coming  days  and  weeks,  that  we  will  begin  to  rethink,  not 
whether our country wants to lead the world in the right direction, 
because we have leadership responsibilities as we put this back to-
gether,  but,  in  trade,  whether  we  want  to  lead  in  deciding  that 
there’s a new day for trade. We say to South Korea, ‘‘No more bad 
deals with you. First of all, we’re going to negotiate deals with you 
and  China  and  others,  that  are  mutually  beneficial  to  you  and  to 
us,  that  enhance  trade  between  our  countries,  enhance  trade  that 
is fair. And you should understand it’s a new day. If you’re not in-
terested  in  that,  then  maybe  you  can  sell  all  those  800,000  cars  in 
Kenya.  But,  if  you’re  interested  in  resolving  the  disputes  and  the 
differences and the imbalances that have grown, and want to have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

a  trade  relationship  with  this  country  that’s  fair  to  both  countries, 
sign us up, we’re interested in that.’’ 

62 

This trade agreement, in my judgment, falls far, far short of that, 
and, in my judgment, will almost certainly not be supported by this 
Congress  now.  It’s  not  going  to  be  taken  up  before  the  end  of  this 
Congress, I believe, unless it is modified in a very substantial way. 
This  trade  agreement  will  not  be  embraced  by  any  Congress,  be-
cause  I  think  it’s  a  new  time  and  a  new  day,  and  there  are  new 
requirements that we set for our country in our participation in the 
global economy. 

It  is  a  global  economy.  We  are  participating  in  that  global  econ-
omy. But, we must insist that participation represent our interests, 
as  well.  Too  many  of  these  trade  agreements  have  not  done  that. 
I  thank  the  witnesses  for  being  willing  to  come  to  Capitol  Hill 
today and lend your voice to a public discussion about these issues. 

This hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:50 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:28 Jan 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\78188.TXT JACKIE

